Bacteriuria and hematuria in infections due to Schistosoma haematobium.Urinary schistosomiasis: influence of the circadian variation of hematuria and proteinuria on reagent stick testing.Day-to-day fluctuation of point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen test scores and faecal egg counts in children infected with Schistosoma mansoni in Ethiopia.Determining the variation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine and egg counts variation in stool between days in Schistosoma mansoni (S. mansoni) infected individuals is vital to decide whether or not to rely on a single-sample test for diagnosis of Schistosomiasis. In this study, the magnitude of day-to-day variation in urine-CCA test scores and in faecal egg counts was evaluated in school children in Ethiopia.A total of 620 school children (age 8 to 12 years) were examined for S. mansoni infection using double Kato-Katz and single urine-CCA cassette methods (batch 32727) on three consecutive days.The prevalence of S. mansoni infection was 81.1% based on triple urine-CCA-cassette test and 53.1% based on six Kato-Katz thick smears. Among the study participants, 26.3% showed fluctuation in urine CCA and 32.4% showed fluctuation in egg output. Mean egg count as well as number of cases in each class of intensity and intensity of cassette band color varied over the three days of examination. Over 85% of the children that showed day-to-day variations in status of S. mansoni infection from negative to positive or vice versa by the Kato-Katz and the CCA methods had light intensity of infection. The fluctuation in both the CCA test scores and faecal egg count was not associated with age and sex.The current study showed day-to-day variation in CCA and Kato-Katz test results of children infected with S. mansoni. This indicates the necessity of more than one urine or stool samples to be collected on different days for more reliable diagnosis of S. mansoni infection in low endemic areas.Simultaneous use of a sensitive filtration technique and reagent strips in urinary schistosomiasis.A sensitive filtration technique and polyvalent urine analysis reagent strips were used simultaneously in patients with urinary schistosomiasis in order to detect pathological conditions other than haematuria and proteinuria. A significant correlation was found between haematuria, proteinuria, leucocyturia and intensity of infection as measured by egg excretion in urine. The best correlation between the reagent strip findings and intensity of infection was obtained when the three parameters were combined. After treatment with metrifonate the reduction of egg excretion was paralleled by the normalization of the reagent strip findings. Analysis of day-to-day variation demonstrated a similar low variation of the filtration technique and the reagent strip findings. Specificity of urine analysis of reagent strips was tested in two age-matched control groups. Although the study was designed only as a pilot study, the results suggests that polyvalent reagent strips may be a useful tool for diagnosis of heavily infected patients under field conditions, as they permit rapid and easy identification of subjects with high egg counts.Analysis of worm burden variation in human Schistosoma mansoni infections by determination of serum levels of circulating anodic antigen and circulating cathodic antigen.Serum circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) concentrations, as a possible direct measure of worm burden, were compared with fecal egg counts in a heavily Schistosoma mansoni-infected population from Zaire to allow differentiation between worm loads and worm fecundity in relation to age and intensity of infection. Of the 517 subjects, 95% excreted eggs and 97% demonstrated circulating antigens. Fecal egg counts showed an age-related pattern characteristic for an area in which schistosomiasis is endemic with intense transmission levels. Regression analysis showed that antigen concentrations were strongly associated with egg counts. For CAA, but not for CCA, this relation was found to be nonlinear, which would be consistent with density-dependent fecundity or crowding. The trend was uniform for all age groups, which for this particular population indicated a genuine reduction of worm loads rather than reduced worm fecundity with age of the host.Evaluation of eosinophiluria in the diagnosis of schistosomiasis hematobium: a field-based study.Using Hansel's stain, eosinophiluria greater than 5% of total urinary white blood cells was found in 59% of a randomly selected population sample in an area endemic for schistosomiasis hematobium. The prevalence and mean level of eosinophiluria were significantly higher in infected subjects than in noninfected subjects (P less than 0.05). The sensitivity (80%), specificity (86%), and positive predictive value (82%) of eosinophiluria as a diagnostic index for schistosomiasis hematobium were significantly higher (Youdin index 0.66; P less than 0.05) than those of proteinuria, hematuria, and leukocyturia taken singly or in combination. However, unlike the latter three measurements, this method involves microscopy. There is a great need for a chemical method for measuring eosinophiluria.Circulating schistosomal antigen in diagnosis and assessment of cure in individuals infected with Schistosoma mansoni.The effectiveness of praziquantel in treating schistosomiasis is most commonly assessed by quantitating egg production or anti-schistosome antibodies in serum. We have used a monoclonal antibody (MAb)-based antigen-capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for the serologic diagnosis of schistosomiasis, and to monitor the efficacy of praziquantel therapy in 49 individuals with parasitologically proven schistosomiasis. The MAb used, 128C3/3/21, recognizes a repeating carbohydrate epitope expressed at all stages of parasite development, and antibodies recognizing this epitope are found in the serum of infected humans. The overall sensitivity of the ELISA was 78%, with a sensitivity of 100% for patients excreting greater than 100 eggs/g of feces and 72% for those excreting less than 100 eggs/g of feces. The positivity of the ELISA was directly related to the fecal egg counts obtained on days -3, -2, and -1 before treatment with praziquantel, but there was no correlation between antigen levels and the clinical stage of the disease. After praziquantel treatment, we observed a highly significant correlation (P less than 0.0001) between the time elapsed since treatment and the decrease in antigenemia. Furthermore, although no eggs were detected in any of the stool specimens at week 12 after treatment, the antigen was detected in 21% of the treated patients (seven of 33 ELISA-positive patients). Antigen levels decreased over the 12-week period in six of these patients, whereas the antigen level increased with time in one individual. The persistence of antigenemia suggests that these individuals are either still clearing antigen or remain infected.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Schistosomiasis among young children in Usoma, Kenya.Although schistosomiasis burden is greatest among school-age children (SAC) (6-15 years of age), infection among preschool-age children (PSAC) (1-5 years), may be underestimated in endemic areas. We conducted a cross-sectional study evaluating Schistosoma mansoni infection among children 1-15 years of age in a highly endemic community in Kenya. Diagnostic tests included stool exam (Kato/Katz technique), serum testing for schistosome-specific antibodies, and urine testing for circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). Overall, 268 SAC and 216 PSAC were enrolled; prevalence increased with age, with 14% of 1 year olds and more than 90% of children > 10 years of age infected. Stool exam was more sensitive among SAC than PSAC, but performance was similar after adjusting for infection intensity (based on CCA). Schistosomiasis poses a threat to PSAC in endemic areas, and stool exam may underestimate the prevalence of infection. Control programs in such areas should consider PSAC in addition to SAC.Control of Schistosoma haematobium morbidity on Pemba Island: validity and efficiency of indirect screening tests.Four indirect screening methods for the detection of Schistosoma haematobium morbidity are compared (history of haematuria, visual haematuria, and microhaematuria at the 1+ and 2+ positivity limit by reagent strips) in terms of their diagnostic performance under conditions of progressive decrease in prevalence of infection, intensity and risk of morbidity as a result of repeated schistosomiasis control programmes on Pemba Island, United Republic of Tanzania. The results show that the sensitivity of a history of haematuria was higher (71%) in children but lower in adults (40%), similar to the findings for visual haematuria in children (60%) and adults (40%) at baseline. However, visual haematuria had a higher specificity, positive predictive value, and efficiency than a history of haematuria in both children and adults. Microhaematuria at the 1+ positivity limit (by reagent strips) had the highest sensitivity of all the methods investigated, but the lowest specificity, positive predictive value, and efficiency. Quantitatively, the indirect methods tended to increase in specificity, negative predictive value, and efficiency during the course of the intervention programme. In contrast, positive predictive value tended to decrease, while the sensitivity remained fairly stable. Overall, these findings suggest that a history of haematuria and/or visual haematuria are appropriate methods for preliminary screening of communities to identify those at risk of morbidity. Thereafter, microhaematuria (1+ positivity limit) may be the more appropriate method for targeting intervention at the individual level.Evaluation of urinalysis reagent strips versus microscopical examination of urine for Schistosoma haematobium.This study deals with the effectivecess of chemical reagent strips for detection of haematuria and proteinuria in selecting S. haematobium egg positive subjects as compared to microscopical examination of urine. Out of 222 students from primary and secondary rural schools, 191 were S. haematobium and 59 were parasitologically negative. 135 students had a count of less than 50 eggs/10 ml. urine and 56 had more than 50 eggs/10ml. The sensitivity of reagent strips in detecting haematuria was 10% and 36% for the groups with less than and more than 50 eggs/10 ml. of urine respectively. The correspondant microscope figures were 42% and 93% respectively. Proteinuria was detected in 11% and 29% of urines from the groups with less than and more than 50 eggs/10 ml. respectively. The specificity of strips and microscopical examination in detection of haematuria was 100%, while that for proteinuria was 97% as detected by strips. These results show that urinalysis strips cannot be used as an alternative to microscopic examination of urine for the presence of S. haematobium eggs.A comparative study on specific antibodies and circulating antigen (CAA) in serum and parasitological findings for diagnosis of schistosomiasis mansoni in an endemic area in Tanzania.A baseline study to evaluate the prevalence of Schistosoma mansoni infection as well as the diagnostic efficacy of serodiagnostic tests was performed in Kabaganga village, Kome island, Lake Victoria, Tanzania. A total of 1108 individuals were examined parasitologically and clinically. Egg excretion was demonstrated by one-sample Kato-Katz test. Specific IgG1 and IgG4 antibodies against S. mansoni adult worm (SAWA) and egg (SEA) antigens as well as circulating anodic antigen (CAA) were determined in serum samples from 250 of these subjects. As a control population 41 individuals from a non-endemic area were examined parasitologically, clinically and serologically. In the parasitologically examined Kabaganga population 45% were excreting eggs. The pattern of egg excretion was typical for an endemic area with a peak in the age group 10-14 years. Sixty-five percent of the serologically tested villagers were positive in the CAA test. A total of 80% were positive in either of the two tests, indicating an active infection. In 67-95% of these individuals the levels of isotype specific antibodies were increased. The prevalence of CAA positivity corresponded fairly well with that of Kato-Katz results in the age groups 10-29 years, but in the younger age groups a considerably greater number of individuals were positive in the CAA test than in the Kato-Katz test. The results obtained indicate that virtually all of the Kabaganga villagers, regardless of age, had an ongoing, active infection or had previously been infected with S. mansoni. This population, therefore, may be useful for evaluation of the diagnostic efficacy of various antibody tests. The highest degree of discrimination between the endemic and the non-endemic village populations was noted for anti-egg IgG4 antibodies. It is concluded that the combined determination of parasite eggs in faeces and CAA in serum provides high sensitivity as regards active infection. Increased levels of isotype-specific antibodies, particularly of the IgG4 subclass, is a sensitive indicator of past or present infection, and the prevalence of individuals with such increased levels may be a simple and reliable indicator of the frequency of schistosomiasis in a community.Rapid diagnosis of schistosomiasis by antigen detection in urine with a reagent strip.For the rapid and simple diagnosis of schistosomiasis, a reagent strip assay for detection of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine was developed. The test was based on a previously developed sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) using a combination of two anti-CCA monoclonal antibodies. For the reagent strip assay, as the capture matrix, monoclonal antibody was coated onto a nitrocellulose membrane and mounted on polyvinyl chloride strips. Urine samples were then tested in an assay consisting of a combined incubation step of the urine sample and biotinylated detecting antibody followed by incubation in streptavidin peroxidase and a subsequent staining. The specificity and the sensitivity of the assay, as determined with urine samples of 61 uninfected controls and 67 Schistosoma mansoni-infected individuals, were 96.7 and 95.5%, respectively. The results of the reagent strip assay compared very well with microscopical parasitological diagnosis by the standard Kato-Katz method for the same individuals. The reagent strip test has a lower detection limit of 1 ng of CCA per ml and can be completed in 75 min. By the inclusion of two reference bands on the strips, standardized reading could be achieved. This reagent strip assay is a promising tool for qualitative diagnosis of S. mansoni infections in control programs.Evaluation of the reagent strip test for haematuria in the control of Schistosoma haematobium infection in schoolchildren.Several recent reports have indicated the potential of the reagent strip test for haematuria in the diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium infection. Approximately 15,000 schoolchildren from a population of 40,000 people were examined for reagent strip microhaematuria on three occasions between 1986 and 1987 and treated with praziquantel 40 mg/kg if positive. The reagent strip was evaluated against a single filtration of 10 ml urine for S. haematobium eggs. Initially 65.9% of children were treated followed by 37.5% at the second examination 6 months later and 44.5% at the third examination a further 12 months later. Reagent strip sensitivity was shown to be related to the intensity of infection. The reagent strip specificity improved significantly with successive treatments indicating that haematuria was more sensitive than parasitology for light infections. The amount of S. haematobium reinfection was highest in the 7-9 year olds decreasing to the 16-20 year age group which suggested an impact of protective immunity. It was concluded that microhaematuria is a valuable indicator for the diagnosis of S. haematobium in national control programmes and can be substituted for parasitological examination with advantage but sensitivity and specificity should continue to be evaluated throughout the programme.Detection and quantification of soluble egg antigen in urine of Schistosoma haematobium-infected children from Kenya.While research on alternative diagnostic and morbidity markers for infection with Schistosoma haematobium has been going on for a long time, egg counts continue to be used as the gold standard, and infection intensity is thought to reflect the severity of the disease. However, this relationship is not always clear and fluctuation in egg output makes it difficult to classify prevalence correctly. The use of circulating adult worm antigen detection as an alternative diagnostic technique has been applied with varying success. However, this is a measure of worm burden and does not reflect the tissue egg load(s). In the present study we have used an assay that detects soluble egg antigen (SEA) in urine of S. haematobium-infected children, and we have evaluated the applicability of the assay as a diagnostic and morbidity indicator. To evaluate this assay, we have studied a group of 470 children from two schools (Tsunguni and Kibaokiche) in the Coast province of Kenya; 84.8% and 77% were egg-positive while the percentage positive as determined by the SEA-ELISA were 78.8% and 76.2% in Tsunguni and Kibaokiche, respectively. In both schools, SEA levels in urine of S. haematobium-infected children significantly correlated with egg counts (Pearson's r=0.73, P < 0.0001) and with hematuria (Spearman's r=0.65, P < 0.0001). In addition, urinary tract pathology as determined by ultrasound significantly correlated with the SEA levels in urine (Spearman's r=0.3, P < 0.001). The SEA-ELISA compared well with microhematuria within egg count classes and with egg counts within hematuria classes.Schistosomiasis of the lower reproductive tract without egg excretion in urine.The individual and public health impact of female genital schistosomiasis (FGS) has been studied and FGS as a risk factor for acquiring human immunodeficiency virus is discussed. In a community-based study in Tanzania, 40% of the women of child-bearing age (n=543) showed excretion of Schistosoma haematobium eggs in the urine (median=2.2 eggs/10 ml of urine) and 32% (n=263) had S. haematobium eggs in their cervical tissue. Urinary and genital schistosomiasis coexisted in 62% of the women, but S. haematobium eggs were found in the cervix without detectable egg excretion in the urine in 23%. Only 43% of the FGS cases had hematuria. Since FGS frequently exists in women with scanty or no egg excretion in the urine and because this disease manifestation is a considerable individual and public health hazard in S. haematobium-endemic areas, mass treatment targeted to women of child-bearing age should be considered.Eosinophil cationic protein, soluble egg antigen, circulating anodic antigen, and egg excretion in male urogenital schistosomiasis.Markers of male genital schistosomiasis (MGS) are needed to elucidate the consequences for reproductive health. Eosinophil cationic protein (ECP) and soluble egg antigen (SEA) in urine and semen, and circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in serum were assessed as MGS markers. Egg counts, ECP, and SEA in urine and CAA in serum, correlated positively. Seminal egg excretion exhibited marked day-to-day variations, but counts correlated positively with urinary egg counts and SEA in semen and with CAA. Positive predictive values with reference to seminal egg excretion were as follows: seminal ECP (52%), seminal SEA (83%), CAA (97%), and urinary egg excretion (82%). SEA in semen and CAA in serum constitute potential markers of MGS. However, urine egg counts as an indirect marker of MGS remains the preferred diagnostic method from a public health perspective.A reagent strip antigen capture assay for the assessment of cure of schistosomiasis patients.Presence of the schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in urine of patients with Schistosoma mansoni or S. haematobium infections.We investigated the presence of the circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in the urine of schistosomiasis patients. This genus specific antigen was hitherto demonstrated only in the serum of schistosomiasis patients. The urine of 80 patients with Schistosoma mansoni infections, 33 patients with S. haematobium infections, and 2 patients with mixed S. haematobium and S. mansoni infections were screened by a quantitative enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). CAA was demonstrated in 81% of those with intestinal schistosomiasis and in 97% of those with urinary schistosomiasis. CAA titers were less than 1:0.2-1:51.2. Results were compared with circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) titers in urine obtained in an indirect hemagglutination assay (IHA). CCA was generally not detectable in the urine of patients with S. haematobium infection, but was demonstrated in the urine of 85% of the patients with S. mansoni infection. Both CAA titers and CCA titers correlated positively with the number of S. mansoni eggs excreted in the feces, but CAA titers did not show a significant correlation with the number of S. haematobium eggs in urine. Both antigen titers showed a moderate correlation with the serum CAA level in schistosomiasis mansoni. The discovery of CAA in the urine of the majority of schistosomiasis patients tested suggests the use of urine samples for non-invasive immunodiagnosis of the disease.Mixed Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni infection: effect of different treatments on the serum level of circulating anodic antigen (CAA).In this study, levels of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in serum were investigated after differential treatment of 160 Sudanese patients with mixed Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni infections. The patients were randomly divided into four groups, which were treated with metrifonate (two doses of 10 mg/kg bodyweight), oxamniquine (60 mg/kg), praziquantel (40 mg/kg), or a multivitamin preparation, respectively. Serum, stool and urine samples were taken prior to treatment as well as one month and five months after chemotherapy. Before chemotherapy CAA levels were similar in the four groups. Antigenemia remained unchanged in the control group. In patients treated with praziquantel or oxamniquine the concentration of CAA decreased to a similar extent. However, whereas in the praziquantel group absence of CAA was already observed one month after treatment, clearing of CAA from the circulation seemed to take longer in patients treated with oxamniquine. Treatment with metrifonate did not result in a reduction of the CAA titres.Control of morbidity due to Schistosoma haematobium on Pemba Island: programme organization and management.A programme to control urinary schistosomiasis was initiated on Pemba island in January 1986 with the objectives of eliminating morbidity due to S. haematobium by utilizing a primary health care approach of strengthening the existing health care delivery system and creating a sound basis for future control of other parasitic and communicable diseases. The plan of action included training of rural health assistants to undertaken an intervention phase targeted to schools for selective population chemotherapy surveys at six-month intervals during the first two years, using indirect diagnostic techniques (observation of gross haematuria and detection of microscopic haematuria by chemical reagent strips) to identify individuals for treatment with praziquantel at a dose of 40 mg/kg body weight. The evaluation of the indirect techniques indicated that both sensitivity and specificity of the chemical reagent strips to detect infection were greater than 90%. After three selective population chemotherapy surveys, the prevalence of gross haematuria was reduced by 94.2% (15.8% to 0.9%) and both gross and microscopic haematuria were reduced by 76.4% (54.1% to 12.8%) among school children. Community involvement and health education were stressed in this programme. The use of dispensary laboratories to maintain control of urinary schistosomiasis is now being evaluated.The use of reagent strips for detection of urinary schistosomiasis infection in the middle Awash Valley, Ethiopia.Reagent strip test was carried out to detect haematuria in urinary schistosomiasis infection in ten schools (1114 children) in the middle Awash Valley, Ethiopia. In five schools (557 children), were compared with results of urine filtration technique conducted simultaneously. The prevalence of infection by reagent sticks and urine filtration was 19.5% and 3.1%, respectively. Haematuria, detected by the reagent strip, was highly related with the results of urine filtration at the 2+ limit rather than the 1+ limit. However, the intensity of infection of all children was highly associated with prevalence rate at both haematuria limits. The possible use of reagent strips in Ethiopia to monitor morbidity (haematuria) due to S. haematobium infection is discussed.New approaches with different types of circulating cathodic antigen for the diagnosis of patients with low Schistosoma mansoni load.Schistosomiasis mansoni is a debilitating and sometimes fatal disease. Accurate diagnosis plays a key role in patient management and infection control. However, currently available parasitological methods are laborious and lack sensitivity. The selection of target antigen candidates has turned out to be a promising tool for the development of more sensitive diagnostic methods. In our previous investigations, the use of crude antigens led to false-positive results. Recently, focus has been given to highly purified Schistosoma mansoni antigens, especially to circulating antigens.Thus, our main goal was to test different types of circulating cathodic antigen glycoprotein (CCA), as "crude antigen," the protein chain of recombinant CCA and two individual peptides. These schistosome proteins/peptides were tested in a new diagnostic method employing immunomagnetic separation based on the improvement of antigen-antibody binding.Use of recombinant CCA as a diagnostic antigen allowed us to develop a diagnostic assay with high sensitivity and specificity with no false-negative results. Interestingly, the "crude antigen" worked as a good marker for control of cure after praziquantel treatment.Our new diagnostic method was superior to enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in diagnosing low endemicity patients.Day-to-day fluctuation of schistosome circulating antigen levels in serum and urine of humans infected with Schistosoma mansoni in Burundi.Day-to-day fluctuations of both circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in serum and urine were examined simultaneously in a group of Schistosoma mansoni-infected individuals from Burundi and compared with each other and with fecal egg count fluctuations. Significant correlations were found between fecal egg counts and circulating antigens (CAA and CCA) and between circulating antigen levels in serum and urine samples. The cumulative percentage of positive results after three samplings was highest for urine CCA detection, followed by fecal egg counts, serum CCA, serum CAA, and urine CAA detection, respectively. It was demonstrated that circulating antigen levels in both serum and urine showed less fluctuation than fecal egg counts, except for urine CAA levels. The serum CAA detection assay in particular, although less sensitive in this low endemic area in Burundi, gave very constant measurements over a period of one week. Our results indicate that detection of circulating antigens in a single serum or urine sample provides a quantitatively more stable diagnosis of S. mansoni infection than fecal egg counts based on a single stool examination.Quantitative determination of circulating antigens in human schistosomiasis mansoni using an indirect hemagglutination assay.In serum and urine specimens collected from a group of Schistosoma mansoni infected individuals from Makundju, Zaire, the schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) were quantitatively determined using an indirect hemagglutination reaction with sheep erythrocytes sensitized with mouse IgM monoclonal antibodies directed against these circulating antigens. Levels of CAA in serum (up to 5 ng/ml) and CCA in serum and urine (up to 50 ng/ml) were strongly correlated with egg excretion and with each other. No correlation was found between egg excretion and antibody levels against the circulating antigens. Antigen was detectable only in patients excreting greater than 500 eggs per gram of feces.Detection and quantification of circulating antigen in schistosomiasis by monoclonal antibody. II. The quantification of circulating antigens in human schistosomiasis mansoni and haematobium: relationship to intensity of infection and disease status.Circulating cathodic and circulating anodic antigens were quantified in sera of patients infected with S. mansoni, S. haematobium or both parasites. A monoclonal antibody and a polyclonal antiserum were applied in precipitation and solid phase immunosorbent techniques using radio- and enzyme-labelled antibody as a tracer to detect the cathodic and anodic antigen respectively. The results show that circulating cathodic antigen can frequently be detected in an immunoprecipitation or an immunoradiometric assay in serum of infected patients. The serum concentration of this antigen was found to be significantly correlated to the number of S. mansoni worms and to be higher in patients with the hepatosplenic form of the disease than in those without such complications. Examining paired serum samples before and after specific treatment the determination of this antigen by monoclonal antibody reliably indicated efficacy of chemotherapy in patients having received different forms of treatment.Hematuria and dysuria in the self-diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis among school-children in Northern Cameroon.The present study was designed to assess the value of self reported hematuria and dysuria in the diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis at the individual level. A sample of 964 school children of grade 5 and 6 from 15 schools of the French speaking educational system in the Sudano-sahelian zone of northern Cameroon were submitted to a questionnaire related to hematuria and dysuria, and provided a urine sample each. The urine samples were processed using the dip stick and sedimentation methods, and the degree of microhematuria and oviuria determined. In all 964 questionnaires were collected, 843 urine samples examined for microhematuria and 871 for oviuria. The percentage of children reporting hematuria increased with the degree of microhematuria and the intensity of infection. Among the various indicators of urinary schistosome infection, microhematuria had the highest sensitivity (76%), followed by self reported hematuria or dysuria (65%), and dysuria (52%). The specificity was highest for self reported hematuria, and lowest for self reported hematuria or dysuria. The efficiency of self reported hematuria or dysuria increased with the intensity of infection and was highest (100%) for heavy infections (> 400 eggs/ml g urine). We advocate the use of self reported hematuria or dysuria for the assessment of S. haematobium at the individual level.Urinary schistosomiasis among pregnant women in some endemic tropical semi - urban communities of Anambra State, Nigeria.Urinary schistosomiasis is caused by the deposition of eggs by adult flukes in the blood vessels surrounding the bladder of the infected host. Schistosomiasis is ranked the second most important parasitic disease of man and undoubtedly the most important of helminth origin. This paper reports the prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium infection among pregnant women in some endemic tropical semi - urban communities of Anambra State, Nigeria, screened using Medi-Test Combi 9 and urine centrifugation methods. Laboratory analysis of urine samples collected from 172 pregnant women indicated that 41 (23.8%) had urinary schistosomiasis with Anam community having the highest prevalence of 35.1% among other communities. The overall prevalence and intensity of infection among age groups showed that the youngest age group in the study, 16-20 years had the highest prevalence. Out of 24 women within this age group, 12 (50.0%) were infected among which 8 (33.3%) had light infection while 4 (16.6%) had moderate infection. The peak mean intensity of 7.6 eggs/10ml urine was observed in age group 16-20 years while the oldest age group, 41-45 years had the lowest mean intensity of 1.0 egg/10ml urine. Haematuria and proteinuria which are diagnostic for schistosomiasis were higher within age group 16-20 years in all the communities with Anam community having the highest prevalence of 50% for both biochemicals within age group 16-20 years. The findings from this study will be useful in developing specific programme for this special group of women.Circulating anodic antigen levels in serum before and after chemotherapy with praziquantel in schistosomiasis mansoni.The kinetics of serum levels of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) of Schistosoma mansoni were studied in patients with intestinal schistosomiasis before and after treatment with praziquantel. Day to day fluctuation in faecal egg excretion was compared with fluctuation in antigen level in 20 patients by serum and stool examination on 3 consecutive days before treatment. Antigen levels - calculated either as absorbance value of undiluted serum or as titre - showed less fluctuation than the number of eggs per gram of faeces determined by stool examinations based on single or duplicate 25 mg Kato smears. Compared with a placebo control group of 11 individuals, there was a significant reduction in CAA level in serum of 10 patients treated with praziquantel (40 mg/kg), 10 weeks after treatment. A similar decrease in serum CAA level was observed in a group of 46 patients treated with praziquantel, 6 weeks after treatment. In both groups, patients who remained seropositive after treatment still excreted eggs in their faeces. The kinetics of the antigen decrease were studied in more detail in 20 patients in hospital. Within 10 d after treatment with a double dose of 40 mg praziquantel per kg body weight, the antigen level fell to less than 10% of the original serum level, with a CAA half-life of approximately 2 d.Circulating anodic and cathodic antigen in serum and urine of mixed Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni infections in Office du Niger, Mali.In Office du Niger, an area endemic for both Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni in Mali, circulating anodic (CAA) and cathodic (CCA) antigen detection assays were performed on pretreatment serum and urine samples from two villages, Rigandé and Siguivoucé, and compared with egg counting methods. The highest prevalence was obtained with the urine-CCA assay which also had the highest sensitivity to S. haematobium, S. mansoni or mixed infection. A single urine-CCA assay was as sensitive as repeated egg counts (one stool+two urine examinations per individual). When the different assays were tested in parallel, several combinations including assays on serum were found to be highly sensitive. As urine sampling is widely accepted, urine assays will be used for further monitoring these villages one and two years after chemotherapy.Schistosoma mansoni Infections in young children: when are schistosome antigens in urine, eggs in stool and antibodies to eggs first detectable?in uganda, control of intestinal schistosomiasis with preventive chemotherapy is typically focused towards treatment of school-aged children; the needs of younger children are presently being investigated as in lakeshore communities very young children can be infected. In the context of future epidemiological monitoring, we sought to compare the detection thresholds of available diagnostic tools for Schistosoma mansoni and estimate a likely age of first infection for these children.a total of 242 infants and preschool children (134 boys and 108 girls, mean age 2.9 years, minimum 5 months and maximum 5 years) were examined from Bugoigo, a well-known disease endemic village on Lake Albert. Schistosome antigens in urine, eggs in stool and host antibodies to eggs were inspected to reveal a general prevalence of 47.5% (CI(95) 41.1-54.0%), as ascertained by a positive criterion from at least one diagnostic method. Although children as young as 6 months old could be found infected, the average age of infected children was between 3¼-3¾ years, when diagnostic techniques became broadly congruent.whilst different assays have particular (dis)advantages, direct detection of eggs in stool was least sensitive having a temporal lag behind antigen and antibody methods. Setting precisely a general age of first infection is problematic but if present Ugandan policies continue, a large proportion of infected children could wait up to 3-4 years before receiving first medication. To better tailor treatment needs for this younger ageclass, we suggest that the circulating cathodic antigen urine dipstick method to be used as an epidemiological indicator.Improved diagnostic performance of the circulating antigen assay in human schistosomiasis by parallel testing for circulating anodic and cathodic antigens in serum and urine.Serum and urine levels of two Schistosoma circulating antigens, the circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA), were determined by monoclonal antibody-based enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays in 56 Egyptian patients infected with S. mansoni and in 12 patients infected with both S. mansoni and S. haematobium. Both CAA and CCA could be specifically demonstrated in 82% and 88% of the serum samples and in 88% and 87% of the urine samples, respectively. While complete specificity was maintained, sensitivity was increased to a range of 91-98% by parallel use of the two circulating antigen assays, i.e., an individual with a positive titer for at least one of the assays was considered to be infected. A combination of CAA and CCA determinations in urine samples only resulted in a sensitivity of 94%. However, the highest sensitivity was achieved when the serum-CCA assay was combined with the urine-CCA assay (98%) or with the urine-CAA assay (97%). Sensitivity could not be increased further by combining more than two tests. A significant correlation was demonstrated between the level of circulating antigen and the number of parasite eggs in feces in each of the four assays. In addition, the levels of CAA and CCA in serum and urine were significantly correlated with each other. Our results indicate that diagnosis of schistosome infections by detection of circulating antigens can be significantly improved by parallel testing for multiple antigens.Daily fluctuation of levels of circulating cathodic antigen in urine of children infected with Schistosoma mansoni in Brazil.The fluctuation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) levels in urine was studied in 69 Brazilian school-children infected with Schistosoma mansoni and compared to egg counts. Faeces and urine samples were simultaneously collected at 7 times during a period of 2 weeks. CCA was determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay and could be detected in 96% of the urine samples; the individual mean CCA level ranged from 609 to 350,700 pg/mL. 90% of the faecal samples contained S. mansoni eggs and the individual mean egg output ranged from 9 to 5510 eggs/g. The Spearman rank correlation coefficient between these individual means was 0.69. Kendall's coefficient of concordance (W) was 0.88 for CCA levels and 0.80 for egg counts.Detection of the schistosome circulating cathodic antigen by enzyme immunoassay using biotinylated monoclonal antibodies.We have developed an enzyme immunoassay (ELISA) for the quantification of the schistosome circulating cathodic antigen (CCA), a glycoprotein associated with the syncitium lining the gut of the parasite. A mouse monoclonal antibody of IgG3 isotype was used as coating (antigen-capture) antibody, while a biotinylated mouse monoclonal IgM was used as second (antigen-detecting) antibody. Streptavidin-alkaline phosphatase was used as enzyme label. The lower detection limit of the assay was 1.0 ng of the trichloroacetic acid soluble fraction of adult worm antigen (AWA-TCA) per ml, which corresponds to approximately 0.2 ng CCA per ml. The ELISA showed a linear range from 1.0 to 62.5 ng AWA-TCA per ml. Serum and urine samples of 16 individuals infected with Schistosoma mansoni (egg counts ranging from 5 to 4820 eggs per gram of faeces) were tested in the assay. Antigen titres ranged from less than 4-8192. This assay represents a considerable advantage in diagnosis of Schistosoma infections as it allows the detection and quantification of CCA in serum and urine in even lightly infected individuals.Magnetic bead antigen capture enzyme-linked immunoassay in microtitre trays for rapid detection of schistosomal circulating anodic antigen.We have developed a new magnetic bead antigen capture enzyme-linked immunoassay for the detection of schistosomal circulating anodic antigen. The assay utilizes IgG1 monoclonal antibody coated monodisperse magnetic beads in microtitre trays fitted to a special magnet. The total test time was found to be 1-2 h, using 0.05 mg beads per well. The lower detection level was 0.7 ng AWA-TCA per ml (approximately 0.07 ng CAA per ml). Validation by sera from uninfected and Schistosoma mansoni infected Africans and Norwegians resulted in an assay specificity of 100% and sensitivity was close to 90% for cases excreting more than 100 eggs per gram faeces. At such clinically relevant levels the inter-assay CV was below 10% and photometric absorbance correlated to antigen levels was nearly linear. There was a significant correlation between the magnetic bead EIA absorbance values and the titres obtained using the previously established ELISA. The new bead assay, however, was easier and less laborious because TCA pretreatment and the titration of positive results were unnecessary.Levels of circulating soluble egg antigen in urine of individuals infected with Schistosoma mansoni before and after treatment with praziquantel.We used a recently developed sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay to determine the kinetics of Schistosoma mansoni circulating soluble egg antigen (CSEA) after chemotherapy and compared these with previously determined levels of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). Urine samples were collected from 35 Egyptian patients with S. mansoni infection before, and one, 3 and 6 weeks after treatment. Thirteen patients were treated with 60 mg praziquantel/kg body weight and 22 patients with 40 mg/kg. Following chemotherapy, the kinetics of CSEA in urine appeared to be clearly different from those of the worm-derived antigen CCA, levels of which decreased markedly within one week after chemotherapy; CSEA levels decreased at a much lower rate. Six weeks after successful chemotherapy, CSEA could still be detected in urine of 7 cases while CCA had already disappeared and no viable egg was found by faecal examination. There was no significant difference between the 2 dose regimens during follow-up in the percentage remaining positive or in the CSEA level. These results suggest that the egg antigens detected are primarily derived from viable eggs in the tissues and might be used as a marker for morbidity.Detection of antibodies against circulating cathodic antigen of Schistosoma mansoni using the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.The applicability of a Schistosoma mansoni polysaccharide antigen, circulating cathodic antigen (CCA), for the detection of antibodies in S. mansoni infection was tested in the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). Antibodies against this secretory antigen were detected in hamster infections after three weeks, while in infected humans anti-CCA antibodies could be demonstrated eight weeks after infection. Antibodies could be demonstrated both in recent and chronic infections in man, but more false-negative results were observed in chronic infections. The antibody response was composed of both IgM and IgG antibodies.Proteinuria, hematuria, and leukocyturia in children with mixed urinary and intestinal schistosomiasis.Quantitative parasitological assessment and quantitative analysis of proteinuria, hematuria, and leukocyturia were carried out in 182 Sudanese schoolboys with mixed urinary and intestinal schistosomiasis. Pathological proteinuria was found in 73% of patients (median = 380, 95% confidence limits = 200 to 500 mg/liter). The median protein/creatinine ratio was 0.54. SDS polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis showed an excretion of albumin, transferrin, and IgG consistent with a postrenal pattern of proteinuria. Pathological erythrocyturia occurred in 84% of patients (median = 255, 95% CL = 95 to 629 cells/microliter) and leukocyturia in 77% of patients (median = 148, 95% CL = 93 to 246 cells/microliter). Phase contrast microscopy revealed intact erythrocytes, suggestive of postrenal hemorrhage. Proteinuria, erythrocyturia, and leukocyturia correlated significantly with the ova excretion in the urine, but not with egg excretion in the stool. Oxamniquine reduced ova excretion in the stool but did not influence pathological urine findings. In patients treated effectively with Praziquantel or Metrifonate, pathological PU, EU, and LU decreased markedly 1 month post treatment. PU in severely proteinuric patients reached physiological values 5 months post therapy. We suggest that the proteinuria, erythrocyturia, and leukocyturia in mixed schistosomiasis were of postrenal origin.Relationship between circulating antigen level and morbidity in Schistosoma mansoni-infected children evaluated by ultrasonography.Ninety-eight Schistosoma mansoni-infected children from an endemic area in Sharkia Governorate, Egypt were evaluated by abdominal ultrasonography to determine liver and spleen sizes, grade of periportal fibrosis, and splenic vein diameter. Circulating antigen levels were measured using a double sandwich ELISA in which the sensitivity was 91.8% and specificity was > 99%, with no evidence of cross-reactivity with other parasites. No significant relationship was observed between antigen level and clinical stages of the disease as assessed by physical examination (P > 0.05). When ultrasound was used to stage disease, the mean antigen level was significantly higher among hepatosplenic cases than intestinal cases (P < 0.05). No difference in mean antigen levels were found between the splenic and hepatic cases. Furthermore, a direct correlation (P < 0.01) was observed between antigen level and disease severity as monitored by ultrasonography. Antigen level showed a positive correlation with the degree of periportal fibrosis (P < 0.05). Moreover, a significant increase in the percent of children who were antigen positive (> 80 ng/ml) was found in those with more severe periportal fibrosis (P < 0.001). The findings suggest that ultrasonography along with measurement of circulating antigen levels predict morbidity in schistosomiasis mansoni.Detection of urinary schistosomiasis in a low prevalence region.A simple technique to pretreat urine and serum samples for quantitation of schistosome circulating anodic and cathodic antigen.For the detection of the circulating schistosome antigens CAA (circulating anodic antigen) and CCA (circulating cathodic antigen) in serum and urine samples of Schistosoma infected individuals, pretreatment of samples with trichloroacetic acid (TCA) is a standard procedure. In the present study several methods were evaluated in order to develop a more simple and rapid technique than the--especially for pretreatment of urine samples--laborious TCA technique. Optimal results were obtained with a method in which serum or urine samples were pretreated by a heat-incubation step (70 degrees C, 30 min) in an alkaline buffer (pH 9.6). In a comparison of the new technique with the TCA pretreatment, serum and urine samples of S. mansoni infected individuals from Zaire (n = 80) and of uninfected controls from The Netherlands (n = 208) were pretreated and assayed for CAA and CCA. Both pretreatment techniques showed similar sensitivities and specificities for CAA and CCA in serum, and CCA in urine. However, for the determination of CAA in urine the new technique performed significantly better, resulting in an increase of the sensitivity from 32 to 70% (titre determination).Urinary schistosomiasis in Zimbabwean school children: predictors of morbidity.The morbid effects of urinary bilharziasis are becoming more evident with the advent of sophisticated diagnostics such as ultrasound. However, such diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium morbidity is often hampered by lack of funds, proper equipment, or training.We performed a cross-sectional investigation of schoolchildren in a highly endemic area of east central Zimbabwe in order to assess the utility of a number of simple clinical indicators to predict Schistosoma haematobium morbidity.Prevalence and intensity of S. haematobium infection was determined in 551 schoolchildren, with ultrasound examination of the kidneys and bladder performed on 222. The association of a number of demographic, parasitological, and clinical parameters with clinical outcome was evaluated.Overall, 60% of the children were infected with S. haematobium . Although lacking specificity, proteinuria and parasite eggs count best predicted bladder pathology. Presence of kidney dilation was associated with fatigue and pain upon urination, but these variables were not very sensitive.None of the variables assessed were ideal predictors of morbidity. However, the results suggest that a combination of inexpensive, simple indicators may allow for improved targeting of S. haematobium treatment to those with severe morbidity and better monitoring of the progress of control campaigns when more expensive diagnostic methods are not available.Evaluation of reagent strips in urine tests for detection of Schistosoma haematobium infection: a comparative study in Ghana and Zambia.The presence of haematuria and proteinuria, detected by reagent strips, was compared with Schistosoma haematobium egg counts in the urines of human subjects from two epidemiologically distinct areas in Ghana and Zambia. In children and adults in both areas, the individual or combined semiquantitative levels of proteinuria and haematuria were related directly to increasing urinary egg counts. In both areas the presence of blood in the urine was highly specific (greater than 85%) and sensitive, being positive in 97% of urine specimens with more than 64 eggs per 5-ml sample of urine. The sensitivity of the protein indicator was also high, but its specificity was less than the blood indicator. The specificity of combined proteinuria and haematuria was higher than either alone; on the other hand, the sensitivity was lower than either alone. At each level of proteinuria and haematuria, the geometric mean urinary egg count was higher in Ghana than in Zambia. This study confirms the necessity to evaluate indirect diagnostic techniques in each endemic country, in order to establish criteria for their interpretation, before wide-scale use.Relation between intensity of Schistosoma haematobium infection and clinical haematuria and proteinuria.In an endemic area on Lake Volta, Ghana, urinary blood and protein levels as determined by chemical reagent strips in persons infected with Schistosoma haematobium, particularly in children aged between 5 and 14, correlated positively with urinary egg counts. Geometric mean S haematobium egg counts were 10 or more times higher in urine specimens with at least 10 mg/dl of protein and detectable haematuria than in those without detectable blood or protein. Chemical reagent strips were both specific and sensitive for detection of urinary blood associated with S haematobium infection. This simple technique could be useful for screening entire populations in which urinary schistosomiasis is endemic so that heavily infected persons needing specific treatment can be identified.Circulating antigens for assessing cure in schistosomiasis mansoni.An antigen capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay using antibodies made in rabbits and sheep to adult Schistosoma mansoni extract antigens has been developed and evaluated as a diagnostic test for schistosomiasis. 25 of 42 patients with S. mansoni infections had detectable circulating antigen while sera from all of 45 normal subjects and patients with other parasitic infections did not react. When the 25 with antigenaemia were retested 3 months after treatment, all 21 who were cured were negative while the 4 with persisting S. mansoni eggs in their stools remained positive. Antibodies to a fractionated egg antigen (CEF6) also diminished in most patients following successful treatment, but the reduction was insufficient to predict successful therapy.Relating serum circulating anodic antigens to faecal egg counts in Schistosoma mansoni infections: a modelling approach.Circulating anodic antigen (CAA) levels in serum and faecal egg counts are both quantitative measures of Schistosoma mansoni worm burdens. In this study, we have tested whether circulating anodic antigens can be included into an established egg count model. A data set with 3 repeated faecal egg count and serum CAA measurements of 50 individuals from a community in Burundi with moderate endemicity was used. By means of Monte Carlo simulation, both antigens and egg counts were related to an underlying worm pair distribution, taking into account the variation in repeated measurements (within individuals) and the variation in worm burdens (between individuals). Models with various assumptions (e.g. presence or absence of density-dependent egg production) were tested. Whereas observed and predicted egg counts agreed fairly well, the circulating antigen data could not be described satisfactorily. In particular, the predicted number of negative antigen concentrations was much lower than observed, while the number of light positives was overestimated. There seems to be a mechanism that causes a shift of expected (low) positive CAA concentrations towards zeros, which the proposed models do not provide for. Possible biological as well as assay-related mechanisms that may account for this shift are discussed. The assumption that serum CAA concentrations are a simple direct reflection of worm (pair) burdens could not be corroborated by this modelling exercise. Apparently, the relationship between (measured) CAA concentrations, egg counts and worm burdens in human S. mansoni infections is more complex than assumed.Diagnostic performance of Schistosoma real-time PCR in urine samples from Kenyan children infected with Schistosoma haematobium: day-to-day variation and follow-up after praziquantel treatment.In an effort to enhance accuracy of diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium, this study explores day-to-day variability and diagnostic performance of real-time PCR for detection and quantification of Schistosoma DNA compared to other diagnostic tools in an endemic area before and after treatment.Previously collected urine samples (N = 390) from 114 preselected proven parasitological and/or clinical S. haematobium positive Kenyan schoolchildren were analyzed by a Schistosoma internal transcribed spacer-based real-time PCR after 14 years of storage. Pre-treatment day-to-day fluctuations of PCR and microscopy over three consecutive days were measured for 24 children using intra-class correlation coefficient. A combined 'gold standard' (PCR and/or microscopy positive) was used to measure sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV) of several diagnostic tools at baseline, two and 18 months post-treatment with praziquantel.All 24 repeatedly tested children were PCR-positive over three days with little daily variation in median Ct-values, while 83.3% were found to be egg-positive for S. haematobium at day 1 and 75.0% at day 2 and 3 pre-treatment, signifying daily fluctuations in microscopy diagnosis. Of all 114 preselected schoolchildren, repeated microscopic measurements were required to detect 96.5% versus 100% of positive pre-treatment cases by single PCR. At two months post-treatment, microscopy and PCR detected 22.8% versus 69.3% positive children, respectively. Based on the 'gold standard', PCR showed high sensitivity (>92%) as compared to >31% sensitivity for microscopy, both pre- and post-treatment.Detection and quantification of Schistosoma DNA in urine by real-time PCR was shown to be a powerful and specific diagnostic tool for detection of S. haematobium infections, with less day-to-day variation and higher sensitivity compared to microscopy. The superior performance of PCR before, and two and 18 months post-treatment provides a compelling argument for PCR as an accurate and reproducible tool for monitoring treatment efficacy.The urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) dipstick: a valid substitute for microscopy for mapping and point-of-care diagnosis of intestinal schistosomiasis.The World Health Organization now recommends the provision of praziquantel treatment to preschool-aged children infected with schistosomiasis. For intestinal schistosomiasis the current operational field diagnostic standard is examination of a thick Kato-Katz smear by microscopy prepared from a single stool specimen, and although pragmatic, this methodology has well-known shortcomings. Here, as a potential alternative, the performance of the urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) dipstick test was assessed in terms of disease-mapping and point-of-care diagnosis for intestinal schistosomiasis in preschool-aged children. Our manuscript reports on findings at baseline and at the end of a one-year longitudinal treatment study.A total of 925 children (mean age 2.8 years) were initially recruited from six lakeshore villages representative of high, moderate and low levels of disease transmission. At baseline, all children were tested for intestinal schistosomiasis by microscopic examination of duplicate Kato-Katz smears prepared from a single stool faecal, by antigen detection with the urine CCA dipstick test and by serology with a commercially available ELISA test (as 'gold-standard') that measures host antibody titres to soluble egg antigens. As a point-of-care diagnosis, the urine CCA dipstick test achieved sensitivity and specificity values ranging from 52.5-63.2% and 57.7-75.6%, respectively, with faecal microscopy achieving very high specificities (>87%) but sensitivities as low as 16.7% in the low transmission setting.The urine CCA test was shown to be more effective than faecal microscopy especially in lower transmission settings. The diagnostic performance of this test was not significantly impacted by treatment history or co-infections with other intestinal helminths.Diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni without the stool: comparison of three diagnostic tests to detect Schistosoma [corrected] mansoni infection from filtered urine in Zambia.Diagnosis for intestinal Schistosoma mansoni lacks sensitivity and is arduous to conduct. The standard diagnostic tests, Kato-Katz (KK) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) both lack sensitivity and with KK, require obtaining, transporting, and examining fresh stool. We compared diagnostic efficacy of KK, CCA, and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) to detect S. mansoni infection (species-specific DNA) from 89 filtered urine samples collected in Zambia. The PCR was the strongest indicator of positive cases with sensitivity and specificity of 100% in comparison to CCA (67% and 60%) and KK (50% and 100%). High positive and negative predictive values (100%) were also indicative of robustness of PCR. The same pattern was observed when stratified for sex and age group-specific analysis. Diagnosis of S. mansoni from filtered urine samples by PCR is an effective means to detect low intensity infection and would enhance the effectiveness of surveillance and control programs of schistosomiasis.Diagnosis of schistosomiasis by reagent strip test for detection of circulating cathodic antigen.A newly developed reagent strip assay for the diagnosis of schistosomiasis based on parasite antigen detection in urine of infected individuals was evaluated. The test uses the principle of lateral flow through a nitrocellulose strip of the sample mixed with a colloidal carbon conjugate of a monoclonal antibody specific for Schistosoma circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). The strip assay to diagnose a group of highly infected schoolchildren in Mwanza, Tanzania, demonstrated a high sensitivity and association with the intensity of infection as measured both by egg counts, and by circulating anodic antigen and CCA levels determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. A specificity of ca. 90% was shown in a group of schistosome-negative schoolchildren from Tarime, Tanzania, an area where schistosomiasis is not endemic. The test is easy to perform and requires no technical equipment or special training. The stability of the strips and the conjugate in the dry format lasts for at least 3 months at ambient temperature in sealed packages, making it suitable for transport and use in areas where schistosomiasis is endemic. This assay can easily be developed to an end-user format.Application of a circulating-cathodic-antigen (CCA) strip test and real-time PCR, in comparison with microscopy, for the detection of Schistosoma haematobium in urine samples from Ghana.In the detection of parasitic infection, the traditional methods based on microscopy often have low sensitivity and/or specificity compared with the newer, molecular tests. An assay based on real-time PCR and a reagent strip test for detecting circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) have both now been compared with urine filtration and microscopy, in the detection of Schistosoma haematobium infections. Urine samples, obtained from 74 'cases' in areas of Ghana with endemic S. haematobium and 79 'controls' from non-endemic areas, were each checked using the three methods. With the results of the filtration and microscopy taken as the 'gold standard', real-time PCR was found to be 100% specific and 89% sensitive whereas the CCA strips were 91% specific and 41% sensitive. With the samples found to contain > or =50 eggs/10 ml (indicating relatively intense infections), the sensitivities of the PCR and CCA were higher, at 100% and 62%, respectively. As expected, egg counts were negatively correlated with the number of amplification cycles needed, in the PCR, to give a signal that exceeded the background (r=-0.38; P<0.01). Although the real-time PCR and CCA strip tests are very different, both show promise in the detection of S. haematobium infections. The PCR has optimal specificity and high sensitivity but the specificity of the CCA strips and the sensitivity of both tools could still be improved. A more thorough re-evaluation of the sensitivity and specificity of microscopy and these newer diagnostic methods, with an estimation of the cost-effectiveness of each technique, is recommended.Circulating antigens levels in different clinical forms of the Schistosoma mansoni infection.With the aim to evaluate the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) levels in relation to the different clinical phases of Schistosoma sp. infection a sandwich ELISA using monoclonal antibody 5H11 was performed. The sera of three groups of 25 Brazilian patients with acute, intestinal and hepatosplenic forms of S. mansoni infection were tested and compared to a non-infected control group. Patients and control groups were matched for age and sex and the number of eggs per gram of feces was equally distributed among the three patient groups. Sensitivity of 100%, 72%, 52% of the assay was observed for the intestinal, hepatosplenic and acute toxemic groups respectively. The specificity was 100%. Intestinal and hepatosplenic groups presented CCA levels significantly higher in comparison to those observed for acute patients (F-ratio = 2,524; p = 0.000 and F-ratio = 6,314; p = 0.015 respectively). There was no significant difference of CCA serum levels between hepatosplenic and intestinal groups (F-ratio = 1,026; p = 0.316).Urine test strips: reliability of semi-quantitative findings under tropical conditions.Semi-quantitative urinalysis with urine reagent strips (URS) for erythrocyturia (EU), leucocyturia (LU) and proteinuria (PU) was performed in Congolese and Sudanese school children with Schistosoma haematobium and/or S. mansoni infection. Quantitative urinalysis was performed on the same specimen using microscopy and a Neubauer counting chamber for EU and LU and the Coomassie blue dye-binding assay for PU. Microscopically detectable EU of more than 10 cells/microliters was found in 63% of all samples and LU of more than 20 cells/microliters was found in 60% of all samples. With the Coomassie blue method, PU of more than 150 mg/l was detected in 51% of all samples. URS gave positive results of grade 1-3 for EU in 69% of all samples, for LU in 63% of all samples and for PU in 66% of all samples. The sensitivity and specificity of URS compared with standard reference methods were as follow: EU 95% and 75%, LU 81% and 81% and PU 90% and 56%. When the results of all three test were combined, URS differentiated abnormal from normal urine specimens with a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 70%. Median quantitative results showed a good correlation with semiquantitative URS readings for all parameters, but there was a wide range of URS scores. We concluded that URS sensitivity detect urinary abnormalities and thus may be used as a general screening method under field conditions when more specific methods cannot be performed.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Diagnostic accuracy of urine filtration and dipstick tests for Schistosoma haematobium infection in a lightly infected population of Ghanaian schoolchildren.Two screening methods, reagent dipsticks for hematuria and urine filtration for Schistosoma haematobium eggs, were evaluated for their sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing infection with S. haematobium in lightly infected Ghanaian children. Schoolchildren aged 8-18 years (n=255) provided urine samples on three occasions. Overall, 36.4% of girls and 50.7% of boys presented with eggs at least once; 3.3% of girls and 7.5% of boys presented with both eggs and hematuria three times. Many children presented with eggs but without hematuria, or with hematuria but without eggs. When each child was screened three times, the sensitivity of each test method improved by at least 22.9% as compared with single screening, but previously unidentified infections were detected at the third screening, indicating that even three screenings is insufficient. Nearly half of lightly infected children (<50 eggs/10 ml urine, by maximum egg count) were egg-positive during only one of three screenings. Thus, data presented here indicate that when individuals are screened repeatedly, infection status can be assessed more accurately, control programs can be properly evaluated, and population estimates of S. haematobium infection may be made with increased confidence, as compared with single screening.Efficacy and safety of praziquantel in preschool-aged children in an area co-endemic for Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium.In sub-Saharan Africa the recommended strategy to control schistosomiasis is preventive chemotherapy. Emphasis is placed on school-aged children, but in high endemicity areas, preschool-aged children are also at risk, and hence might need treatment with praziquantel. Since a pediatric formulation (e.g., syrup) is not available outside of Egypt, crushed praziquantel tablets are used, but the efficacy and safety of this treatment regimen is insufficiently studied.We assessed the efficacy and safety of crushed praziquantel tablets among preschool-aged children (<6 years) in the Azaguié district, south Côte d'Ivoire, where Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium coexist. Using a cross-sectional design, children provided two stool and two urine samples before and 3 weeks after treatment. Crushed praziquantel tablets, mixed with water, were administered at a dose of 40 mg/kg. Adverse events were assessed and graded 4 and 24 hours posttreatment by interviewing mothers/guardians.Overall, 160 preschool-aged children had at least one stool and one urine sample examined with duplicate Kato-Katz thick smears and a point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen (POC-CCA) cassette for S. mansoni, and urine filtration for S. haematobium diagnosis before and 3 weeks after praziquantel administration. According to the Kato-Katz and urine filtration results, we found high efficacy against S. mansoni (cure rate (CR), 88.6%; egg reduction rate (ERR), 96.7%) and S. haematobium (CR, 88.9%; ERR, 98.0%). POC-CCA revealed considerably lower efficacy against S. mansoni (CR, 53.8%). Treatment was generally well tolerated, but moderately severe adverse events (i.e., body and face inflammation), were observed in four Schistosoma egg-negative children.Crushed praziquantel administered to preschool-aged children at a dose of 40 mg/kg is efficacious against S. mansoni and S. haematobium in a co-endemic setting of Côte d'Ivoire. Further research is required with highly sensitive diagnostic tools and safety must be investigated in more depth.Controlled-Trials.com ISRCTN53172722.Sensitivities and specificities of diagnostic tests and infection prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium estimated from data on adults in villages northwest of Accra, Ghana.Substantial uncertainties surround the sensitivities and specificities of diagnostic techniques for urinary schistosomiasis. We used latent class (LC) modeling to address this problem. In this study, 220 adults in three villages northwest of Accra, Ghana were examined using five Schistosoma haematobium diagnostic measures: microscopic examination of urine for detection of S. haematobium eggs, dipsticks for detection of hematuria, tests for circulating antigens, antibody tests, and ultrasound scans of the urinary system. Testing of the LC model indicated non-invariance of the performance of the diagnostic tests across different age groups, and measurement invariance held for males and females and for the three villages. We therefore recommend the use of LC models for comparison between and the identification of the most accurate schistosomiasis diagnostic tests. Furthermore, microscopy and hematuria dipsticks were indicated through these models as the most appropriate techniques for detection of S. haematobium infection.Circulating anodic and cathodic antigen in serum and urine from Schistosoma haematobium-infected Cameroonian children receiving praziquantel: a longitudinal study.A cohort of 148 Cameroonian children infected with Schistosoma haematobium was followed before praziquantel therapy and 1, 2, 3, 5, and 12 months thereafter. Egg output, the reagent strip index (RSI, a pathological marker), and circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in serum and urine were quantified. At enrollment, the median level of egg output was 365/10 mL of urine; 97% of children had a positive RSI; CAA was detected in serum from 76% of children and in urine from 64%; and CCA was detected in serum from 55% of children and in urine from 87%. Two months after chemotherapy, egg output and RSI had decreased significantly; reinfection later developed in parallel with increases in the serum and urine concentrations of CAA and the urine concentrations of CCA. The measurement of CAA and CCA is useful for diagnosis, evaluation of disease severity, and follow-up of chemotherapy in individuals infected with S. haematobium.Urine circulating soluble egg antigen in relation to egg counts, hematuria, and urinary tract pathology before and after treatment in children infected with Schistosoma haematobium in Kenya.A cohort of 117 school children infected with Schistosoma haematobium was followed-up after therapy with praziquantel (0, 2, 4, 6, 12, and 18 months) and various infection and morbidity parameters (egg counts, hematuria, soluble egg antigen [SEA] in urine, and ultrasonography-detectable pathology) were quantified. At the onset of the study, 97% of the children were positive for S. haematobium with a geometric mean egg count of 45.7 eggs/10 ml of urine. Eighty-one percent of the children were positive for SEA in urine with a geometric mean SEA concentration of 218.8 ng/ml of urine. Ninety-two percent and 56% of the children were microhematuria positive and macrohematuria positive, respectively. Two months after treatment, all infection and morbidity indicators had significantly decreased. Reinfection after treatment as determined by detection of eggs in urine was observed by four months post-treatment while the other parameters remained low. The clearance of SEA was slower than that of egg counts while pathology resolved at an even slower pace. Levels of SEA and egg output showed similar correlations with ultrasound detectable pathology; these correlations were better than the correlation between hematuria and pathology.Detection of circulating anodic antigen by ELISA for seroepidemiology of schistosomiasis mansoni.Sera of individuals from Burundi excreting eggs of Schistosoma mansoni (prevalence 35%; 178 subjects) and of similar individuals from Maniema, Zaire (prevalence 95%; 99 subjects), and of 159 Dutch and 81 Zairean non-infected controls, were screened by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for the presence of schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA). No false positive results were obtained. The sensitivity of the test was 75% in Burundi and 93% in Zaire, a significant difference (P less than 0.05). However, in matched egg output classes the test results did not differ significantly; 60% and 67%, respectively, of those excreting 1-100 eggs per gram of faeces (epg), 86% and 100% of those excreting 101-400 epg, and 100% of those excreting over 400 epg were detected. The efficiency of the assay was 91% in Burundi and 93% in Zaire. The Spearman rank coefficient of correlation between antigen titre and egg output (determined by 3 consecutive Kato egg counts) was 0.61 in Burundi and 0.82 in Zaire. The sensitivity of the test compared well with a single egg count. In addition, preliminary data showed that occasionally CAA was detectable in serum of individuals not excreting schistosome eggs. As CAA is found only in the presence of living worms, such cases reflect active infections.Evaluation of an ELISA for combined measurement of CAA and CCA in schistosomiasis mansoni.An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was developed for combined measurement of schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). Monoclonal antibodies against CAA and CCA were used as coating and as fluorescein-labeled detecting antibodies in a FITC-anti-FITC system. The lower detection limit of the assay was 1.1 ng antigen (AWA-TCA)/ml. Serum samples of Schistosoma mansoni infected individuals from Zaire (n = 60) and Burundi (n = 60) were tested in this assay and in single-antigen ELISAs. Sensitivities of assaying for CAA, CCA, combined CAA + CCA, and of parallel testing for CAA and for CCA were calculated from titres and antigen concentrations. With serum samples from the heavily infected individuals (Zaire), all assays had a sensitivity of 97% or higher. In contrast, with serum samples from individuals from Burundi (low to moderate infections) it was shown that combined testing resulted in a slightly lower sensitivity than testing for individual antigens. By parallel testing for CAA and CCA, the sensitivity could be increased considerably (to 95%), however.Bacteriuria and hematuria in infections due to Schistosoma haematobium.Urinary schistosomiasis: influence of the circadian variation of hematuria and proteinuria on reagent stick testing.The impact of a school health programme on the prevalence and morbidity of urinary schistosomiasis in Mwera Division, Pangani District, Tanzania.The prevalence of urinary schistosomiasis among schoolchildren in Pangani District (Tanzania) was assessed rapidly by a questionnaire approach. Based on the results, a strategy of selective treatment with praziquantel was adopted. Eleven primary schools in Mwera Division, Pangani District, with about 2500 schoolchildren were included in a control programme for urinary schistosomiasis. Macro- and microscopic haematuria diagnosed visually and with urine reagent strips was used as an indirect indicator of Schistosoma haematobium infection. Intensity of infection among children was monitored in class 5 (median age 14 years, range 11-17) by urine filtration techniques. Treatment was administered as 40 mg/kg praziquantel in a single dose at the beginning of the school year. The programme was implemented by schoolteachers and coordinated by the District Health Management Team in collaboration with the District Education Office. Teachers were responsible for carrying out all programme activities. Community participation was through collaboration with Teachers-Parents Associations and Village Health Committees. Coverage at yearly (1995-99) examination varied from 67.7% to 80.3%. Prevalence of haematuria decreased from 51.2% (range 22.2-89.5%) at baseline to 23.4% (range 5.8-56.7%) in 1999, a reduction of 54.3%. Macrohaematuria was 21.2% at baseline and 7.2% in 1999, a reduction of 66.0%. Prevalence of infection in class 5 was reduced by 71.4% and geometric mean intensity of positives reduced from 71 eggs/10 mL (95% confidence interval [CI] 52.5-97.7) to 28 eggs/10 mL (95% CI 25.7-55.0), a reduction of 60.6%. Teachers were highly committed, and secured community participation and a smooth implementation of the programme. The community accepted the introduction of a cost-recovery system, whereby parents pay for the treatment of children with episodes of visible haematuria during the school year. Communities also participated in the improvement of sanitary installations at the schools.Urinary schistosomiasis among school children in an endemic community in south-eastern Nigeria.Studies were carried out on urinary schistosomiasis among school children aged 6 to 21 in Abia State, Nigeria. Of the total 1,165 children examined for eggs of S. haematobium in their urine, 245 (21.03%) were infected. Male children had significantly (P < 0.05) higher infection (64.08%) than their female counterparts (35.92%). Age-related infection rate showed significant difference (P < 0.05) with the highest infection rate (46.94%) recorded among children between the ages of 12 and 14 years. As with infection rate, the intensity of infection was significantly higher (P < 0.05) in males (35.50 eggs/10 ml urine) then in females (28.73 eggs/10 ml urine). 4 (1.63%) of the infected individuals had heavy infection (400 eggs/10 ml urine). There was a gradual increase of mean egg count with age up to 12-14 years after which there was a decrease. Viability test showed that of the 245 children infected 151 (61.63%) had viable eggs in their urine sample. The number of males with viable eggs (62.25%) was significantly higher (P < 0.05) than the females (37.74%). Also in the number of infected individuals with viable eggs a significant difference among age groups was observed. It was significantly higher (P < 0.05) among the age group 12-14 years than in any other group. Among the infected children 38 (15.51%) had haematuria (which represents 95% of the 41 individuals with trace of blood in their urine). There was a significant association (P < 0.05) between haematuria and infection rate/intensity.Performance of microhaematuria and proteinuria as measured by urine reagent strips in estimating intensity and prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium infection in Nigeria.To assess if microhaematuria and proteinuria as measured by reagent strips could estimate intensity of Schistosoma haematobium (S. haematobium) infection in endemic areas and evaluate their screening performance among children in Benue State, Nigeria.A total of 1,124 urine samples were collected, screened for microhaematuria and proteinuria using reagent strips (Combi 9) and results were compared to filtration technique, the gold standard method.A significant correlation was observed between microhaematuria (rho= 0.66, P<0.01), proteinuria (rho = 0.71, P<0.01) and intensity of S. haematobium eggs. Proteinuria had sensitivity of 95.7% and specificity of 67.2%, while microhaematuria had sensitivity of 64.8% and specificity of 89.6%. The proportion of false positive diagnoses was higher in proteinuria (19.2%) than microhaematuria (6.0%).The findings suggest that use of urine reagent strips could potentially estimate intensity of S. haematobium infection and their performance to screen urinary schistosomiasis agreed with previous observations.Day-to-day fluctuation of point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen test scores and faecal egg counts in children infected with Schistosoma mansoni in Ethiopia.Determining the variation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine and egg counts variation in stool between days in Schistosoma mansoni (S. mansoni) infected individuals is vital to decide whether or not to rely on a single-sample test for diagnosis of Schistosomiasis. In this study, the magnitude of day-to-day variation in urine-CCA test scores and in faecal egg counts was evaluated in school children in Ethiopia.A total of 620 school children (age 8 to 12 years) were examined for S. mansoni infection using double Kato-Katz and single urine-CCA cassette methods (batch 32727) on three consecutive days.The prevalence of S. mansoni infection was 81.1% based on triple urine-CCA-cassette test and 53.1% based on six Kato-Katz thick smears. Among the study participants, 26.3% showed fluctuation in urine CCA and 32.4% showed fluctuation in egg output. Mean egg count as well as number of cases in each class of intensity and intensity of cassette band color varied over the three days of examination. Over 85% of the children that showed day-to-day variations in status of S. mansoni infection from negative to positive or vice versa by the Kato-Katz and the CCA methods had light intensity of infection. The fluctuation in both the CCA test scores and faecal egg count was not associated with age and sex.The current study showed day-to-day variation in CCA and Kato-Katz test results of children infected with S. mansoni. This indicates the necessity of more than one urine or stool samples to be collected on different days for more reliable diagnosis of S. mansoni infection in low endemic areas.Simultaneous use of a sensitive filtration technique and reagent strips in urinary schistosomiasis.A sensitive filtration technique and polyvalent urine analysis reagent strips were used simultaneously in patients with urinary schistosomiasis in order to detect pathological conditions other than haematuria and proteinuria. A significant correlation was found between haematuria, proteinuria, leucocyturia and intensity of infection as measured by egg excretion in urine. The best correlation between the reagent strip findings and intensity of infection was obtained when the three parameters were combined. After treatment with metrifonate the reduction of egg excretion was paralleled by the normalization of the reagent strip findings. Analysis of day-to-day variation demonstrated a similar low variation of the filtration technique and the reagent strip findings. Specificity of urine analysis of reagent strips was tested in two age-matched control groups. Although the study was designed only as a pilot study, the results suggests that polyvalent reagent strips may be a useful tool for diagnosis of heavily infected patients under field conditions, as they permit rapid and easy identification of subjects with high egg counts.Analysis of worm burden variation in human Schistosoma mansoni infections by determination of serum levels of circulating anodic antigen and circulating cathodic antigen.Serum circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) concentrations, as a possible direct measure of worm burden, were compared with fecal egg counts in a heavily Schistosoma mansoni-infected population from Zaire to allow differentiation between worm loads and worm fecundity in relation to age and intensity of infection. Of the 517 subjects, 95% excreted eggs and 97% demonstrated circulating antigens. Fecal egg counts showed an age-related pattern characteristic for an area in which schistosomiasis is endemic with intense transmission levels. Regression analysis showed that antigen concentrations were strongly associated with egg counts. For CAA, but not for CCA, this relation was found to be nonlinear, which would be consistent with density-dependent fecundity or crowding. The trend was uniform for all age groups, which for this particular population indicated a genuine reduction of worm loads rather than reduced worm fecundity with age of the host.The use of Baye's theorem and other indices of agreement in evaluating the use of reagent strips in screening rural schoolchildren for Schistosoma haematobium in Zambia.The diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium disease on the basis of history and physical examination alone is often difficult. Tests have thus been developed to allow an early and more accurate diagnosis. However these tests have substantial imperfections and many different results obtained from these tests must be integrated into a diagnostic conclusion about the probability of disease in a given patient. Also the accuracy of these tests in detecting S. haematobium disease is critically dependent not only on its sensitivity and specificity but also on the prevalence or pretest likelihood of disease in the population under study. The diagnostic accuracy of haematuria, proteinuria and the combined criteria tests in detecting S. haematobium eggs in schoolchildren are evaluated by calculating the sensitivity and specificity and also by the use of 'Bayes' theorem of conditional probability. The graphic relation between the predictive value of a given test result and the pretest risk of disease in the test subjects was obtained for each of these tests. This method reveals that the prevalence of S. haematobium disease is an important determinant of the predictive value of any test result in the individual patient.Evaluation of eosinophiluria in the diagnosis of schistosomiasis hematobium: a field-based study.Using Hansel's stain, eosinophiluria greater than 5% of total urinary white blood cells was found in 59% of a randomly selected population sample in an area endemic for schistosomiasis hematobium. The prevalence and mean level of eosinophiluria were significantly higher in infected subjects than in noninfected subjects (P less than 0.05). The sensitivity (80%), specificity (86%), and positive predictive value (82%) of eosinophiluria as a diagnostic index for schistosomiasis hematobium were significantly higher (Youdin index 0.66; P less than 0.05) than those of proteinuria, hematuria, and leukocyturia taken singly or in combination. However, unlike the latter three measurements, this method involves microscopy. There is a great need for a chemical method for measuring eosinophiluria.Circulating schistosomal antigen in diagnosis and assessment of cure in individuals infected with Schistosoma mansoni.The effectiveness of praziquantel in treating schistosomiasis is most commonly assessed by quantitating egg production or anti-schistosome antibodies in serum. We have used a monoclonal antibody (MAb)-based antigen-capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for the serologic diagnosis of schistosomiasis, and to monitor the efficacy of praziquantel therapy in 49 individuals with parasitologically proven schistosomiasis. The MAb used, 128C3/3/21, recognizes a repeating carbohydrate epitope expressed at all stages of parasite development, and antibodies recognizing this epitope are found in the serum of infected humans. The overall sensitivity of the ELISA was 78%, with a sensitivity of 100% for patients excreting greater than 100 eggs/g of feces and 72% for those excreting less than 100 eggs/g of feces. The positivity of the ELISA was directly related to the fecal egg counts obtained on days -3, -2, and -1 before treatment with praziquantel, but there was no correlation between antigen levels and the clinical stage of the disease. After praziquantel treatment, we observed a highly significant correlation (P less than 0.0001) between the time elapsed since treatment and the decrease in antigenemia. Furthermore, although no eggs were detected in any of the stool specimens at week 12 after treatment, the antigen was detected in 21% of the treated patients (seven of 33 ELISA-positive patients). Antigen levels decreased over the 12-week period in six of these patients, whereas the antigen level increased with time in one individual. The persistence of antigenemia suggests that these individuals are either still clearing antigen or remain infected.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Indirect screening for Schistosoma haematobium infection: a comparative study in Ghana and Zambia.Four indirect approaches, based on inquiry into a past history of haematuria, visual inspection for blood in the urine specimens, and the use of reagent strips to detect haematuria and proteinuria, were evaluated to identify persons with Schistosoma haematobium infection. These approaches were applied individually and in three different screening sequences on two populations in Ghana and Zambia in order to identify infected children and adults for subsequent treatment in both areas. Detection of haematuria using reagent strips was the single approach with the highest sensitivity and specificity. The observation of gross haematuria (bloody urine), followed by detection of blood by reagent strips, identified 87% of infected children in both areas. This screening sequence showed the highest combined sensitivity and specificity in the identification of infected children as well as adults for treatment in both areas. Differences in the results between the two countries are discussed. This study emphasizes the need for evaluation of indirect screening procedures for the diagnosis of S. haematobium infection in each endemic area so as to establish criteria for their interpretation, prior to large-scale field application.Schistosomiasis among young children in Usoma, Kenya.Although schistosomiasis burden is greatest among school-age children (SAC) (6-15 years of age), infection among preschool-age children (PSAC) (1-5 years), may be underestimated in endemic areas. We conducted a cross-sectional study evaluating Schistosoma mansoni infection among children 1-15 years of age in a highly endemic community in Kenya. Diagnostic tests included stool exam (Kato/Katz technique), serum testing for schistosome-specific antibodies, and urine testing for circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). Overall, 268 SAC and 216 PSAC were enrolled; prevalence increased with age, with 14% of 1 year olds and more than 90% of children > 10 years of age infected. Stool exam was more sensitive among SAC than PSAC, but performance was similar after adjusting for infection intensity (based on CCA). Schistosomiasis poses a threat to PSAC in endemic areas, and stool exam may underestimate the prevalence of infection. Control programs in such areas should consider PSAC in addition to SAC.The diagnostic value of haematuria and proteinuria in Schistosoma haematobium infection in southern Nigeria.Haematuria and proteinuria as detected by chemical reagent strips correlated moderately (r = 0.7) with prevalence and intensity of infection with Schistosoma haematobium in an area of Anambra State, Nigeria. Differences attributable to age and sex were also reflected in a similar pattern, all peaks occurring in the 5-14 year age group. The differences observed with varying levels of intensity and haematuria at both 10 and 50 erythrocytes/microliter (p < 0.001) and proteinuria at 0.3 g/dl (p < 0.01) were statistically significant. At a proteinuria level of 1 g/dl, the observed differences were however not statistically significant (p > 0.5). The percentage of specimens from children (0-14 years) positive for S. haematobium eggs and with at least traces of haematuria and proteinuria (63.4% and 95%, respectively) was higher than in adults (33.3% and 80.2%, respectively). All individuals with more than 50 eggs/10 ml of urine were correctly identified using both indices either separately or in combination. For egg counts of less than 50 eggs/10 ml of urine, false diagnosis occurred in only 5% of all specimens examined. The sensitivity and specificity of haematuria and proteinuria at trace quantities was very high, but haematuria had a higher predictive value for a positive test (PvPt) and was considered the overall better indicator. A combination of both indices did not significantly increase the PvPt. When trace haematuria and moderate proteinuria were combined, both the sensitivity, specificity and PvPt were all above 90%, giving the best overall values in all the combinations made.Screening methods for urinary schistosomiasis in an endemic area (the Kraboa/Coaltar district of Ghana).Control of Schistosoma haematobium morbidity on Pemba Island: validity and efficiency of indirect screening tests.Four indirect screening methods for the detection of Schistosoma haematobium morbidity are compared (history of haematuria, visual haematuria, and microhaematuria at the 1+ and 2+ positivity limit by reagent strips) in terms of their diagnostic performance under conditions of progressive decrease in prevalence of infection, intensity and risk of morbidity as a result of repeated schistosomiasis control programmes on Pemba Island, United Republic of Tanzania. The results show that the sensitivity of a history of haematuria was higher (71%) in children but lower in adults (40%), similar to the findings for visual haematuria in children (60%) and adults (40%) at baseline. However, visual haematuria had a higher specificity, positive predictive value, and efficiency than a history of haematuria in both children and adults. Microhaematuria at the 1+ positivity limit (by reagent strips) had the highest sensitivity of all the methods investigated, but the lowest specificity, positive predictive value, and efficiency. Quantitatively, the indirect methods tended to increase in specificity, negative predictive value, and efficiency during the course of the intervention programme. In contrast, positive predictive value tended to decrease, while the sensitivity remained fairly stable. Overall, these findings suggest that a history of haematuria and/or visual haematuria are appropriate methods for preliminary screening of communities to identify those at risk of morbidity. Thereafter, microhaematuria (1+ positivity limit) may be the more appropriate method for targeting intervention at the individual level.Evaluation of urinalysis reagent strips versus microscopical examination of urine for Schistosoma haematobium.This study deals with the effectivecess of chemical reagent strips for detection of haematuria and proteinuria in selecting S. haematobium egg positive subjects as compared to microscopical examination of urine. Out of 222 students from primary and secondary rural schools, 191 were S. haematobium and 59 were parasitologically negative. 135 students had a count of less than 50 eggs/10 ml. urine and 56 had more than 50 eggs/10ml. The sensitivity of reagent strips in detecting haematuria was 10% and 36% for the groups with less than and more than 50 eggs/10 ml. of urine respectively. The correspondant microscope figures were 42% and 93% respectively. Proteinuria was detected in 11% and 29% of urines from the groups with less than and more than 50 eggs/10 ml. respectively. The specificity of strips and microscopical examination in detection of haematuria was 100%, while that for proteinuria was 97% as detected by strips. These results show that urinalysis strips cannot be used as an alternative to microscopic examination of urine for the presence of S. haematobium eggs.A comparative study on specific antibodies and circulating antigen (CAA) in serum and parasitological findings for diagnosis of schistosomiasis mansoni in an endemic area in Tanzania.A baseline study to evaluate the prevalence of Schistosoma mansoni infection as well as the diagnostic efficacy of serodiagnostic tests was performed in Kabaganga village, Kome island, Lake Victoria, Tanzania. A total of 1108 individuals were examined parasitologically and clinically. Egg excretion was demonstrated by one-sample Kato-Katz test. Specific IgG1 and IgG4 antibodies against S. mansoni adult worm (SAWA) and egg (SEA) antigens as well as circulating anodic antigen (CAA) were determined in serum samples from 250 of these subjects. As a control population 41 individuals from a non-endemic area were examined parasitologically, clinically and serologically. In the parasitologically examined Kabaganga population 45% were excreting eggs. The pattern of egg excretion was typical for an endemic area with a peak in the age group 10-14 years. Sixty-five percent of the serologically tested villagers were positive in the CAA test. A total of 80% were positive in either of the two tests, indicating an active infection. In 67-95% of these individuals the levels of isotype specific antibodies were increased. The prevalence of CAA positivity corresponded fairly well with that of Kato-Katz results in the age groups 10-29 years, but in the younger age groups a considerably greater number of individuals were positive in the CAA test than in the Kato-Katz test. The results obtained indicate that virtually all of the Kabaganga villagers, regardless of age, had an ongoing, active infection or had previously been infected with S. mansoni. This population, therefore, may be useful for evaluation of the diagnostic efficacy of various antibody tests. The highest degree of discrimination between the endemic and the non-endemic village populations was noted for anti-egg IgG4 antibodies. It is concluded that the combined determination of parasite eggs in faeces and CAA in serum provides high sensitivity as regards active infection. Increased levels of isotype-specific antibodies, particularly of the IgG4 subclass, is a sensitive indicator of past or present infection, and the prevalence of individuals with such increased levels may be a simple and reliable indicator of the frequency of schistosomiasis in a community.An evaluation of urine-CCA strip test and fingerprick blood SEA-ELISA for detection of urinary schistosomiasis in schoolchildren in Zanzibar.To develop better monitoring protocols for detection of urinary schistosomiasis during ongoing control interventions, two commercially available diagnostic tests - the urine-circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) strip and the soluble egg antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (SEA-ELISA) - were evaluated for detection of Schistosoma haematobium infections in 150 schoolchildren from Zanzibar. The children originated from five primary schools representative of different levels of disease endemicity across the island; using standard urine filtration assessment with microscopy, mean prevalence of S. haematobium was 30.7% (95% confidence interval (CI)=23.4-38.7%) and a total of 35.3% (95% CI=27.7-43.5%) and 8.0% (95% CI=4.2-13.6%) children presented with micro- and macro-haematuria, respectively. Diagnostic scores of the urine-CCA strip were not satisfactory, a very poor sensitivity of 9% (95% CI=2-21%) was observed, precluding any further consideration. By contrast, the performance of the SEA-ELISA using sera from fingerprick blood was good; a sensitivity of 89% (95% CI=76-96%), a specificity of 70% (95% CI=60-79%), a positive predictive value of 57% (95% CI=45-69%) and a negative predictive value of 90% (95% CI=86-98%) were found. At the unit of the school, a positive linear association between prevalence inferred from parasitological examination and SEA-ELISA methods was found. The SEA-ELISA holds promise as a complementary field-based method for monitoring infection dynamics in schoolchildren over and above standard parasitological methods.Field-based evaluation of a reagent strip test for diagnosis of schistosomiasis mansoni by detecting circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine in low endemic area in Ethiopia.The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of a reagent strip test for the diagnosis of schistosomiasis mansoni by detecting circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine were evaluated using 184 stool and urine samples collected from schoolchildren living in relatively low endemic area of schistosomiasis mansoni in Ethiopia. A combined result of stool samples processed by Kato and formol-ether concentration methods was used as gold standard. The results showed that detection of CCA in urine using reagent strip test was slightly higher than the combined results of the stool techniques (65.2 % vs 42.4 %, p > 0.05) in suggesting the prevalence of the disease. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the reagent strip test were 76.9 %, 43.4 %, 50 % and 71.9 %, respectively. The result of egg counts using Kato method suggested that detection of urine CCA could be used to indicate the intensity of infection. Nevertheless, like that of stool examination, the reagent strip test was found to be less sensitive in case of light to moderate infections. About 23.1 % of the study children who were excreting the eggs of the parasite were found negative by the reagent strip test. The relative insensitivity of a reagent strip test in low intensity of infection necessitates for the development of more sensitive assay that can truly discriminate schistosome-infected from non-infected individuals.The validity of haematuria in the community diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis infections.The validity and reliability of haematuria when used as screening criteria in community diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis is presented. Between May and July, 1998, 1173 persons were screened for haematuria and examined for the presence of eggs of Schistosoma haematobium in their urine from all participating households in the Ozitem area of Bende Local Government Area, Abia State, Nigeria. Haematuria showed a sensitivity rate of 41.0% and specificity of 82.0% when used to identify cases of urinary schistosomiasis. Some factors that influenced the validity of haematuria as a diagnostic criterion are discussed. The use of haematuria amongst subjects in the first twenty years of their life is recommended.Rapid diagnosis of schistosomiasis by antigen detection in urine with a reagent strip.For the rapid and simple diagnosis of schistosomiasis, a reagent strip assay for detection of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine was developed. The test was based on a previously developed sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) using a combination of two anti-CCA monoclonal antibodies. For the reagent strip assay, as the capture matrix, monoclonal antibody was coated onto a nitrocellulose membrane and mounted on polyvinyl chloride strips. Urine samples were then tested in an assay consisting of a combined incubation step of the urine sample and biotinylated detecting antibody followed by incubation in streptavidin peroxidase and a subsequent staining. The specificity and the sensitivity of the assay, as determined with urine samples of 61 uninfected controls and 67 Schistosoma mansoni-infected individuals, were 96.7 and 95.5%, respectively. The results of the reagent strip assay compared very well with microscopical parasitological diagnosis by the standard Kato-Katz method for the same individuals. The reagent strip test has a lower detection limit of 1 ng of CCA per ml and can be completed in 75 min. By the inclusion of two reference bands on the strips, standardized reading could be achieved. This reagent strip assay is a promising tool for qualitative diagnosis of S. mansoni infections in control programs.Evaluation of the reagent strip test for haematuria in the control of Schistosoma haematobium infection in schoolchildren.Several recent reports have indicated the potential of the reagent strip test for haematuria in the diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium infection. Approximately 15,000 schoolchildren from a population of 40,000 people were examined for reagent strip microhaematuria on three occasions between 1986 and 1987 and treated with praziquantel 40 mg/kg if positive. The reagent strip was evaluated against a single filtration of 10 ml urine for S. haematobium eggs. Initially 65.9% of children were treated followed by 37.5% at the second examination 6 months later and 44.5% at the third examination a further 12 months later. Reagent strip sensitivity was shown to be related to the intensity of infection. The reagent strip specificity improved significantly with successive treatments indicating that haematuria was more sensitive than parasitology for light infections. The amount of S. haematobium reinfection was highest in the 7-9 year olds decreasing to the 16-20 year age group which suggested an impact of protective immunity. It was concluded that microhaematuria is a valuable indicator for the diagnosis of S. haematobium in national control programmes and can be substituted for parasitological examination with advantage but sensitivity and specificity should continue to be evaluated throughout the programme.Evaluation of urine-circulating cathodic antigen (Urine-CCA) cassette test for the detection of Schistosoma mansoni infection in areas of moderate prevalence in Ethiopia.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of antigen detecting urine-CCA cassette test for the detection of Schistosoma mansoni infection in areas of moderate prevalence in Ethiopia.Stool specimens were collected from 620 schoolchildren on three consecutive days. The samples were microscopically examined using double Kato slides; midstream urine specimens were also collected for three consecutive days and tested for S. mansoni. The sensitivity of the urine-CCA cassette test was determined using combined results of six Kato-Katz thick smears and three urine-CCA cassette tests as gold standard. The specificity of the urine-CCA cassette test was evaluated in an area where schistosomiasis is not endemic.Prevalence of S. mansoni infection as determined by single urine-CCA cassette test was 65.9%, by single Kato-Katz smear 37.3% and by six Kato-Katz thick smears 53.1% (P < 0.001). A single urine-CCA cassette test was significantly (P < 0.001) more sensitive (89.1%), had a lower negative predictive value (78.2%), was more accurate (92.6%) and agreed better with the gold standard (k = 0.83) than one or six Kato-Katz thick smears. However, both the Kato-Katz and urine-CCA cassette test showed 100% specificity in endemic settings.In moderate and high prevalence areas, urine-CCA cassette test is more sensitive than the Kato-Katz method and can be used for screening and mapping of S. mansoni infection.[Simple indicators of prevalence and intensity of urinary bilharziasis in Chad].Comparison of urine filtration and a chemical reagent strip in the diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in Ethiopia.The diagnostic efficacy of a chemical reagent strip (Ames Multistix) was compared with syringe-Nytrel urine filtration technique in the detection of S. haematobium infection at varying disease endemicity levels in the Awash Valley of Ethiopia. In low endemicity area (Afambo), the reagent strip showed highest sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of 80%, 96%, 40% and 99% respectively at "1+ limit" of microhaematuria. In the moderate (Dahitele) to high (Enta Doyta) areas, the highest diagnostic values of 77%, 83%, 56% and 93% respectively and 78%, 67%, 51% and 87% respectively were obtained at "trace limit". Using these cut-off points of haematuria, the prevalence of S. haematobium were 4.5%, 30.8% and 47% at low, moderate and high endemicity areas compared to 3.2%, 21% and 31% respectively using the filtration technique. A highly significant (maximum Kendall's tau = 0.44271; p < 0.002) was observed between N + 1 transformed geometric mean egg counts and micro-haematuria in the 10-19 years of age at all levels of endemicity. The efficacy and simplicity of chemical reagent strips and limitations of single parasitological examinations are discussed.Detection and quantification of soluble egg antigen in urine of Schistosoma haematobium-infected children from Kenya.While research on alternative diagnostic and morbidity markers for infection with Schistosoma haematobium has been going on for a long time, egg counts continue to be used as the gold standard, and infection intensity is thought to reflect the severity of the disease. However, this relationship is not always clear and fluctuation in egg output makes it difficult to classify prevalence correctly. The use of circulating adult worm antigen detection as an alternative diagnostic technique has been applied with varying success. However, this is a measure of worm burden and does not reflect the tissue egg load(s). In the present study we have used an assay that detects soluble egg antigen (SEA) in urine of S. haematobium-infected children, and we have evaluated the applicability of the assay as a diagnostic and morbidity indicator. To evaluate this assay, we have studied a group of 470 children from two schools (Tsunguni and Kibaokiche) in the Coast province of Kenya; 84.8% and 77% were egg-positive while the percentage positive as determined by the SEA-ELISA were 78.8% and 76.2% in Tsunguni and Kibaokiche, respectively. In both schools, SEA levels in urine of S. haematobium-infected children significantly correlated with egg counts (Pearson's r=0.73, P < 0.0001) and with hematuria (Spearman's r=0.65, P < 0.0001). In addition, urinary tract pathology as determined by ultrasound significantly correlated with the SEA levels in urine (Spearman's r=0.3, P < 0.001). The SEA-ELISA compared well with microhematuria within egg count classes and with egg counts within hematuria classes.Schistosomiasis of the lower reproductive tract without egg excretion in urine.The individual and public health impact of female genital schistosomiasis (FGS) has been studied and FGS as a risk factor for acquiring human immunodeficiency virus is discussed. In a community-based study in Tanzania, 40% of the women of child-bearing age (n=543) showed excretion of Schistosoma haematobium eggs in the urine (median=2.2 eggs/10 ml of urine) and 32% (n=263) had S. haematobium eggs in their cervical tissue. Urinary and genital schistosomiasis coexisted in 62% of the women, but S. haematobium eggs were found in the cervix without detectable egg excretion in the urine in 23%. Only 43% of the FGS cases had hematuria. Since FGS frequently exists in women with scanty or no egg excretion in the urine and because this disease manifestation is a considerable individual and public health hazard in S. haematobium-endemic areas, mass treatment targeted to women of child-bearing age should be considered.Field-based evaluation of a reagent strip test for diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni by detecting circulating cathodic antigen in urine before and after chemotherapy.The sensitivity of a reagent strip test for the diagnosis of schistosomiasis by detecting circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine was evaluated under field conditions using 251 stool and urine samples collected from a Schistosoma mansoni-endemic area of Ethiopia. The specificity of the test was evaluated in an area where schistosomiasis is not endemic. Stool samples were examined microscopically using duplicate Kato slides and formol-ether concentration methods. The effectiveness of the test in monitoring efficacy was also evaluated following chemotherapy. The results revealed that detection of CCA in urine using the one-step reagent strip test was superior to the stool examination methods (P<0.05) in indicating the prevalence of the disease. Assuming the combination of parasitological test results as the gold standard, the sensitivity and specificity of the test were 82.1% and 75.9%, respectively. The results of egg counts suggested the potential use of urine CCA in indicating the intensity of infection as an alternative to parasitological methods. The sensitivity and specificity of the test were 75% and 73.7%, respectively, following chemotherapy. Diagnosis of S. mansoni infection in urine using reagent strips would provide information on the prevalence of the disease, although further study is needed to improve its sensitivity and specificity.Eosinophil cationic protein, soluble egg antigen, circulating anodic antigen, and egg excretion in male urogenital schistosomiasis.Markers of male genital schistosomiasis (MGS) are needed to elucidate the consequences for reproductive health. Eosinophil cationic protein (ECP) and soluble egg antigen (SEA) in urine and semen, and circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in serum were assessed as MGS markers. Egg counts, ECP, and SEA in urine and CAA in serum, correlated positively. Seminal egg excretion exhibited marked day-to-day variations, but counts correlated positively with urinary egg counts and SEA in semen and with CAA. Positive predictive values with reference to seminal egg excretion were as follows: seminal ECP (52%), seminal SEA (83%), CAA (97%), and urinary egg excretion (82%). SEA in semen and CAA in serum constitute potential markers of MGS. However, urine egg counts as an indirect marker of MGS remains the preferred diagnostic method from a public health perspective.A reagent strip antigen capture assay for the assessment of cure of schistosomiasis patients.Presence of the schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in urine of patients with Schistosoma mansoni or S. haematobium infections.We investigated the presence of the circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in the urine of schistosomiasis patients. This genus specific antigen was hitherto demonstrated only in the serum of schistosomiasis patients. The urine of 80 patients with Schistosoma mansoni infections, 33 patients with S. haematobium infections, and 2 patients with mixed S. haematobium and S. mansoni infections were screened by a quantitative enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). CAA was demonstrated in 81% of those with intestinal schistosomiasis and in 97% of those with urinary schistosomiasis. CAA titers were less than 1:0.2-1:51.2. Results were compared with circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) titers in urine obtained in an indirect hemagglutination assay (IHA). CCA was generally not detectable in the urine of patients with S. haematobium infection, but was demonstrated in the urine of 85% of the patients with S. mansoni infection. Both CAA titers and CCA titers correlated positively with the number of S. mansoni eggs excreted in the feces, but CAA titers did not show a significant correlation with the number of S. haematobium eggs in urine. Both antigen titers showed a moderate correlation with the serum CAA level in schistosomiasis mansoni. The discovery of CAA in the urine of the majority of schistosomiasis patients tested suggests the use of urine samples for non-invasive immunodiagnosis of the disease.Urban transmission of urinary schistosomiasis in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.A cross sectional survey for Schistosoma haematobium infections was undertaken in 12 primary schools in the city of Dar es Salaam. The prevalence in the schools ranged from 5.3 to 55.1%, with an overall prevalence of 19.3%. More males (23.5%) than females (15.0%) were infected, and the highest prevalence was recorded in the 11-16 year age group. Intensity of infection was high, ranging from 12 to 96 eggs/10 ml urine in individual schools. 26% of the infected excreted more than 50 eggs/10 ml urine, and high rates of haematuria and proteinuria were observed in infected children. Interviews indicated that the majority of the children had acquired their infection in the city. Malacological surveys showed two potential vectors, Bulinus (Physopsis) globosus and B. (Ph.) nasutus, to be common in Dar es Salaam. Laboratory and field findings confirmed that these two species were vectors of S. haematobium. Factors responsible for continued transmission in this urban environment are discussed.Application of immunodiagnostic assays: detection of antibodies and circulating antigens in human schistosomiasis and correlation with clinical findings.In an initial cross-sectional survey, serum, urine, and stool samples were collected from 370 participants representing about 10% of the population (n = 4,438) in Behbeet village, 50 km south of Cairo, Egypt, an area well known to be endemic solely for Schistosoma haematobium. Diagnosis was approached in two parallel ways. The first approach, which simulated actual conditions in many endemic areas in Egypt, was based on physical examination and urine and stool microscopic analysis. The second approach was based on two advanced immunodiagnostic assay systems. One system detected antibodies to species-specific microsomal antigens, the other detected circulating schistosomal antigens. Microsomal antigens from S. haematobium and S. mansoni were used to detect antibodies in the Falcon assay screening test (FAST)-ELISA and the enzyme-linked immunoelectrotransfer blot (EITB). Circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) were quantified in serum and urine samples in a sandwich ELISA using monoclonal antibodies. Parasitologically, the prevalence of S. haematobium was 7.01% in females and 25.82% in males, giving an overall prevalence of 15.8%. The combination of urine CCA and serum CAA for detecting circulating antigens and the combination of the S. haematobium adult worm microsomal antigens (HAMA) FAST-ELISA and the HAMA EITB for detecting antibodies significantly improved the sensitivity of detecting S. haematobium circulating antigens and antibodies. Also, including a medical examination as an integral part of field studies and correlating immunodiagnostic results with other clinical and investigational data allowed us to calculate an accurate estimation of S. haematobium prevalence in this area of low endemicity.Mixed Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni infection: effect of different treatments on the serum level of circulating anodic antigen (CAA).In this study, levels of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in serum were investigated after differential treatment of 160 Sudanese patients with mixed Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni infections. The patients were randomly divided into four groups, which were treated with metrifonate (two doses of 10 mg/kg bodyweight), oxamniquine (60 mg/kg), praziquantel (40 mg/kg), or a multivitamin preparation, respectively. Serum, stool and urine samples were taken prior to treatment as well as one month and five months after chemotherapy. Before chemotherapy CAA levels were similar in the four groups. Antigenemia remained unchanged in the control group. In patients treated with praziquantel or oxamniquine the concentration of CAA decreased to a similar extent. However, whereas in the praziquantel group absence of CAA was already observed one month after treatment, clearing of CAA from the circulation seemed to take longer in patients treated with oxamniquine. Treatment with metrifonate did not result in a reduction of the CAA titres.Applicability of a monoclonal antibody-based dipstick in diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in the Central Region of Ghana.Summary We tested a rapid visually read monoclonal antibody (MoAb) based dipstick assay for specific diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis against microscopy and the use of haematuria and proteinuria in a schistosomiasis haematobia endemic area in the Central Region of Ghana. The study group consisted of 141 school children (83 males, 58 females) aged 8-19 years. A total of 129 of 141 (91.5%) submitted stool samples, and 7.8% had Schistosoma mansoni, 55% had hookworms and 6.2% had tapeworms. The presence of S. mansoni and intestinal parasites did not appear to influence the results of the MoAb-dipstick assay. The urinary schistosomiasis prevalence by MoAb-dipstick (78%) was higher (P < 0.05) than the estimate by microscopy (60.3%), microhaematuria (27%) and proteinuria (30.5%). The MoAb-dipstick correctly identified 98.8% of microscopically confirmed cases and missed one (1.3%). The dipstick was also positive for 26 of 56 (46.4%) egg-negative individuals, thereby giving a sensitivity of 98.8% and a specificity of 53.6%. On the other hand, microhaematuria and proteinuria were 38.8% and 30.6% sensitive, and 91.1% and 69.6% specific, respectively. Microhaematuria and proteinuria were less sensitive (P < 0.05) than both microscopy and MoAb-dipstick.Validation of reagent sticks in diagnosing urinary schistosomiasis in an urban setting.In view of the established potential of reagent sticks for detecting haematuria, a pilot survey to validate their use in the diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in an urban setting was done at Kinyerezi primary school of Ilala district in Dar es salaam. From 404 pupils screened for the disease, 273 were positive for the eggs by microscopy (filtration method), giving a prevalence of 67.6% and 253 (92.6%) of those who were positive by microscopy were also positive for haematuria by reagent sticks. Out of 131 who had no disease, 113 (86.2%) were negative for haematuria by the reagent sticks. These findings indicate a high sensitivity and specificity of microhaematuria by the reagent sticks (92.6% and 86.2%) respectively. Taking microscopy as a standard test, macrohaematuria had a sensitivity and specificity of 40.6% and 90% respectively, for urinary schistosomiasis. The accuracy of microhaematuria by reagent sticks was 90% compared to macrohaematuria which was only 56.6%. The use of reagent sticks test in detecting microhaematuria is thus recommended as a valid and rapid diagnostic test for urinary schistosomiasis in the present setting.Evaluation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine-cassette assay as a survey tool for Schistosoma mansoni in different transmission settings within Bugiri District, Uganda.Diagnosis of schistosomiasis at the point-of-care (POC) is a growing topic in neglected tropical disease research. There is a need for diagnostic tests which are affordable, sensitive, specific, user-friendly, rapid, equipment-free and delivered to those who need it, and POC is an important tool for disease mapping and guiding mass deworming. The aim of present study was to evaluate the relative diagnostic performance of two urine-circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) cassette assays, one commercially available and the other in experimental production, against results obtained using the standard Kato-Katz faecal smear method (six thick smears from three consecutive days), as a 'gold-standard', for Schistosoma mansoni infection in different transmission settings in Uganda. Our study was conducted among 500 school children randomly selected across 5 schools within Bugiri district, adjacent to Lake Victoria in Uganda. Considering results from the 469 pupils who provided three stool samples for the six Kato-Katz smears, 293 (76%) children had no infection, 109 (23%) were in the light intensity category, while 42 (9%) and 25 (5%) were in the moderate and heavy intensity categories respectively. Following performance analysis of CCA tests in terms of sensitivity, specificity, negative and positive predictive values, overall performance of the commercially available CCA test was more informative than single Kato-Katz faecal smear microscopy, the current operational field standard for disease mapping. The current CCA assay is therefore a satisfactory method for surveillance of S. mansoni in an area where disease endemicity is declining due to control interventions. With the recent resolution on schistosomiasis elimination by the 65th World Health Assembly, the urine POC CCA test is an attractive tool to augment and perhaps replace the Kato-Katz sampling within ongoing control programmes. Control of morbidity due to Schistosoma haematobium on Pemba Island: programme organization and management.A programme to control urinary schistosomiasis was initiated on Pemba island in January 1986 with the objectives of eliminating morbidity due to S. haematobium by utilizing a primary health care approach of strengthening the existing health care delivery system and creating a sound basis for future control of other parasitic and communicable diseases. The plan of action included training of rural health assistants to undertaken an intervention phase targeted to schools for selective population chemotherapy surveys at six-month intervals during the first two years, using indirect diagnostic techniques (observation of gross haematuria and detection of microscopic haematuria by chemical reagent strips) to identify individuals for treatment with praziquantel at a dose of 40 mg/kg body weight. The evaluation of the indirect techniques indicated that both sensitivity and specificity of the chemical reagent strips to detect infection were greater than 90%. After three selective population chemotherapy surveys, the prevalence of gross haematuria was reduced by 94.2% (15.8% to 0.9%) and both gross and microscopic haematuria were reduced by 76.4% (54.1% to 12.8%) among school children. Community involvement and health education were stressed in this programme. The use of dispensary laboratories to maintain control of urinary schistosomiasis is now being evaluated.Epidemiologic application of circulating antigen detection in a recent Schistosoma mansoni focus in northern Senegal.Quantitative enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISAs) for the detection of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in serum and urine were applied as an epidemiologic tool in a recent, intense focus of Schistosoma mansoni in Senegal. Both CAA and CCA in serum and CCA in urine were found in 94%, 83%, and 95%, respectively, of the population, of which 91% were positive on stool examination. Circulating antigens were also detectable in sera and urines of most egg-negative individuals. The sensitivities of the urine CCA and serum CAA ELISA were substantially higher than that of a single egg count, and increased with egg output. The CAA and CCA levels correlated well with egg counts and with each other. The age-related evolution of antigen levels followed a similar pattern as egg counts, providing supplementary evidence for a genuine reduction of worm burdens in adults in spite of the supposed absence of acquired immunity in this recently exposed community. The antigen:egg ratios decreased in adults, suggesting lower worm fecundity in children. This would be compatible with a density-dependent reduction of fecundity, but not with anti-fecundity immunity in adults that perhaps has not yet developed in this new focus.Urinary tract morbidity in schistosomiasis haematobia: associations with age and intensity of infection in an endemic area of Coast Province, Kenya.To gain better understanding of the natural history of Schistosoma haematobium associated disease, age- and intensity-related urinary tract morbidity were assessed in a cross-sectional study of Kilole (population 719) in Coast Province, Kenya. Overall prevalence of infection was 65% (39% light, 16% moderate, 9% heavy). Infection prevalence and mean intensity of infection were highest in the 5-14-year-old bracket for both sexes. Although significant intensity-associated increases in hematuria prevalence were noted for both children and adults in all infection categories, hematuria was more common in those less than 15 years of age. Children had a significant increase in the prevalence of dysuria at higher levels of infection, whereas adults did not. Radiographic study of a 1:9 random sample, stratified for age, revealed a greater prevalence of urinary tract granulomas in those less than 15 years. Subjects greater than 15 years of age had a greater frequency of hydronephrosis. Hydronephrosis, hydroureter, and bladder calcification were not associated with higher infection intensity. Among individuals with bladder calcification, a potential marker of cumulative inflammation, 87% had hydronephrosis or hydroureter, compared to a 40% prevalence among individuals without bladder calcification. These findings suggest that certain structural forms of urinary tract disease, such as hydronephrosis, progress during the course of untreated schistosomiasis haematobia despite age-related reductions in egg burden, whereas other forms of morbidity, such as hematuria, remain sensitive to the level of urinary egg excretion at the time of diagnosis.The use of reagent strips for detection of urinary schistosomiasis infection in the middle Awash Valley, Ethiopia.Reagent strip test was carried out to detect haematuria in urinary schistosomiasis infection in ten schools (1114 children) in the middle Awash Valley, Ethiopia. In five schools (557 children), were compared with results of urine filtration technique conducted simultaneously. The prevalence of infection by reagent sticks and urine filtration was 19.5% and 3.1%, respectively. Haematuria, detected by the reagent strip, was highly related with the results of urine filtration at the 2+ limit rather than the 1+ limit. However, the intensity of infection of all children was highly associated with prevalence rate at both haematuria limits. The possible use of reagent strips in Ethiopia to monitor morbidity (haematuria) due to S. haematobium infection is discussed.New approaches with different types of circulating cathodic antigen for the diagnosis of patients with low Schistosoma mansoni load.Schistosomiasis mansoni is a debilitating and sometimes fatal disease. Accurate diagnosis plays a key role in patient management and infection control. However, currently available parasitological methods are laborious and lack sensitivity. The selection of target antigen candidates has turned out to be a promising tool for the development of more sensitive diagnostic methods. In our previous investigations, the use of crude antigens led to false-positive results. Recently, focus has been given to highly purified Schistosoma mansoni antigens, especially to circulating antigens.Thus, our main goal was to test different types of circulating cathodic antigen glycoprotein (CCA), as "crude antigen," the protein chain of recombinant CCA and two individual peptides. These schistosome proteins/peptides were tested in a new diagnostic method employing immunomagnetic separation based on the improvement of antigen-antibody binding.Use of recombinant CCA as a diagnostic antigen allowed us to develop a diagnostic assay with high sensitivity and specificity with no false-negative results. Interestingly, the "crude antigen" worked as a good marker for control of cure after praziquantel treatment.Our new diagnostic method was superior to enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in diagnosing low endemicity patients.Day-to-day fluctuation of schistosome circulating antigen levels in serum and urine of humans infected with Schistosoma mansoni in Burundi.Day-to-day fluctuations of both circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in serum and urine were examined simultaneously in a group of Schistosoma mansoni-infected individuals from Burundi and compared with each other and with fecal egg count fluctuations. Significant correlations were found between fecal egg counts and circulating antigens (CAA and CCA) and between circulating antigen levels in serum and urine samples. The cumulative percentage of positive results after three samplings was highest for urine CCA detection, followed by fecal egg counts, serum CCA, serum CAA, and urine CAA detection, respectively. It was demonstrated that circulating antigen levels in both serum and urine showed less fluctuation than fecal egg counts, except for urine CAA levels. The serum CAA detection assay in particular, although less sensitive in this low endemic area in Burundi, gave very constant measurements over a period of one week. Our results indicate that detection of circulating antigens in a single serum or urine sample provides a quantitatively more stable diagnosis of S. mansoni infection than fecal egg counts based on a single stool examination.Quantitative determination of circulating antigens in human schistosomiasis mansoni using an indirect hemagglutination assay.In serum and urine specimens collected from a group of Schistosoma mansoni infected individuals from Makundju, Zaire, the schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) were quantitatively determined using an indirect hemagglutination reaction with sheep erythrocytes sensitized with mouse IgM monoclonal antibodies directed against these circulating antigens. Levels of CAA in serum (up to 5 ng/ml) and CCA in serum and urine (up to 50 ng/ml) were strongly correlated with egg excretion and with each other. No correlation was found between egg excretion and antibody levels against the circulating antigens. Antigen was detectable only in patients excreting greater than 500 eggs per gram of feces.Detection and quantification of circulating antigen in schistosomiasis by monoclonal antibody. II. The quantification of circulating antigens in human schistosomiasis mansoni and haematobium: relationship to intensity of infection and disease status.Circulating cathodic and circulating anodic antigens were quantified in sera of patients infected with S. mansoni, S. haematobium or both parasites. A monoclonal antibody and a polyclonal antiserum were applied in precipitation and solid phase immunosorbent techniques using radio- and enzyme-labelled antibody as a tracer to detect the cathodic and anodic antigen respectively. The results show that circulating cathodic antigen can frequently be detected in an immunoprecipitation or an immunoradiometric assay in serum of infected patients. The serum concentration of this antigen was found to be significantly correlated to the number of S. mansoni worms and to be higher in patients with the hepatosplenic form of the disease than in those without such complications. Examining paired serum samples before and after specific treatment the determination of this antigen by monoclonal antibody reliably indicated efficacy of chemotherapy in patients having received different forms of treatment.Hematuria and dysuria in the self-diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis among school-children in Northern Cameroon.The present study was designed to assess the value of self reported hematuria and dysuria in the diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis at the individual level. A sample of 964 school children of grade 5 and 6 from 15 schools of the French speaking educational system in the Sudano-sahelian zone of northern Cameroon were submitted to a questionnaire related to hematuria and dysuria, and provided a urine sample each. The urine samples were processed using the dip stick and sedimentation methods, and the degree of microhematuria and oviuria determined. In all 964 questionnaires were collected, 843 urine samples examined for microhematuria and 871 for oviuria. The percentage of children reporting hematuria increased with the degree of microhematuria and the intensity of infection. Among the various indicators of urinary schistosome infection, microhematuria had the highest sensitivity (76%), followed by self reported hematuria or dysuria (65%), and dysuria (52%). The specificity was highest for self reported hematuria, and lowest for self reported hematuria or dysuria. The efficiency of self reported hematuria or dysuria increased with the intensity of infection and was highest (100%) for heavy infections (> 400 eggs/ml g urine). We advocate the use of self reported hematuria or dysuria for the assessment of S. haematobium at the individual level.Urinary schistosomiasis among pregnant women in some endemic tropical semi - urban communities of Anambra State, Nigeria.Urinary schistosomiasis is caused by the deposition of eggs by adult flukes in the blood vessels surrounding the bladder of the infected host. Schistosomiasis is ranked the second most important parasitic disease of man and undoubtedly the most important of helminth origin. This paper reports the prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium infection among pregnant women in some endemic tropical semi - urban communities of Anambra State, Nigeria, screened using Medi-Test Combi 9 and urine centrifugation methods. Laboratory analysis of urine samples collected from 172 pregnant women indicated that 41 (23.8%) had urinary schistosomiasis with Anam community having the highest prevalence of 35.1% among other communities. The overall prevalence and intensity of infection among age groups showed that the youngest age group in the study, 16-20 years had the highest prevalence. Out of 24 women within this age group, 12 (50.0%) were infected among which 8 (33.3%) had light infection while 4 (16.6%) had moderate infection. The peak mean intensity of 7.6 eggs/10ml urine was observed in age group 16-20 years while the oldest age group, 41-45 years had the lowest mean intensity of 1.0 egg/10ml urine. Haematuria and proteinuria which are diagnostic for schistosomiasis were higher within age group 16-20 years in all the communities with Anam community having the highest prevalence of 50% for both biochemicals within age group 16-20 years. The findings from this study will be useful in developing specific programme for this special group of women.Urinary schistosomiasis in southern Ghana: 1. Prevalence and morbidity assessment in three (defined) rural areas drained by the Densu river.Epidemiological studies on urinary schistosomiasis were carried out in eight villages in the Ga and Akuapem South districts in Ghana. Single urine samples were collected from individuals aged 5 years and above between 10.00 and 14.00 h. The samples were examined for the presence of Schistosoma haematobium eggs using a filtration technique. Indirect morbidity was determined as the presence of microhaematuria and proteinuria using reagent strips, and macrohaematuria was recorded with the naked eye. Out of the study population of 3912 subjects, 2562 (65.5%) submitted urine samples. The prevalence of a Schistosoma haematobium infection ranged between 54.8 and 60.0%. Infection rates increased by age with a peak in the 10-19 years category, and decreased with increasing age. Disease prevalence was higher in males aged 15 years and above in Areas 2 (Ntoaso and Sansami Amanfro) and 3 (Dom Faase, Papase, Chento and Gidi Kope), whereas it was higher among males aged 10 years and above in Area 1 (Ayikai Doblo and Akramaman). The intensity of infection was highest among children aged 10-14 years in most of the villages. More than half of egg-positive children in this age group had a heavy infection (100 eggs and above in 10 ml of urine). Although both egg-positive and egg-negative individuals manifested variable degrees of macro- or micro-haematuria, microhaematuria was more prevalent among egg-positives (chi(2)=918.5, d.f.=1, P<0.01). The degree of microhaematuria and proteinuria were significantly associated with the intensity of the infection. These results indicate a high transmission of disease in the study area.Circulating anodic antigen levels in serum before and after chemotherapy with praziquantel in schistosomiasis mansoni.The kinetics of serum levels of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) of Schistosoma mansoni were studied in patients with intestinal schistosomiasis before and after treatment with praziquantel. Day to day fluctuation in faecal egg excretion was compared with fluctuation in antigen level in 20 patients by serum and stool examination on 3 consecutive days before treatment. Antigen levels - calculated either as absorbance value of undiluted serum or as titre - showed less fluctuation than the number of eggs per gram of faeces determined by stool examinations based on single or duplicate 25 mg Kato smears. Compared with a placebo control group of 11 individuals, there was a significant reduction in CAA level in serum of 10 patients treated with praziquantel (40 mg/kg), 10 weeks after treatment. A similar decrease in serum CAA level was observed in a group of 46 patients treated with praziquantel, 6 weeks after treatment. In both groups, patients who remained seropositive after treatment still excreted eggs in their faeces. The kinetics of the antigen decrease were studied in more detail in 20 patients in hospital. Within 10 d after treatment with a double dose of 40 mg praziquantel per kg body weight, the antigen level fell to less than 10% of the original serum level, with a CAA half-life of approximately 2 d.Circulating anodic antigen levels in two areas endemic for schistosomiasis mansoni indicate differences in worm fecundity.Serum levels of the adult schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) were compared in 2 populations, both living in an area with extremely high transmission levels of Schistosoma mansoni. In one focus (Maniema, eastern Zaire) transmission has been established for several decades, while in the other focus (Ndombo, northern Senegal) transmission started only recently. While parasite egg counts in the 2 populations were virtually similar, including analogous age-related distributions, serum levels of CAA were approximately 5 times higher in the chronically exposed community. This difference in antigen level was most pronounced in adolescents and adults. As the level of CAA is assumed to be a direct reflection of worm burden, these findings suggest higher parasite fecundity in the recently exposed community. It is not very likely that these observations could be explained solely by differences in clearance mechanisms caused by a variation in experience of infection. The relationship between circulating antigen levels and egg counts was consistent for all age groups in the Maniema population, while in the Ndombo population only children showed a pattern similar to that in the chronically exposed community.The significance of proteinuria and haematuria in Schistosoma haematobium infection.The intensity and prevalence of proteinuria and haematuria were studied with urinanalysis reagent strips in a Gambian community in which the intensity of infection with Schistosoma haematobium was high. The level of proteinuria present was shown to be related to the intensity of infection. Follow-up for 12 months showed that infected subjects with heavy proteinuria had a good prognosis. These findings suggest that the urinary protein in such subjects is likely to originate from lesions in the bladder and ureters and that advanced glomerular pathology is probably rare. The relationship of the levels of proteinuria and haematuria to the egg count suggests they may be parameters which could have value as indications for chemotherapy. Detailed study showed that the effect of treating all the subjects who had both 30 mg/100 ml or more of protein and at least a trace of haematuria would have been very similar to treating all those with an egg count of 200 ova/10 ml or more. Since urinalysis with reagent strips is very simple and rapid it could have a role in mass chemotherapy campaigns, particularly those aimed at the identification and treatment of heavily infected subjects.Immunodiagnosis of schistosomiasis mansoni in a low endemic area in Surinam by determination of the circulating antigens CAA and CCA.We evaluated the applicability of circulating antigen detection in serum and urine for the diagnosis of Schistosoma infections in a low endemic area. In total 389 individuals from Saramacca (Surinam) participated in the survey. Stool samples were examined using the Kato method, while circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) were determined by highly specific monoclonal antibody-based ELISA's. Also schistosome specific IgM antibodies were measured by the indirect immunofluorescence assay, but the diagnostic performance of this test was found to be poor in this population. S. mansoni eggs were found in 29% of the examined cases, while CAA and CCA could be demonstrated in 23% and 17% of the serum samples and in 3% and 28% of the urine samples, respectively. Forty three percent of the study population was positive in at least one of these diagnostic assays, indicating that each individual test misses a substantial part of the subjects with an active infection. In most positive cases, intensities of infection were very low. As 204 individuals participated in all screening assays, diagnostic performance of each test was evaluated in this sub-population. The highest sensitivities were achieved with the urine-CCA assay and the parasitological examination, detecting 59 and 58 out of the 107 cases with an active infection, respectively. The serum-CAA assay detected 47 positive cases. Our results demonstrate that determination of circulating antigens, especially CCA in urine and CAA in serum, provides information additional to the parasitological examination, for the assessment of prevalence and intensity of Schistosoma infection in low endemic areas.Use of circulating cathodic antigen strips for the diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis.Rapid diagnostic tests are needed for the implementation and monitoring of national schistosomiasis control programmes. The field applicability of the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine reagent strip for the diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium infection was evaluated among 265 pre- and primary schoolchildren aged 2-19 years in a rural area of Zimbabwe. The CCA strip was compared with egg detection before and six weeks after treatment with praziquantel. Pre-treatment prevalence (overall 40.4%) and intensity of infection, as determined by egg counts, increased with age. CCA and parasitological results were significantly correlated (P<0.001), although concordance was slight (kappa=0.21). Discordant results were mainly attributable to CCA-positive, egg-negative individuals. Correlations and levels of agreement improved significantly with age (P<0.001, kappa=0.40) and intensity of infection (P<0.001). Praziquantel treatment led to 'cure' in 90.9% and 70.5% of children as measured by the egg detection and CCA methods, respectively. An arbitrary gold standard was constructed that included both CCA and egg detection results. Using this standard, the sensitivities of the CCA test were 88.2% and 95.8%, respectively, for pre- and post-treatment results. The improved version that is field applicable now has an acceptable role in the field diagnosis of S. haematobium.Circulating anodic and cathodic antigen in serum and urine of mixed Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni infections in Office du Niger, Mali.In Office du Niger, an area endemic for both Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni in Mali, circulating anodic (CAA) and cathodic (CCA) antigen detection assays were performed on pretreatment serum and urine samples from two villages, Rigandé and Siguivoucé, and compared with egg counting methods. The highest prevalence was obtained with the urine-CCA assay which also had the highest sensitivity to S. haematobium, S. mansoni or mixed infection. A single urine-CCA assay was as sensitive as repeated egg counts (one stool+two urine examinations per individual). When the different assays were tested in parallel, several combinations including assays on serum were found to be highly sensitive. As urine sampling is widely accepted, urine assays will be used for further monitoring these villages one and two years after chemotherapy.Schistosoma mansoni Infections in young children: when are schistosome antigens in urine, eggs in stool and antibodies to eggs first detectable?in uganda, control of intestinal schistosomiasis with preventive chemotherapy is typically focused towards treatment of school-aged children; the needs of younger children are presently being investigated as in lakeshore communities very young children can be infected. In the context of future epidemiological monitoring, we sought to compare the detection thresholds of available diagnostic tools for Schistosoma mansoni and estimate a likely age of first infection for these children.a total of 242 infants and preschool children (134 boys and 108 girls, mean age 2.9 years, minimum 5 months and maximum 5 years) were examined from Bugoigo, a well-known disease endemic village on Lake Albert. Schistosome antigens in urine, eggs in stool and host antibodies to eggs were inspected to reveal a general prevalence of 47.5% (CI(95) 41.1-54.0%), as ascertained by a positive criterion from at least one diagnostic method. Although children as young as 6 months old could be found infected, the average age of infected children was between 3¼-3¾ years, when diagnostic techniques became broadly congruent.whilst different assays have particular (dis)advantages, direct detection of eggs in stool was least sensitive having a temporal lag behind antigen and antibody methods. Setting precisely a general age of first infection is problematic but if present Ugandan policies continue, a large proportion of infected children could wait up to 3-4 years before receiving first medication. To better tailor treatment needs for this younger ageclass, we suggest that the circulating cathodic antigen urine dipstick method to be used as an epidemiological indicator.Evaluation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine-tests for diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni infection in Cameroon.The Kato-Katz is the most common diagnostic method for Schistosoma mansoni infection. However, the day-to-day variability in host egg-excretion and its low detection sensitivity are major limits for its use in low transmission zones and after widespread chemotherapy. We evaluated the accuracy of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine-assay as a diagnostic tool of S. mansoni. In comparison, a low sensitive CCA test (CCA-L) was assessed.THE STUDY WAS CONDUCTED IN THREE SETTINGS: two foci with single S. mansoni infections (settings A and B), and one mixed S. mansoni - S. haematobium focus (setting C). Stool and urine samples were collected from school-children on three consecutive days. Triplicate Kato-Katz readings were performed per stool sample. Each urine sample was tested with one CCA and only the first urine sample was subjected to CCA-L. Urine samples were also examined for S. haematobium eggs using the filtration method and for microhaematuria using urine reagent strips. Overall, 625 children provided three stool and three urine samples.Considering nine Kato-Katz thick smears as 'reference' diagnostic test, the prevalence of S. mansoni was 36.2%, 71.8% and 64.0% in settings A, B and C, respectively. The prevalence of S. haematobium in setting C was 12.0%. The sensitivities of single Kato-Katz, CCA and CCA-L from the first stool or urine samples were 58%, 82% and 46% in setting A, 56.8%, 82.4% and 68.8% in setting B, and 49.0%, 87.7% and 55.5% in setting C. The respective specificities were 100%, 64.7% and 100%; 100%, 62.3% and 91.3%; and 100%, 42.5% and 92.0%. Mixed infection with S. haematobium did not influence the CCA test results for S. mansoni diagnosis.Urine CCA revealed higher sensitivity than CCA-L and triplicate Kato-Katz, and produced similar prevalence as nine Kato-Katz. It seems an attractive method for S. mansoni diagnosis.Improved diagnostic performance of the circulating antigen assay in human schistosomiasis by parallel testing for circulating anodic and cathodic antigens in serum and urine.Serum and urine levels of two Schistosoma circulating antigens, the circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA), were determined by monoclonal antibody-based enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays in 56 Egyptian patients infected with S. mansoni and in 12 patients infected with both S. mansoni and S. haematobium. Both CAA and CCA could be specifically demonstrated in 82% and 88% of the serum samples and in 88% and 87% of the urine samples, respectively. While complete specificity was maintained, sensitivity was increased to a range of 91-98% by parallel use of the two circulating antigen assays, i.e., an individual with a positive titer for at least one of the assays was considered to be infected. A combination of CAA and CCA determinations in urine samples only resulted in a sensitivity of 94%. However, the highest sensitivity was achieved when the serum-CCA assay was combined with the urine-CCA assay (98%) or with the urine-CAA assay (97%). Sensitivity could not be increased further by combining more than two tests. A significant correlation was demonstrated between the level of circulating antigen and the number of parasite eggs in feces in each of the four assays. In addition, the levels of CAA and CCA in serum and urine were significantly correlated with each other. Our results indicate that diagnosis of schistosome infections by detection of circulating antigens can be significantly improved by parallel testing for multiple antigens.The usefulness of urinalysis reagent strips in selecting Schistosoma haematobium egg positives before and after treatment with praziquantel.The effectiveness of urinalysis reagent strips for haematuria and proteinuria in selecting Schistosoma haematobium egg-positive persons was studied on 426 subjects of all ages in a Kenyan community before and 3 months after treatment with praziquantel. Before and after treatment, the degree of urinary blood or protein and prevalence of egg positives were closely associated. Haematuria and proteinuria were positively correlated with urinary egg counts. For selecting egg-positive persons with reagent strips, a combined criterion 'haematuria trace up or proteinuria 1 + up' was considered the best in this area. With this criterion, sensitivity and specificity before treatment were 69.6 and 84.4 respectively. These values remained at the same level (70.7 and 81.2%) even after treatment with praziquantel reduced prevalence from 59.4 to 13.6% (77% reduction) and intensity of infection from 57.2 to 11.3 eggs 10 ml-1 of urine (80% reduction). Although the sensitivity was not very high, heavy infections were not missed. If all those selected with reagent strips were treated and cured, a 98% reduction in total egg excretion by the community would be expected in both our first and second urine examinations.Daily fluctuation of levels of circulating cathodic antigen in urine of children infected with Schistosoma mansoni in Brazil.The fluctuation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) levels in urine was studied in 69 Brazilian school-children infected with Schistosoma mansoni and compared to egg counts. Faeces and urine samples were simultaneously collected at 7 times during a period of 2 weeks. CCA was determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay and could be detected in 96% of the urine samples; the individual mean CCA level ranged from 609 to 350,700 pg/mL. 90% of the faecal samples contained S. mansoni eggs and the individual mean egg output ranged from 9 to 5510 eggs/g. The Spearman rank correlation coefficient between these individual means was 0.69. Kendall's coefficient of concordance (W) was 0.88 for CCA levels and 0.80 for egg counts.Detection of the schistosome circulating cathodic antigen by enzyme immunoassay using biotinylated monoclonal antibodies.We have developed an enzyme immunoassay (ELISA) for the quantification of the schistosome circulating cathodic antigen (CCA), a glycoprotein associated with the syncitium lining the gut of the parasite. A mouse monoclonal antibody of IgG3 isotype was used as coating (antigen-capture) antibody, while a biotinylated mouse monoclonal IgM was used as second (antigen-detecting) antibody. Streptavidin-alkaline phosphatase was used as enzyme label. The lower detection limit of the assay was 1.0 ng of the trichloroacetic acid soluble fraction of adult worm antigen (AWA-TCA) per ml, which corresponds to approximately 0.2 ng CCA per ml. The ELISA showed a linear range from 1.0 to 62.5 ng AWA-TCA per ml. Serum and urine samples of 16 individuals infected with Schistosoma mansoni (egg counts ranging from 5 to 4820 eggs per gram of faeces) were tested in the assay. Antigen titres ranged from less than 4-8192. This assay represents a considerable advantage in diagnosis of Schistosoma infections as it allows the detection and quantification of CCA in serum and urine in even lightly infected individuals.Control of urinary schistosomiasis: an investigation into the effective use of questionnaires to identify high-risk communities and individuals in Niger State, Nigeria.Schistosomiasis is a public health problem in Nigeria. Although there is a national programme for its control, there is the need for reliable and simple means of rapidly diagnosing communities to provide a detailed map on the distribution of the disease in the country, in order to prioritize control activities, as well as to monitor the effectiveness of control operations. A rapid assessment technique using school questionnaires was tested in Borgu Local Government Area (LGA), Niger State, north-western Nigeria. Following a series of focus group discussions, the questionnaires were adapted before they were administered through the school system to 60 primary schools in Borgu LGA. Correctly completed questionnaires were returned from 58 schools (97%) within 4 weeks. Questionnaires were validated by reagent stick tests performed by trained teachers. Their results proved to be reliable compared to those obtained by our research team in 20 randomly selected schools. Overall prevalences of microhaematuria at 1+ and 2+ levels were 45.7% and 27. 1%, respectively. Highly significant correlations were obtained between school prevalence of microhaematuria and reported schistosomiasis, as well as reported blood in urine. The diagnostic performance of the questionnaires at the 2+ level of microhaematuria was very good. The design of our study also allowed data analysis on an individual level, and multivariate analysis revealed highly significant odds ratios for reported schistosomiasis and reported blood in urine to detect an individual with urinary schistosomiasis. Our results are in good agreement with reports from other African countries, and questionnaires can be recommended for rapid identification of communities at highest risk of urinary schistosomiasis in Nigeria, so that scarce resources of the national control programme can be used most effectively.Evaluation of dipsticks in Schistosoma haematobium infections in four villages in the middle valley of the Senegal River Basin, Senegal.Magnetic bead antigen capture enzyme-linked immunoassay in microtitre trays for rapid detection of schistosomal circulating anodic antigen.We have developed a new magnetic bead antigen capture enzyme-linked immunoassay for the detection of schistosomal circulating anodic antigen. The assay utilizes IgG1 monoclonal antibody coated monodisperse magnetic beads in microtitre trays fitted to a special magnet. The total test time was found to be 1-2 h, using 0.05 mg beads per well. The lower detection level was 0.7 ng AWA-TCA per ml (approximately 0.07 ng CAA per ml). Validation by sera from uninfected and Schistosoma mansoni infected Africans and Norwegians resulted in an assay specificity of 100% and sensitivity was close to 90% for cases excreting more than 100 eggs per gram faeces. At such clinically relevant levels the inter-assay CV was below 10% and photometric absorbance correlated to antigen levels was nearly linear. There was a significant correlation between the magnetic bead EIA absorbance values and the titres obtained using the previously established ELISA. The new bead assay, however, was easier and less laborious because TCA pretreatment and the titration of positive results were unnecessary.Accuracy of urine circulating cathodic antigen test for the diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni in preschool-aged children before and after treatment.The Kato-Katz technique is widely used for the diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni, but shows low sensitivity in light-intensity infections. We assessed the accuracy of a commercially available point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen (POC-CCA) cassette test for the diagnosis of S. mansoni in preschool-aged children before and after praziquantel administration.A 3-week longitudinal survey with a treatment intervention was conducted in Azaguié, south Côte d'Ivoire. Overall, 242 preschoolers (age range: 2 months to 5.5 years) submitted two stool and two urine samples before praziquantel administration, and 86 individuals were followed-up posttreatment. Stool samples were examined with duplicate Kato-Katz thick smears for S. mansoni. Urine samples were subjected to POC-CCA cassette test for S. mansoni, and a filtration method for S. haematobium diagnosis.Before treatment, the prevalence of S. mansoni, as determined by quadruplicate Kato-Katz, single CCA considering 'trace' as negative (t-), and single CCA with 'trace' as positive (t+), was 23.1%, 34.3% and 64.5%, respectively. Using the combined results (i.e., four Kato-Katz and duplicate CCA(t-)) as diagnostic 'gold' standard, the sensitivity of a single Kato-Katz, a single CCA(t-) or CCA(t+) was 28.3%, 69.7% and 89.1%, respectively. Three weeks posttreatment, the sensitivity of a single Kato-Katz, single CCA(t-) and CCA(t+) was 4.0%, 80.0% and 84.0%, respectively. The intensity of the POC-CCA test band reaction was correlated with S. mansoni egg burden (odds ratio = 1.2, p = 0.04).A single POC-CCA cassette test appears to be more sensitive than multiple Kato-Katz thick smears for the diagnosis of S. mansoni in preschool-aged children before and after praziquantel administration. The POC-CCA cassette test can be recommended for the rapid identification of S. mansoni infections before treatment. Additional studies are warranted to determine the usefulness of POC-CCA for assessing drug efficacy and monitoring the impact of control interventions.Evaluation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) strip for diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in Hassoba school children, Afar, Ethiopia.A total of 206 urine samples collected from Hassoba Elementary schoolchildren, Afar, Ethiopia, a low Schistosoma haematobium endemic setting, was diagnosed to evaluate the performance of CCA strip using double references, urine filtration technique and urinalysis dipstick (Combur 1.0 Test) that detect schistosome eggs and blood in urine, respectively. The former was used as a gold standard reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values for the CCA were 52%, 63.8%, 56.7% and 59% respectively, with reference to urine filtration technique whereas these parameters were 50.4%, 62.4%, 55.6% and 57.5% respectively, with reference to Combur 10 Test. 47 S. haematobium egg-positive children were found negative by CCA strip while 38 egg-negative children were found positive by CCA strip. Moreover, among the pre-tests done in duplicate, inconsistent results were also recorded. Assays were also compared with regard to the cost of equipment and reagents, speed and simplicity of use. Though CCA strip was found to be rapid and could be performed with minimal training, it was found to be expensive (US $ 4.95 per test) to use it for large-scale field use even if its diagnostic value would have been satisfactory. Further development and standardization of the CCA strip are required for its applicability for field use. It is also recommended that its cost per strip should be substantially cut down if it is to be used in poor schistosomiasis endemic countries.Performance of three rapid screening methods in the detection of Schistosoma haematobium infection in school-age children in Southeastern Nigeria.A cross-sectional study of primary school children was conducted to evaluate and compare the performance of some rapid screening methods in the detection of Schistosoma haematobium infection in Nigeria Cement Factory (NigerCem) and Nike Lake areas of Southeastern Nigeria.Urine samples of school children were examined for macro-haematuria and tested for micro-haematuria and proteinuria using reagent strips followed by egg microscopy. Self-reported haematuria was assessed using simple questionnaire. The performances of these rapid diagnoses singly and in combination were calculated using egg microscopy as gold standard.The prevalence of the infection was 26·6% in NigerCem and 5·1% in Nike Lake area, classifying these areas as moderate- and low-prevalence areas (MPA and LPA); while in the subsample used for self-reported haematuria, the prevalence was 27·2 and 4·2% in MPA and LPA, respectively. The positive predictive value (PPV) of micro-haematuria was comparable in MPA (55·26%) and LPA (57·89%). Overall PPV of macro-haematuria was 87·50% in MPA and 66·70% in LPA while in the detection of heavy infection; PPV was higher in LPA (75%) than in MPA (66·67%). In LPA and MPA, combination of micro-haematuria and proteinuria, and concomitant presence of macro-haematuria, micro-haematuria, and proteinuria had PPV of 83·33 and 63·16%, and 100 versus 66·67%, respectively. Generally, the rapid screening tests had lower negative predictive values (NPVs) in MPA than in LPA. The use of simple questionnaire increased the PPV of heavy infection in MPA (77·78%). This was further increased to 80% when self-reported haematuria was combined with micro-haematuria.The result suggests that in MPA with chronic infections, combination of self-reported haematuria and micro-haematuria may reduce the chance of missing those who should be treated.Levels of circulating soluble egg antigen in urine of individuals infected with Schistosoma mansoni before and after treatment with praziquantel.We used a recently developed sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay to determine the kinetics of Schistosoma mansoni circulating soluble egg antigen (CSEA) after chemotherapy and compared these with previously determined levels of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). Urine samples were collected from 35 Egyptian patients with S. mansoni infection before, and one, 3 and 6 weeks after treatment. Thirteen patients were treated with 60 mg praziquantel/kg body weight and 22 patients with 40 mg/kg. Following chemotherapy, the kinetics of CSEA in urine appeared to be clearly different from those of the worm-derived antigen CCA, levels of which decreased markedly within one week after chemotherapy; CSEA levels decreased at a much lower rate. Six weeks after successful chemotherapy, CSEA could still be detected in urine of 7 cases while CCA had already disappeared and no viable egg was found by faecal examination. There was no significant difference between the 2 dose regimens during follow-up in the percentage remaining positive or in the CSEA level. These results suggest that the egg antigens detected are primarily derived from viable eggs in the tissues and might be used as a marker for morbidity.A simple approach improving the performance of urine reagent strips for rapid diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in Nigerian schoolchildren.In Nigeria, schistosomiasis, caused predominantly by the species Schistosoma haematobium, is highly endemic in resource-poor communities. We performed a school-based survey in two rural communities in Osun State (Southwestern Nigeria) and assessed macrohaematuria, microhaematuria and proteinuria as indirect indicators for the presence of disease. Urine samples were inspected macroscopically for haematuria and screened for microhaematuria and proteinuria using urine reagent strips. The microscopic examination of schistosome eggs was used as the gold standard for diagnosis. In total, 447 schoolchildren were included in this study and had a 51% prevalence of urinary schistosomiasis. The sensitivity of microhaematuria (68%) and proteinuria (53%) for infection with S. haematobium was relatively low. In patients with a heavy infection (>or= 500 eggs/10 mL), the sensitivity of microhaematuria was high (95%). When the presence of macrohaematuria and the concomitant presence of microhaematuria and proteinuria were combined, it revealed a sensitivity of 63%, a specificity of 93% and a positive predictive value of 91%. Macrohaematuria also showed high specificity (96%) and a positive predictive value of 92%, while sensitivity was < 50%. These data show that combining urine reagent strip tests (presence of proteinuria and microhaematuria) and information on macrohaematuria increased the accuracy of the rapid diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in an endemic rural West African setting. This simple approach can be used to increase the quality of monitoring of schistosomiasis in schoolchildren.Detection of antibodies against circulating cathodic antigen of Schistosoma mansoni using the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.The applicability of a Schistosoma mansoni polysaccharide antigen, circulating cathodic antigen (CCA), for the detection of antibodies in S. mansoni infection was tested in the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). Antibodies against this secretory antigen were detected in hamster infections after three weeks, while in infected humans anti-CCA antibodies could be demonstrated eight weeks after infection. Antibodies could be demonstrated both in recent and chronic infections in man, but more false-negative results were observed in chronic infections. The antibody response was composed of both IgM and IgG antibodies.Urine reagent strips for diagnosis of schistosomiasis haematobium in women of fertile age.Hematuria, proteinuria and leukocyturia were semiquantitatively assessed by reagent strips in single morning urine of women of fertile age visiting the outpatient department of the Mangochi district hospital, Malawi. This was part of a diagnostic approach to female genital schistosomiasis (FGS). In 51 women ova of Schistosoma haematobium were detected in urine by a filtration technique. In 33 of these women ova were also present in genital tissue as demonstrated by microscopic examination of biopsies. In 209 women no ova were found in the single urine filtered. There were significantly higher scores for hematuria, proteinuria and leukocyturia as well as of the combined reagent strip index (RSI) in egg-excreting than in egg-negative women. The sensitivity of a single hematuria, proteinuria and leukocyturia reading was 98, 84 and 73%, respectively. However, the respective specificity was only 24, 22 and 23%. The best prediction of urinary schistosomiasis was achieved by a +2 score for hematuria, of which the sensitivity was 94% and the specificity was 61%. The high false-positive rates can probably be explained by contamination of urine by vaginal secretion. Moreover, cases of schistosomiasis have probably been overlooked because only a single morning urine sample was examined. The total absence of hematuria, proteinuria and leukocyturia, however, may be used to rule out heavy infections in community surveys. There was no difference in reagent strip scores between women with genital and urinary schistosomiasis as compared with those with urinary tract lesions alone. Thus urine analysis reagent strip readings do not help to discriminate between S. haematobium infected women with and without FGS.Sensitivity and specificity of reagent strips in screening of Kenyan children for Schistosoma haematobium infection.The reliability of using urinalysis reagent strips, which semi-quantitatively measure hematuria and proteinuria, to correctly select urine specimens found by microscopy to have Schistosoma haematobium eggs was studied in 359 previously unscreened Kenyan primary school children. The presence of and degree of hematuria and proteinuria were highly correlated with the presence of S. haematobium eggs and with egg counts in urine specimens. Hematuria was more strongly correlated with S. haematobium egg counts than was proteinuria. The ability of presence of hematuria or proteinuria, or both, to select all microscopically positive cases of urinary schistosomiasis for treatment was tested using sensitivity (ST) and specificity (SP) analysis. Selection of cases using 1) presence of hematuria alone, and 2) presence of either hematuria or proteinuria had the highest combined ST and SP (88% ST, 97% SP; 91% ST, 92% SP, respectively). Most of the few cases detected by microscopy but not by reagent strips had low egg counts. The presence of hematuria alone failed to detect only 12% of S. haematobium-positive cases (mostly low egg counts), and only 3% of S. haematobium-negative persons had urinary blood and would have received unnecessary treatment. Preliminary studies on the use of reagent strips to screen previously infected children 6 months after treatment, and the effects of seasonal variations in temperature and humidity on urine specimen volume, egg counts, and reagent strip results are also presented. The practical field use and cost of reagent strips in S. haematobium control programs are discussed.Proteinuria and haematuria as predictors of schistosomiasis in children.Examination of urine samples from 922 children from Epe and surrounding communities in south-western Nigeria indicated a 13% prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium infection. Children, 10-14 years of age, accounted for 65% of the disease prevalence. Approximately 79% of the study population was negative for proteinuria, while 52.6% of children with 30 mg% proteinuria were positive for S. haematobium infection. However, 96% and 100% of all children who, respectively, had 30 mg% and 100 mg% proteinuria, in addition to haematuria, were found to be positive for the schistosome infection. This finding indicates that the use of haematuria and proteinuria as a combined diagnostic index significantly increased the sensitivity and specificity of the individual tests. Bacteriuria was found in 8.5% of infected children, compared with 5.2% of the control group. Streptococcus faecalis and E. coli were the two bacteria isolated from the urine specimens.The diagnostic potential of three indirect tests for urinary schistosomiasis in Nigeria.Schistosomiasis is one of the major parasitic infections of man in the tropical and subtropical areas of the world. Diagnosis of the disease is usually based on microscopic detection of eggs in excreta which is both laborious and time consuming. In Nigeria, the Government's emphasis on the control of the disease dictates the need for a simple, fast, reliable and affordable diagnostic test for the identification of infected communities and detection of infected persons. Three indirect diagnostic tests for urinary schistosomiasis: interview technique, visual examination for macrohaematuria and the use of a chemical reagent strip were employed in screening 1056 individuals of the Kainji Lake area of Nigeria for urinary schistosomiasis, using haematuria as the disease indicator. The sensitivity of the three tests were determined using the filtration (egg counting) technique as the reference test. The sensitivity of the reagent strip test was 69.0% and 44 and 38% for the interview technique and visual examination respectively. The reagent strip test was particularly useful for screening children (5-19 years old). The implication of these findings are discussed.In Nigeria, where control of schistosomiasis is a public health goal, diagnosis based on microscopic detection of eggs in excreta is both labor-intensive and time-consuming. The present study evaluated the diagnostic potential of 3 indirect tests for urinary schistosomiasis in 1056 children and adults from Nigeria's Kainji Lake area: interview technique, visual examination for macrohematuria, and use of a chemical reagent strip. Sensitivity was determined through use of the filtration (egg counting) technique as the reference diagnosis. Sensitivity was 69% for the reagent strip test, 44% for the interview technique, and 38% for visual examination. The reagent strip was particularly sensitive for screening children 5-19 years of age. All 3 tests showed increases in sensitivity with increases in infection intensity.A five-country evaluation of a point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen urine assay for the prevalence of Schistosoma mansoni.We evaluated a commercial point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen (POC-CCA) test for assessing Schistosoma mansoni infection prevalence in areas at risk. Overall, 4,405 school-age children in Cameroon, Côte d'Ivoire, Ethiopia, Kenya, and Uganda provided urine for POC-CCA testing and stool for Kato-Katz assays. By latent class analysis, one POC-CCA test was more sensitive (86% versus 62%) but less specific (72% versus ~100%) than multiple Kato-Katz smears from one stool. However, only 1% of POC-CCA tests in a non-endemic area were false positives, suggesting the latent class analysis underestimated the POC-CCA specificity. Multivariable modeling estimated POC-CCA as significantly more sensitive than Kato-Katz at low infection intensities (< 100 eggs/gram stool). By linear regression, 72% prevalence among 9-12 year olds by POC-CCA corresponded to 50% prevalence by Kato-Katz, whereas 46% POC-CCA prevalence corresponded to 10% Kato-Katz prevalence. We conclude that one urine POC-CCA test can replace Kato-Katz testing for community-level S. mansoni prevalence mapping.Rapid diagnosis of schistosomiasis in Yemen using a simple questionnaire and urine reagent strips.Schistosomiasis ranks second to malaria in terms of socioeconomic and public health importance in Yemen. This study assessed the validity of a morbidity questionnaire and urine reagent strips as a rapid tool for screening schoolchildren for urinary schistosomiasis as compared with the presence of eggs in urine as the gold-standard parasitological diagnosis. The study examined urine samples and interviewed 696 children (mean age 12.5 years) attending a primary-preparatory school in south Yemen. Urinary schistosomiasis was confirmed in 126 (18.1%) children. Diagnostic performance was poor for 2 items in the morbidity questionnaire (self-reported history of previous infection and self-reported history of antischistosomal treatment). However, self-reported dysuria, self-reported haematuria in the questionnaire and microhaematuria by reagent strips (alone or with macrohaematuria) revealed good diagnostic performance. The results indicated that reagent strips are a valid method for detection of microhaematuria for identifying individuals and communities infected with Schistosoma haematobium. التشخيص السريع لداء البلهارسيات في اليمن باستخدام استبيان بسيط مع أشرطة كواشف للبولحسن بسيوني، علي حسب، نسرين النمر، لطيفة الشيباني، علي الوليدييحتل داء البلهارسيات الموقع الثاني بعد الملاريا من حيث الأهمية من وجهة نظر الصحة العمومية في اليمن. وتقيِّم هذه الدراسة صحة استبيان يتناول المراضة مع استخدام أشرطة وكواشف للبول، باعتبارهما أداتَيْن سريعتَيْن لتحري أطفال المدارس بحثاً عن داء البلهارسيات البولي، ومقارنة ذلك بوجود البيوض في البول باعتباره المعيار الذهبي للتشخيص بفحص الطفيليات. وقد شملت الدراسة فحص عينات بول مع مقابلة 696 طفلاً (وسطي أعمارهم 12.5 عاماً) ممن يداومون في مدرسة ابتدائية في جنوب اليمن. وقد تأكَّد تشخيص داء البلهارسيات البولي لدى 126 طفلاً (18.1%). واتضح أن الأداء التشخيصي كان سيئاً في بندَيْن اثنَيْن من بنود استبيان المراضة (وهما الإبلاغ الذاتي عن سوابق عدوى بولية سابقة، والإبلاغ الذاتي عن سوابق معالجة مضادة للبلهارسيا). وبالمقابل فقد أثبت كل من الإبلاغ الذاتي عن عسر التبول، والإبلاغ الذاتي عن تبول الدم في الاستبيان، وكشف أو كاشف وجود الدم في البول بكميات زهيدة بالفحص المجهري بالأشرطة ذات الكواشف (لوحده أو مع وجود الدم في البول بالعين المجردة) أنها ذات أداء تشخيصي جيد. وتشير النتائج إلى أن الأشرطة ذات الكواشف تعتبر طريقة صحيحة لكشف وجود البول في الدم بكميات زهيدة، من أجل التعرف على الأفراد والمجتمعات المصابة بعدوى البلهارسيا الدموية.Diagnostic rapide de la schistosomiase au Yémen à l’aide d’un questionnaire simple et de bandelettes urinaires réactives.La schistosomiase vient en deuxième place après le paludisme en termes de poids socioéconomique et de problème de santé publique au Yémen. La présente étude a évalué la validité d’un questionnaire sur la morbidité ainsi que des bandelettes urinaires réactives comme outils rapides de dépistage de la schistosomiase urinaire chez des écoliers par rapport à la recherche d’œufs dans les urines en tant que méthode diagnostique parasitologique de référence. Au cours de l’étude, les échantillons d’urine de 696 enfants fréquentant une école primaire ou préparatoire dans le sud du Yémen ont été examinés, puis les enfants ont été interrogés (âge moyen 12,5 ans). Une schistosomiase urinaire a été confirmée chez 126 enfants (18,1 %). La performance du diagnostic était médiocre pour deux items du questionnaire sur la morbidité (antécédents autodéclarés d’une infection antérieure et d’un traitement contre la schistosomiase). Toutefois, une dysurie autodéclarée, une hématurie autodéclarée dans le questionnaire et une microhématurie par bandelettes urinaires réactives (seule ou associée à une macrohématurie) ont fait ressortir une bonne performance diagnostique. Les résultats ont indiqué que les bandelettes urinaires réactives étaient une méthode valable pour le dépistage de la microhématurie permettant d’identifier les personnes et les communautés infestées par Schistosoma haematobium.Frequency of haematuria and proteinuria among Schistosoma haematobium infected children of two communities from Liberia and Tanzania.The frequencies of haematuria and proteinuria among children of two rural communities with different Schistosoma haematobium endemicity from Liberia and Tanzania were compared. Although the prevalence and intensity of S. haematobium infections were lower in the Tanzanian community, the frequencies of haematuria and proteinuria were significantly higher when compared to the Liberian community. The semi-quantitative dip stick tests for haematuria and proteinuria showed a comparable, good specificity (haematuria 85%, proteinuria 80%), but a community-specific sensitivity. The dip stick test for haematuria detected 85% (proteinuria 82%) of all S. haematobium infected subjects in Tanzania compared to 68% (proteinuria 57%) in Liberia. The significance of these observations in relation to S. haematobium related morbidity is discussed.A study of some factors influencing the epidemiology of urinary schistosomiasis at Ifakara (Kilombero District, Morogoro Region, Tanzania).Some factors influencing the epidemiology of urinary schistosomiasis were studied at Ifakara between 1978 and 1980. Ifakara is situated in the fertile plain of the Kilombero river in the south-eastern part of Tanzania. The overall prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium infection among primary school children (6-19 years) in the Ifakara agglomeration was 21% (730/3478). The highest prevalence was observed in both sexes in the age group 15-19 years. Distinct variations in prevalence were found between the individual schools examined, ranging from 5 to 71% and indicating a focal transmission of the disease. The intensity of S. haematobium infection in the individual schools was relatively low, ranging from 5 to 36 eggs/10 ml urine. However, the frequency of microhaematuria among infected subjects was high, reaching 100% from an egg output of 50 eggs/10 ml onwards. Forty-nine waterbodies--most of them man-made--with Bulinus (Ph.) globosus and/or B. (Ph.) nasutus were found, 12 of them harboured B. (Ph.) globosus shedding cercariae of the mammalian type. These waterbodies were mainly localized in the northern and north-eastern areas of Ifakara where the primary schools with the highest prevalence of S. haematobium were found. Most of these waterbodies were known to be bathing places for the children. Susceptibility experiments with B. (Ph.) globosus and B. (Ph.) nasutus indicated that B. (Ph.) globosus is possibly the only intermediate host for S. haematobium in the areas examined. No Biomphalaria, the intermediate hosts for S. mansoni, were found. In addition, the knowledge and awareness of the local population about urinary schistosomiasis were assessed by a questionnaire survey.Proteinuria, hematuria, and leukocyturia in children with mixed urinary and intestinal schistosomiasis.Quantitative parasitological assessment and quantitative analysis of proteinuria, hematuria, and leukocyturia were carried out in 182 Sudanese schoolboys with mixed urinary and intestinal schistosomiasis. Pathological proteinuria was found in 73% of patients (median = 380, 95% confidence limits = 200 to 500 mg/liter). The median protein/creatinine ratio was 0.54. SDS polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis showed an excretion of albumin, transferrin, and IgG consistent with a postrenal pattern of proteinuria. Pathological erythrocyturia occurred in 84% of patients (median = 255, 95% CL = 95 to 629 cells/microliter) and leukocyturia in 77% of patients (median = 148, 95% CL = 93 to 246 cells/microliter). Phase contrast microscopy revealed intact erythrocytes, suggestive of postrenal hemorrhage. Proteinuria, erythrocyturia, and leukocyturia correlated significantly with the ova excretion in the urine, but not with egg excretion in the stool. Oxamniquine reduced ova excretion in the stool but did not influence pathological urine findings. In patients treated effectively with Praziquantel or Metrifonate, pathological PU, EU, and LU decreased markedly 1 month post treatment. PU in severely proteinuric patients reached physiological values 5 months post therapy. We suggest that the proteinuria, erythrocyturia, and leukocyturia in mixed schistosomiasis were of postrenal origin.Blood in the urine of adolescent girls in an area of Ghana with a low prevalence of infection with Schistosoma haematobium.Relationship between circulating antigen level and morbidity in Schistosoma mansoni-infected children evaluated by ultrasonography.Ninety-eight Schistosoma mansoni-infected children from an endemic area in Sharkia Governorate, Egypt were evaluated by abdominal ultrasonography to determine liver and spleen sizes, grade of periportal fibrosis, and splenic vein diameter. Circulating antigen levels were measured using a double sandwich ELISA in which the sensitivity was 91.8% and specificity was > 99%, with no evidence of cross-reactivity with other parasites. No significant relationship was observed between antigen level and clinical stages of the disease as assessed by physical examination (P > 0.05). When ultrasound was used to stage disease, the mean antigen level was significantly higher among hepatosplenic cases than intestinal cases (P < 0.05). No difference in mean antigen levels were found between the splenic and hepatic cases. Furthermore, a direct correlation (P < 0.01) was observed between antigen level and disease severity as monitored by ultrasonography. Antigen level showed a positive correlation with the degree of periportal fibrosis (P < 0.05). Moreover, a significant increase in the percent of children who were antigen positive (> 80 ng/ml) was found in those with more severe periportal fibrosis (P < 0.001). The findings suggest that ultrasonography along with measurement of circulating antigen levels predict morbidity in schistosomiasis mansoni.Detection of urinary schistosomiasis in a low prevalence region.A simple technique to pretreat urine and serum samples for quantitation of schistosome circulating anodic and cathodic antigen.For the detection of the circulating schistosome antigens CAA (circulating anodic antigen) and CCA (circulating cathodic antigen) in serum and urine samples of Schistosoma infected individuals, pretreatment of samples with trichloroacetic acid (TCA) is a standard procedure. In the present study several methods were evaluated in order to develop a more simple and rapid technique than the--especially for pretreatment of urine samples--laborious TCA technique. Optimal results were obtained with a method in which serum or urine samples were pretreated by a heat-incubation step (70 degrees C, 30 min) in an alkaline buffer (pH 9.6). In a comparison of the new technique with the TCA pretreatment, serum and urine samples of S. mansoni infected individuals from Zaire (n = 80) and of uninfected controls from The Netherlands (n = 208) were pretreated and assayed for CAA and CCA. Both pretreatment techniques showed similar sensitivities and specificities for CAA and CCA in serum, and CCA in urine. However, for the determination of CAA in urine the new technique performed significantly better, resulting in an increase of the sensitivity from 32 to 70% (titre determination).Schistosomiasis prevalence after administration of praziquantel to school children in Melela village, Morogoro region, Tanzania.A study of the prevalence of schistosomiasis was carried out in 253 school children in Melela, Tanzania, one year after a single dose of praziquantel, 40 mg/kg body weight. The cure rate was 90.4%. However the new incidence estimate was 21.2% in children who were initially negative. The use of reagent strips in urine tests for the detection of urinary schistosomiasis was also evaluated. The presence of blood in the urine was highly sensitive (> 96%) and specific (87%). The sensitivity of proteinuria was less, but it was highly specific (94%). This study shows that chemotherapy will have to be combined with other measures to achieve lasting benefits and raises the question as to how often the population should be treated. It also confirms the value of urine test strips as an indirect diagnostic test for urinary schistosomiasis in an endemic area. Further follow-up is necessary to make useful predictions concerning incidence and reinfection rates in the community. This will also help in deciding how often chemotherapy should be given to the population.Diagnostic accuracy of different urine dipsticks to detect urinary schistosomiasis: a comparative study in five endemic communities in Osun and Ogun States, Nigeria.The diagnostic accuracy of urine dipsticks was investigated using two different brands in five endemic communities of south-western Nigeria. The BM-5L test was used in 1992 to screen 566 subjects in two communities in Ogun State, while 1457 subjects in three other communities in Osun State were screened with the Combur-9 test in 2006. Haematuria gave a higher prevalence of infection than proteinuria irrespective of which strip brand was used (e.g. BM-5L test: 58.3 and 36.2%; Combur-9 test: 46.5 and 41.9%, respectively). Compared with egg microscopy (gold standard), haematuria identified over 90% of egg-positive samples using either the BM-5L test in 1992 or the Combur-9 test in 2006. The corresponding values for proteinuria were 58% using the BM-5L test and 82% using the Combur-9 test. Sensitivity of haematuria to infection was higher using the BM-5L test (92.4-93.5%) than Combur-9 (58.6-73.3%), while sensitivity of proteinuria to infection was higher using Combur-9 (55.5-80.4%) than BM-5L test (26.0-58.3%). However, both strip brands have comparable specificity for haematuria (BM-5L test, 88.3-99.5%; Combur-9, 88.9-100%) and proteinuria (BM-5L test, 94.4-100%; Combur-9, 98.7-100%) to infection. Based on these results we conclude that neither brand nor manufacturer has a significance effect on the performance of chemical reagent strips. However, the diagnostic value of both haematuria and proteinuria varied according to the positivity level adopted, intensity of infection and age, but was not affected by sex and village of residence.Schistosomiasis haematobia in coast province Kenya. Relationship between egg output and morbidity.Several studies of schistosomiasis haematobia in Africa have revealed a correlation between intensity of infection as measured by urine egg counts and severity of disease as determined by intravenous pyelography. The present study consisted of a survey of 390 school children in the coastal area of Kenya involving a single egg count, and intravenous pyelograms in a stratified random sample of 69 children; the results showed a greater prevalence of urinary tract disease in those with higher intensities of infection. This survey was then followed by a more detailed study in which nine consecutive daily egg counts were done on 121 children; 17 of these children, subdivided into three groups with different intensities in infection, were given intravenous pyelograms. The results were similar in the 11 children with minimal and moderate counts (averaging, respectively, less than 1 egg and 167 eggs/10 ml urine daily), with approximately 30% having bladder or renal abnormalities. In comparison, all of the six children with heavy counts (averaging 1,288 eggs/10 ml urine daily) had bladder lesions and five of them had renal lesions.Urinary schistosomiasis in Zimbabwean school children: predictors of morbidity.The morbid effects of urinary bilharziasis are becoming more evident with the advent of sophisticated diagnostics such as ultrasound. However, such diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium morbidity is often hampered by lack of funds, proper equipment, or training.We performed a cross-sectional investigation of schoolchildren in a highly endemic area of east central Zimbabwe in order to assess the utility of a number of simple clinical indicators to predict Schistosoma haematobium morbidity.Prevalence and intensity of S. haematobium infection was determined in 551 schoolchildren, with ultrasound examination of the kidneys and bladder performed on 222. The association of a number of demographic, parasitological, and clinical parameters with clinical outcome was evaluated.Overall, 60% of the children were infected with S. haematobium . Although lacking specificity, proteinuria and parasite eggs count best predicted bladder pathology. Presence of kidney dilation was associated with fatigue and pain upon urination, but these variables were not very sensitive.None of the variables assessed were ideal predictors of morbidity. However, the results suggest that a combination of inexpensive, simple indicators may allow for improved targeting of S. haematobium treatment to those with severe morbidity and better monitoring of the progress of control campaigns when more expensive diagnostic methods are not available.Evaluation of reagent strips in urine tests for detection of Schistosoma haematobium infection: a comparative study in Ghana and Zambia.The presence of haematuria and proteinuria, detected by reagent strips, was compared with Schistosoma haematobium egg counts in the urines of human subjects from two epidemiologically distinct areas in Ghana and Zambia. In children and adults in both areas, the individual or combined semiquantitative levels of proteinuria and haematuria were related directly to increasing urinary egg counts. In both areas the presence of blood in the urine was highly specific (greater than 85%) and sensitive, being positive in 97% of urine specimens with more than 64 eggs per 5-ml sample of urine. The sensitivity of the protein indicator was also high, but its specificity was less than the blood indicator. The specificity of combined proteinuria and haematuria was higher than either alone; on the other hand, the sensitivity was lower than either alone. At each level of proteinuria and haematuria, the geometric mean urinary egg count was higher in Ghana than in Zambia. This study confirms the necessity to evaluate indirect diagnostic techniques in each endemic country, in order to establish criteria for their interpretation, before wide-scale use.Schistosoma haematobium infection in Egyptian schoolchildren: demonstration of both hepatic and urinary tract morbidity by ultrasonography.Parasitological, clinical and ultrasonographical studies were performed upon 422 schoolchildren aged 12-16 years living in a village in the Fayoum where Schistosoma haematobium, but not S. mansoni, was transmitted. Over half of the children gave a history of receiving praziquantel therapy during the preceding 2 years. Symptoms (e.g., haematuria, burning micturition), signs (e.g., hepatomegaly, splenomegaly) and urinary findings (e.g., haematuria, proteinuria) correlated better with the presence and intensity of S. haematobium infection after correcting for this variable. Renal obstructive lesions detected by ultrasound were 2 and 3 times as common in those with moderate and heavy infections as in those with no or light infections, and urinary bladder wall lesions were far more frequent in those with moderate and heavy infections. A mild grade of periportal fibrosis, hepatomegaly and splenomegaly were present in some children in all groups. However, the prevalence of splenomegaly correlated directly with the intensity of infection; liver lesions occurred much more frequently in children with infection or a history of treated infection than in non-infected children denying recent treatment; and no child had hepatomegaly or splenomegaly in the absence of periportal fibrosis.Urinary schistosomiasis: testing with urine filtration and reagent sticks for haematuria provides a comparable prevalence estimate.The relationship between school prevalence rates of urinary schistosomiasis, measured by urine filtration and by reagent sticks detecting haematuria, was investigated in nine primary schools in Tanzania. The aim of the study was to provide a methodological tool to compare results from studies that used these two different diagnostic techniques. A strong correlation was found between both measures (r = 0.96, P < 0.0001), and the equation of this linear relationship could be used to extrapolate the parasitological prevalence rate on the basis of the reagent stick testing, or the reverse. A review of the available literature indicated that the relationship holds true for certain settings, mainly in East Africa, but not for others, and it is therefore likely to be setting-specific. The same data demonstrated also a good relationship, at school level, between the mean school parasitological intensity and the sensitivity of the reagent sticks. A comparative testing of two different reagent stick brands (Hemastix and Combur 9) on 320 samples showed that the latter detected about 1.2-times more haematuria positives, and that this had also to be taken into account when aiming for a comparison of different techniques.Relation between intensity of Schistosoma haematobium infection and clinical haematuria and proteinuria.In an endemic area on Lake Volta, Ghana, urinary blood and protein levels as determined by chemical reagent strips in persons infected with Schistosoma haematobium, particularly in children aged between 5 and 14, correlated positively with urinary egg counts. Geometric mean S haematobium egg counts were 10 or more times higher in urine specimens with at least 10 mg/dl of protein and detectable haematuria than in those without detectable blood or protein. Chemical reagent strips were both specific and sensitive for detection of urinary blood associated with S haematobium infection. This simple technique could be useful for screening entire populations in which urinary schistosomiasis is endemic so that heavily infected persons needing specific treatment can be identified.Circulating antigens for assessing cure in schistosomiasis mansoni.An antigen capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay using antibodies made in rabbits and sheep to adult Schistosoma mansoni extract antigens has been developed and evaluated as a diagnostic test for schistosomiasis. 25 of 42 patients with S. mansoni infections had detectable circulating antigen while sera from all of 45 normal subjects and patients with other parasitic infections did not react. When the 25 with antigenaemia were retested 3 months after treatment, all 21 who were cured were negative while the 4 with persisting S. mansoni eggs in their stools remained positive. Antibodies to a fractionated egg antigen (CEF6) also diminished in most patients following successful treatment, but the reduction was insufficient to predict successful therapy.The epidemiology of schistosomiasis in Egypt: Minya Governorate.Risk factors, prevalence, and intensity of infection with Schistosoma sp. and prevalence and magnitude of morbidity caused by schistosomiasis was assessed in a stratified random sample of 16,433 subjects from 2,409 households in 33 rural communities in Minya Governorate, Egypt. The prevalence of S. haematobium ranged from 1.9% to 32.7% among the communities and averaged 8.9%. The average intensity of infection was a geometric mean egg count (GMEC) of 8.5 per 10 ml of urine and ranged from 1.6 to 30.9. Prevalence was maximum (18-20%) in those 10-20 years of age and higher in males than in females. Intensity of infection followed the same pattern. Infection with S. mansoni was present almost exclusively in a single village, confirming spread of this species up the Nile River and its focality in Minya. Risk factors for S. haematobium infection were an age from 11 to 20; male gender; males bathing in, women washing clothing or utensils in, and children swimming or playing in canals; and a history of, or treatment for, schistosomiasis. Recent history of burning micturition was associated with infection in children but not in adults, while a history of blood in urine correlated with S. haematobium infection in both age groups. Reagent strip-detected hematuria and proteinuria were highly associated, particularly in children, with S. haematobium infection. The presence of hepatomegaly or splenomegaly on physical examination was not associated with S. haematobium ova in the urine. Hepatomegaly, as measured by ultrasonography in the midclavicular line or the midsternal line, or ultrasonography-detected splenomegaly were not present more frequently in infected subjects than in uninfected subjects. Schistosoma ova were not detected more frequently in urine of subjects with ultrasonography-detected periportal fibrosis than in the urine from subjects without this finding. Ultrasonography-detected urinary bladder wall lesions were detected in only 6 (0.3%) subjects and obstructive uropathy was observed in 54 (2.7%) subjects. The absence of an association between prevalence of urinary tract morbidity and S. haematobium infections was surprising. Two possible explanations are 1) that repeated chemotherapy has reduced the prevalence of urinary tract morbidity and 2) that morbidity was not being detected by the ultrasonographic operators.The epidemiology of schistosomiasis in Egypt: Assiut governorate.In the Assiut, Egypt Epidemiology 1, 2, 3 investigation, a sample of 14,204 persons in 10 villages, 31 ezbas (satellite communities), and 2,286 households was drawn from a rural population of 1,598,607. Parasitologic examination of urine and stool were made for Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni, and physical and ultrasound examinations were made on a 20% subsample. The overall estimated prevalence of S. haematobium was 5.2 +/- 0.5 (+/- SE). This varied considerably by village and ezba, ranging from 1.5% to 20.9%, with ezbas having a slightly higher overall prevalence than villages. The overall estimated geometric mean egg count was 6.6 +/- 0.5 eggs per 10 ml of urine and was consistently low throughout the communities. Infection with S. haematobium was associated with age (peak prevalence of 10.6 +/- 1.5% in 15-19-year-old age group) males, children playing in the canals, a history of blood in the urine, and reagent strip positivity for hematuria and proteinuria. The prevalence of either hepatomegaly or splenomegaly detected by physical examination was low (4.0% and 1.5%, respectively). The prevalence of hepatomegaly determined by ultrasonography was substantially higher, 24.1%. The prevalence of periportal fibrosis (PPF) was 12.0%, but grade II or III PPF was present in less than 1%. Ultrasonography-determined hepatomegaly, in both the midclavicular line and the midsternal line, increased by age to more than 30%. Periportal fibrosis was more common in the age groups in which infection rates were the highest. At the village and ezba level of analysis, the prevalence of hepatomegaly, splenomegaly, and PPF tended to be higher in communities having the highest prevalence of infection with S. haematobium.The epidemiology of schistosomiasis in Egypt: Fayoum Governorate.Health questionnaires and parasitologic examinations of urine and stool were performed upon a stratified random sample of 7,710 individuals from 1,109 households in 21 rural communities in Fayoum Governorate, Egypt in 1992 to investigate the prevalence of, risk factors for, and changing pattern of, infection with Schistosoma sp. in the governorate. A subset, every fifth household, or 1,038 subjects, had physical and ultrasound examinations to investigate prevalence of, and risk factors for, morbidity. The prevalence of S. haematobium ranged from 0% to 27.1% and averaged 13.7%. The geometric mean egg count (GMEC) was 10.0 eggs/10 ml of urine. Age-stratified prevalence and intensity of infection were 18-25% and 10-15 eggs/10 ml of urine in those 5-25 years of age. Schistosoma mansoni were detected in inhabitants of 13 communities, but 78.5% of the infections were focally present in a group of 4 satellite hamlets around a single village. The overall prevalence of S. mansoni in the governorate was 4.3% and the GMEC was 44.0 ova/g of stool. Risk factors for infection with either species were male gender, an age <20 years, living in smaller communities, and exposures to canal water by males. Histories of burning micturation, blood in the urine, or prior schistosomiasis and reagent strip-detected hematuria and proteinuria were risks for S. haematobium, but not for S. mansoni. Both urinary tract and higher grades of hepatic morbidity were rare. Obstructive uropathy was present in 6.3% of the subjects and was more common in males and older people. Ultrasonography-detected bladder lesions were present in 5.2% and correlated with S. haematobium only in younger subjects and in those with hematuria and proteinuria. The prevalences of hepatomegaly, splenomegaly, and periportal fibrosis (PPF) were associated with each other and increased with age and in males. Ultrasonography-detected hepatomegaly and splenomegaly were weakly associated with S. mansoni infections only in children. The prevalence of PPF was greater in the 4 communities with >25% S. mansoni infection rates in comparison with the 17 other villages and ezbas. Transmission of S. mansoni is focally well established in Fayoum, which also has the highest prevalence of S. haematobium in the governorates surveyed by the Epidemiology 1, 2, 3 Project. However, both urinary tract and hepatic morbidity are relatively rare in the governorate. This probably results from the long-standing schistosomiasis control program in Fayoum, which suppressed intensity more than prevalence of infection, leading to less community morbidity.The epidemiology of schistosomiasis in Egypt: Qena governorate.Qena is the southernmost governorate of Egypt included in the Epidemiology 1, 2, 3 national study. A probability sample selected 17,822 individuals from 2,950 households in 34 ezbas and 10 villages from a total rural target population of 1,731,252 (based on the most recent 1986 census of the population by the Egyptian Central Agency for Public Mobilization And Statistics). Parasitologic examination of urine and stool were made for Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni, respectively, and physical and ultrasound examinations were made on a 20% subsample. The overall estimated prevalence of S. haematobium was 4.8 +/- 0.7% (+/-SE) and geometric mean egg count (GMEC) was 7.0 ova per 10 ml of urine. Considerable variation in prevalence was observed between the villages and ezbas, ranging from 0.0% to 20%, with the smaller ezbas having a slightly higher overall prevalence. The age- and sex-specific patterns of S. haematobium showed typical peak prevalence in early adolescence, with males having a higher prevalence than females. A history of hematuria was associated with current infection (odds ratio = 3.6, 95% confidence interval = 2.32-5.63). Hepatomegaly and splenomegaly determined by physical examination present in 7.9% and 3.0%, respectively. Ultrasonography-determined hepatomegaly of the left liver lobe was found in 10.1%. Ultrasonography-detected hepatomegaly in both the left and right lobes increased in prevalence from approximately 5% in children to 15-20% in adults. The prevalence of ultrasonography-detected splenomegaly increased slightly with age. Grade III periportal fibrosis was detected in only 2 individuals in the sample. Bladder wall lesions and obstructive uropathy were also very infrequent. Other associations with these measures are given. Most villages and ezbas had an S. mansoni prevalence of less than 1%. The exception was Nag'a El-Sheikh Hamad, where the prevalence was 10.3 +/- 0.5% (GMEC = 57.4 +/- 2.6). Two other communities also had a prevalence >1% (Ezbet Sarhan and Kom Heitin).Hematuria and proteinuria as predictors of Schistosoma haematobium infection.An investigation of a population-based stratified random sample of 11,970 inhabitants of Minya Governorate in Egypt included examining urine specimens for Schistosoma haematobium ova using the filtration technique and for hematuria and proteinuria using reagent strips. Age- and gender-specific sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, and likelihood ratios of reagent strip-detected hematuria and proteinuria as indicators of S. haematobium infection were assessed. Results showed that in this population with a 9.0% infection rate, sensitivity (from 45.9 to 70.9) and specificity (from 65.9 to 86.3) were much lower than in previous reports. The most clinically valuable parameters, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and likelihood ratio (LR), were highest with the presence of hematuria > or = +++ and proteinuria > or = ++, especially in males less than 20 years of age. Using the LR allowed effective altering of the pretest probability of infection among age and gender subgroups. The study concluded that reagent strip-detected hematuria and proteinuria, although valuable, are less reliable predictors of S. haematobium within communities than previously reported and their usefulness is improved with stratification by age and gender. In addition, predictive values and likelihood ratios provide practical information for predicting the presence or absence of infection within population subgroups.The public health significance of urinary schistosomiasis as a cause of morbidity in two districts in Mali.Schistosoma haematobium-related morbidity was studied in the perennial irrigation area of Office du Niger and the small reservoirs area of Plateau Dogon in Mali. Questionnaire, clinical, parasitologic, and ultrasound examination data were collected from 1,041 individuals at the baseline survey in 1991; 705 were re-examined one year after treatment. At baseline, the overall prevalence of S. haematobium infection was 55.2%; half of those infected had no clinical symptoms and 30% had pathologic lesions. Both infection and morbidity were more frequent in children than in adults, with a peak prevalence at 7-14 years of age. The rates of lesions were more than twice as high in those heavily infected as in lightly infected individuals. Reagent strip testing for microhematuria was more sensitive in detecting individuals with pathologic lesions than in detecting individuals with infection. One year after treatment with praziquantel, more than 80% of the urinary tract lesions had cleared. It is concluded that S. haematobium-related morbidity is frequent in Mali, but passive case detection for treatment would not cover a great deal of early stages of the disease; active intervention using reagent strip testing for microhematuria at the most peripheral levels would be an efficient system for morbidity control and monitoring of control operations.Relating serum circulating anodic antigens to faecal egg counts in Schistosoma mansoni infections: a modelling approach.Circulating anodic antigen (CAA) levels in serum and faecal egg counts are both quantitative measures of Schistosoma mansoni worm burdens. In this study, we have tested whether circulating anodic antigens can be included into an established egg count model. A data set with 3 repeated faecal egg count and serum CAA measurements of 50 individuals from a community in Burundi with moderate endemicity was used. By means of Monte Carlo simulation, both antigens and egg counts were related to an underlying worm pair distribution, taking into account the variation in repeated measurements (within individuals) and the variation in worm burdens (between individuals). Models with various assumptions (e.g. presence or absence of density-dependent egg production) were tested. Whereas observed and predicted egg counts agreed fairly well, the circulating antigen data could not be described satisfactorily. In particular, the predicted number of negative antigen concentrations was much lower than observed, while the number of light positives was overestimated. There seems to be a mechanism that causes a shift of expected (low) positive CAA concentrations towards zeros, which the proposed models do not provide for. Possible biological as well as assay-related mechanisms that may account for this shift are discussed. The assumption that serum CAA concentrations are a simple direct reflection of worm (pair) burdens could not be corroborated by this modelling exercise. Apparently, the relationship between (measured) CAA concentrations, egg counts and worm burdens in human S. mansoni infections is more complex than assumed.[Value of macroscopic urine examination and reagent strips for the detection of hematuria and proteinuria in the mass diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis, before and after treatment].In this study, dip-stick examination for the detection of hematuria and proteinuria, and macroscopic examination of the urine as diagnostic methods for mass screening for urinary schistosomiasis, were compared with the technique of urinary filtration for Schistosoma haematobium eggs. Dip-sticks and macroscopic examination were proved to be simple and rapid. Before treatment, the revealing of hematuria by dip-stick was shown to be a sensitive method by comparison with filtration, but it is not specific. The tests for proteinuria, and macroscopic examination are more specific, but less sensitive. Nevertheless, all these methods give similar prevalences as distributed by age groups. Dip-sticks and macroscopic exams could therefore be duly considered for the detection of new high endemic regions. After treatment, these methods result in less valid prevalences than those obtained by filtration, but their specificity increases; they become good indicators of clinical improvement.Diagnostic performance of Schistosoma real-time PCR in urine samples from Kenyan children infected with Schistosoma haematobium: day-to-day variation and follow-up after praziquantel treatment.In an effort to enhance accuracy of diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium, this study explores day-to-day variability and diagnostic performance of real-time PCR for detection and quantification of Schistosoma DNA compared to other diagnostic tools in an endemic area before and after treatment.Previously collected urine samples (N = 390) from 114 preselected proven parasitological and/or clinical S. haematobium positive Kenyan schoolchildren were analyzed by a Schistosoma internal transcribed spacer-based real-time PCR after 14 years of storage. Pre-treatment day-to-day fluctuations of PCR and microscopy over three consecutive days were measured for 24 children using intra-class correlation coefficient. A combined 'gold standard' (PCR and/or microscopy positive) was used to measure sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV) of several diagnostic tools at baseline, two and 18 months post-treatment with praziquantel.All 24 repeatedly tested children were PCR-positive over three days with little daily variation in median Ct-values, while 83.3% were found to be egg-positive for S. haematobium at day 1 and 75.0% at day 2 and 3 pre-treatment, signifying daily fluctuations in microscopy diagnosis. Of all 114 preselected schoolchildren, repeated microscopic measurements were required to detect 96.5% versus 100% of positive pre-treatment cases by single PCR. At two months post-treatment, microscopy and PCR detected 22.8% versus 69.3% positive children, respectively. Based on the 'gold standard', PCR showed high sensitivity (>92%) as compared to >31% sensitivity for microscopy, both pre- and post-treatment.Detection and quantification of Schistosoma DNA in urine by real-time PCR was shown to be a powerful and specific diagnostic tool for detection of S. haematobium infections, with less day-to-day variation and higher sensitivity compared to microscopy. The superior performance of PCR before, and two and 18 months post-treatment provides a compelling argument for PCR as an accurate and reproducible tool for monitoring treatment efficacy.[Screening for urinary schistosoma by strips reactive to hematuria. Evaluation in zones of intermediate and weak endemicity in the Ivory Coast].Sticks Hemastix, reactive to haematuria have been tested into a focus ivory coast located in a humid savanna area. Into this focus the prevalence rate of urinary schistosomiasis (Schistosoma haematobium) was 27% taken as a whole and 40% for 5 to 19 years old persons. This study has shown that reactive sticks have a good sensitivity and an acceptable specificity compared with filtration. More, a good correlation between intensity of eggs count and the haematuria is observed.Urinalysis reagent strips in the screening of children for urinary schistosomiasis in the RSA.The use of urinalysis reagent strips (Labstix; Ames) in screening for Schistosoma haematobium infection in various schistosomiasis-endemic areas of the RSA was assessed in 941 children. Sensitivity, specificity, false-positive and false-negative rates and the positive predictive value for haematuria and proteinuria were calculated. Both haematuria and proteinuria were positively correlated with the presence of S. haematobium eggs in the urine. Intensity of infection correlated positively with the degree of haematuria and proteinuria (P less than 0.001). The presence and intensity of S. haematobium infection were more closely related to the presence and degree of haematuria than to proteinuria. Screening for haematuria alone enabled 83.1% of S. haematobium-positive and 89.7% of negative subjects to be detected accurately. The false-positive rate was 2.7%. It was found that a single parameter, haematuria, could be used to identify infected children in endemic areas. It was also found to be possible to use the reagent strips to select out S. haematobium-infected children with egg counts greater than 200 ova/10 ml urine. The simple model developed allows rapid identification of moderately to heavily infected children and can be used by paramedical staff in field situations.Circulating anodic antigen for detection of Schistosoma mansoni infection in Egyptian patients.We evaluated the ability of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) to identify infection with Schistosoma mansoni in a prospective cohort study of 257 Egyptian men, 147 with infection diagnosed by repeated Kato thick smears, and 110 without detectable infection. The CAA levels were obtained and the stool examinations were performed two weeks and one, two, four, and six months after praziquantel therapy for infected men. A CAA enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was repeated twice on subjects who were otherwise negative for schistosomiasis. Circulating anodic antigen was detected in 117 cases, with an overall test sensitivity before treatment of 0.8. Sensitivity was related to the intensity of infection, ranging from 1.00 with > 400 eggs per gram (epg) of feces to 0.60 for those with < 100 epg. After praziquantel therapy, the level of the antigen was significantly reduced. Specificity was excellent before treatment (1.00, 95% confidence interval = 0.97-1.0), but it decreased to 0.98 four months after treatment. Likelihood ratios were significant for all titers > or = 4. We conclude that CAA has moderate sensitivity and excellent specificity when used to identify infection with schistosomiasis, as well as to monitor the results of therapy after at least one month after treatment.Chemotherapy-based control of schistosomiasis haematobia. I. Metrifonate versus praziquantel in control of intensity and prevalence of infection.To determine the effect of targeted field administration of oral chemotherapeutic agents on the prevalence, intensity, and morbidity of Schistosoma haematobium infections, we initiated a long-term school-based program in the Msambweni area of Kwale District, Coast Province, Kenya. Prior to treatment, 69% of the children examined (ages 4-21, n = 2,628) were infected; 34% had moderate or heavy infections (greater than 100 eggs/10 ml urine). Infected individuals were randomized to receive, during one year, either metrifonate (10 mg/kg x 3 doses) or praziquantel, (40 mg/kg x 1 dose). At the end of the first year, prevalence of infection fell to 19%; only 2% of the pupils remained in the moderately and heavily infected groups. Corresponding decreases in the prevalence of hematuria (54% in 1984 vs. 16% in 1985) and proteinuria (56% in 1984 vs. 26% in 1985) were noted. These were associated with significant declines in bladder thickening and irregularities noted during ultrasound examinations, but not with decreases in hydronephrosis. There was no significant difference in the post-treatment prevalence or intensity of infection after treatment with metrifonate as compared with praziquantel. These results demonstrate that field-applied chemotherapy with either agent offers a practical strategy for the control of S. haematobium infection and its associated morbidity.Prevalence and epidemiology of Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium infection in two areas of Egypt recently reclaimed from the desert.Projects are being carried out in many regions of Egypt to reclaim land from the desert for agriculture. This paper presents findings from a baseline epidemiologic study conducted in 1992 in two newly reclaimed areas near Ismailia, Egypt. In the first area, just east of the Suez Canal, 40.0% of the residents tested positive for Schistosoma mansoni and 1.7% tested positive for S. haematobium, while in the second area, 15 km southwest of Ismailia, 49.3% tested positive for S. mansoni and 3.3% tested positive for S. haematobium. The intensities of S. mansoni infection were moderately high, with a geometric mean egg count of 76 eggs/gram of feces among positive individuals in the first area, and 100 eggs/gram of feces in the second area. When compared with a previous study conducted in 1985, the prevalence of S. mansoni infection in the first area has increased from 21.7% to 42.1% among settlers in the last seven years, while that of S. haematobium has decreased from 7.8% to 1.7%. These trends may result from changes in irrigation practices or other alterations in the local environment. There is a risk of schistosomiasis becoming a major public health problem in reclaimed areas if adequate control measures are not taken.The urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) dipstick: a valid substitute for microscopy for mapping and point-of-care diagnosis of intestinal schistosomiasis.The World Health Organization now recommends the provision of praziquantel treatment to preschool-aged children infected with schistosomiasis. For intestinal schistosomiasis the current operational field diagnostic standard is examination of a thick Kato-Katz smear by microscopy prepared from a single stool specimen, and although pragmatic, this methodology has well-known shortcomings. Here, as a potential alternative, the performance of the urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) dipstick test was assessed in terms of disease-mapping and point-of-care diagnosis for intestinal schistosomiasis in preschool-aged children. Our manuscript reports on findings at baseline and at the end of a one-year longitudinal treatment study.A total of 925 children (mean age 2.8 years) were initially recruited from six lakeshore villages representative of high, moderate and low levels of disease transmission. At baseline, all children were tested for intestinal schistosomiasis by microscopic examination of duplicate Kato-Katz smears prepared from a single stool faecal, by antigen detection with the urine CCA dipstick test and by serology with a commercially available ELISA test (as 'gold-standard') that measures host antibody titres to soluble egg antigens. As a point-of-care diagnosis, the urine CCA dipstick test achieved sensitivity and specificity values ranging from 52.5-63.2% and 57.7-75.6%, respectively, with faecal microscopy achieving very high specificities (>87%) but sensitivities as low as 16.7% in the low transmission setting.The urine CCA test was shown to be more effective than faecal microscopy especially in lower transmission settings. The diagnostic performance of this test was not significantly impacted by treatment history or co-infections with other intestinal helminths.Diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni without the stool: comparison of three diagnostic tests to detect Schistosoma [corrected] mansoni infection from filtered urine in Zambia.Diagnosis for intestinal Schistosoma mansoni lacks sensitivity and is arduous to conduct. The standard diagnostic tests, Kato-Katz (KK) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) both lack sensitivity and with KK, require obtaining, transporting, and examining fresh stool. We compared diagnostic efficacy of KK, CCA, and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) to detect S. mansoni infection (species-specific DNA) from 89 filtered urine samples collected in Zambia. The PCR was the strongest indicator of positive cases with sensitivity and specificity of 100% in comparison to CCA (67% and 60%) and KK (50% and 100%). High positive and negative predictive values (100%) were also indicative of robustness of PCR. The same pattern was observed when stratified for sex and age group-specific analysis. Diagnosis of S. mansoni from filtered urine samples by PCR is an effective means to detect low intensity infection and would enhance the effectiveness of surveillance and control programs of schistosomiasis.Diagnosis of schistosomiasis by reagent strip test for detection of circulating cathodic antigen.A newly developed reagent strip assay for the diagnosis of schistosomiasis based on parasite antigen detection in urine of infected individuals was evaluated. The test uses the principle of lateral flow through a nitrocellulose strip of the sample mixed with a colloidal carbon conjugate of a monoclonal antibody specific for Schistosoma circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). The strip assay to diagnose a group of highly infected schoolchildren in Mwanza, Tanzania, demonstrated a high sensitivity and association with the intensity of infection as measured both by egg counts, and by circulating anodic antigen and CCA levels determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. A specificity of ca. 90% was shown in a group of schistosome-negative schoolchildren from Tarime, Tanzania, an area where schistosomiasis is not endemic. The test is easy to perform and requires no technical equipment or special training. The stability of the strips and the conjugate in the dry format lasts for at least 3 months at ambient temperature in sealed packages, making it suitable for transport and use in areas where schistosomiasis is endemic. This assay can easily be developed to an end-user format.Prevalence and intensity of urinary schistosomiasis in primary school children of the Kotto Barombi Health Area, Cameroon.To assess the prevalence and intensity of urinary schistosomiasis in school pupils aged five to sixteen years.Barombi Kotto Health Area, southwest Cameroon.A cross-sectional study.Three hundred and forty seven primary school children.All children found to be infected were treated with praziquantel (biltricide).The study would be able to provide baseline information on the epidemiology of schistosomiasis which is vital for control strategies.The overall prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium in the study areas was 53.6%, with the highest prevalence of 73.9% recorded in Barombi Kotto village. Children resident on Barombi Kotto island were more significantly infected than those on the peripheral mainland (93.3% versus 46.2%, p < 0.01). Prevalence rate and intensity of infection did not vary significantly (p > 0.05) with sex, class or age of the pupils. The mean egg count varied significantly between schools (p < 0.001).Barombi Kotto village was identified as the focus of urinary schistosomiasis, with the highest recorded in children dwelling on the island, the surrounding lake being the main focus of transmission. Focal snail control as an adjunct of chemotherapy and intensive health education for the local population are strongly recommended as a means of reducing the high infection rate in the area.Urinary schistosomiasis-associated morbidity in schoolchildren detected with urine albumin-to-creatinine ratio (UACR) reagent strips.To evaluate urine albumin-to-creatinine ratio (UACR) reagent strips for detection of urinary tract pathology (UTP) associated with urinary schistosomiasis in schoolchildren from Zanzibar.Sixty-six schoolchildren were examined for urinary schistosomiasis and UTP using urine reagent strips (Hemastix, urine microscopy and portable ultrasonography. The UACR was estimated using Microalbustix; univariate and logistic regression methods were used to test for statistical associations.Prevalence of egg-patent schistosomiasis was 65.2% while 77.3% had micro-haematuria and 66.1% had a least one ultrasound-identified UTP. Abnormal UACR (> or =3.4 mg/mmol) was frequent (88.4%) but an unsatisfactory identifier of UTP, albeit highly sensitive: sensitivity (SS) = 100.0%, specificity (SP) = 23.8%, positive predictive value (PPV) = 71.9%, negative predictive value (NPV) = 100.0%. When only severely abnormal UACR was considered (> or =33.9 mg/mmol), SS decreased while SP improved: SS = 58.5%, SP = 61.9%, PPV = 75.0%, NPV = 43.3%.Abnormal and severely abnormal UACRs were strongly associated with egg-patent urinary schistosomiasis and UTP, although via different mechanisms: respectively, from venous blood released directly into the urine from bladder wall perforations, and from leaching sera released from chronic egg-induced lesions throughout the urinary tract. From a control perspective, Microalbustix reagent strips are therefore best applied in pre-screening protocols allowing selection, or rather confident exclusion, of schoolchildren with urinary schistosomiasis for more detailed investigations.The performance of haematuria reagent strips for the rapid mapping of urinary schistosomiasis: field experience from Southern Sudan.The implementation of programmes to control neglected tropical diseases (NTDs) requires up-to-date information on the prevalence and distribution of each NTD. This study evaluated the performance of reagent strip testing for haematuria to diagnose Schistosoma haematobium infection among school-aged children in the context of a rapid mapping survey in Southern Sudan. The reagent strips were highly sensitive (97.8%) but only moderately specific (58.8%). The proportion of false positive diagnoses was significantly higher among girls than boys, especially among girls aged 5-10 years. These findings suggest that reagent strips alone are not sufficient for rapid mapping surveys. A two-step approach is thus recommended whereby haematuria-positive urine samples are subsequently examined using urine filtration.Accuracy of urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) test for Schistosoma mansoni diagnosis in different settings of Côte d'Ivoire.Promising results have been reported for a urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) test for the diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni. We assessed the accuracy of a commercially available CCA cassette test (designated CCA-A) and an experimental formulation (CCA-B) for S. mansoni diagnosis.We conducted a cross-sectional survey in three settings of Côte d'Ivoire: settings A and B are endemic for S. mansoni, whereas S. haematobium co-exists in setting C. Overall, 446 children, aged 8-12 years, submitted multiple stool and urine samples. For S. mansoni diagnosis, stool samples were examined with triplicate Kato-Katz, whereas urine samples were tested with CCA-A. The first stool and urine samples were additionally subjected to an ether-concentration technique and CCA-B, respectively. Urine samples were examined for S. haematobium using a filtration method, and for microhematuria using Hemastix dipsticks.Considering nine Kato-Katz as diagnostic 'gold' standard, the prevalence of S. mansoni in setting A, B and C was 32.9%, 53.1% and 91.8%, respectively. The sensitivity of triplicate Kato-Katz from the first stool and a single CCA-A test was 47.9% and 56.3% (setting A), 73.9% and 69.6% (setting B), and 94.2% and 89.6% (setting C). The respective sensitivity of a single CCA-B was 10.4%, 29.9% and 75.0%. The ether-concentration technique showed a low sensitivity for S. mansoni diagnosis (8.3-41.0%). The specificity of CCA-A was moderate (76.9-84.2%); CCA-B was high (96.7-100%). The likelihood of a CCA-A color reaction increased with higher S. mansoni fecal egg counts (odds ratio: 1.07, p<0.001). A concurrent S. haematobium infection or the presence of microhematuria did not influence the CCA-A test results for S. mansoni diagnosis.CCA-A showed similar sensitivity than triplicate Kato-Katz for S. mansoni diagnosis with no cross-reactivity to S. haematobium and microhematuria. The low sensitivity of CCA-B in our study area precludes its use for S. mansoni diagnosis.Comparison of the circulating anodic antigen detection assay and urine filtration to diagnose Schistosoma haematobium infections in Mali.The applicability of a circulating Schistosoma antigen detection assay for determining rates of infection and efficacy of chemotherapy was evaluated in Mali. Urine egg counts were compared to circulating anodic antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (CAA-ELISA) titres in serum, before and 6 weeks after treatment with a single dose of praziquantel (40 mg/kg), in 2 villages in Dogon Country, an area endemic for S. haematobium, the predominant schistosome infection in Mali. In Kassa, a village with a moderate prevalence of infection, the serological prevalence (48%) was significantly higher than the parasitological prevalence (31%). In Boro, a village with high parasitological prevalence (76%), no difference was observed between the results of both methods (prevalence by CAA-ELISA was 75%). Cure rates estimated by CAA-ELISA were lower than those determined parasitologically, suggesting that cure rates are overestimated by egg counting. The sensitivity of the CAA-ELISA was 78%. In both villages, before treatment, a positive correlation was found between the number of eggs in urine and serum CAA titres. It is concluded that, although further simplification and improvement of the sensitivity of the assay is needed, in its present ELISA format the antigen detection assay is useful for monitoring sentinel populations. Furthermore, the serum CAA assay performed adequately in a public health laboratory within an endemic country.Limited field evaluation of a rapid monoclonal antibody-based dipstick assay for urinary schistosomiasis.A rapid, visually read monoclonal antibody (MoAb)-based dipstick assay for specific diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis was field tested with microscopy and the use of hematuria and proteinuria in a schistosomiasis hematobia endemic area in Southern Ghana. The study group consisted of 229 individuals (114 males and 115 females) aged 1 to 86 years; 145/229 (63.3%) of the subjects submitted stool samples from which no S. mansoni eggs were detected. However, infections with Necator americanus (hookworms) 33.1%, Ascaris lumbricoides 2.8%, Trichuris trichiura (whipworm) 2.8%, and Strongyloides stercoralis 0.7% were detected but did not appear to influence the results of the MoAb-dipstick assay. Urinary schistosomiasis prevalence was estimated as 47.6% by microscopy, 48% by MoAb-dipstick, 39.7% by microhematuria, and 23.6% by proteinuria. The MoAb-dipstick correctly identified 108/109 (99.1%) of microscopically confirmed cases and 118/120 (98.3%) of egg-negative individuals, thereby giving a sensitivity of 99.1% and a specificity of 98.3%. On the other hand, microhematuria and proteinuria were, respectively, 76.1% and 40.4% sensitive, and 94.2% and 92.5% specific when compared to microscopy. Microhematuria and proteinuria had significantly lower sensitivity (P < 0.001) than either microscopy or dipstick.Application of a circulating-cathodic-antigen (CCA) strip test and real-time PCR, in comparison with microscopy, for the detection of Schistosoma haematobium in urine samples from Ghana.In the detection of parasitic infection, the traditional methods based on microscopy often have low sensitivity and/or specificity compared with the newer, molecular tests. An assay based on real-time PCR and a reagent strip test for detecting circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) have both now been compared with urine filtration and microscopy, in the detection of Schistosoma haematobium infections. Urine samples, obtained from 74 'cases' in areas of Ghana with endemic S. haematobium and 79 'controls' from non-endemic areas, were each checked using the three methods. With the results of the filtration and microscopy taken as the 'gold standard', real-time PCR was found to be 100% specific and 89% sensitive whereas the CCA strips were 91% specific and 41% sensitive. With the samples found to contain > or =50 eggs/10 ml (indicating relatively intense infections), the sensitivities of the PCR and CCA were higher, at 100% and 62%, respectively. As expected, egg counts were negatively correlated with the number of amplification cycles needed, in the PCR, to give a signal that exceeded the background (r=-0.38; P<0.01). Although the real-time PCR and CCA strip tests are very different, both show promise in the detection of S. haematobium infections. The PCR has optimal specificity and high sensitivity but the specificity of the CCA strips and the sensitivity of both tools could still be improved. A more thorough re-evaluation of the sensitivity and specificity of microscopy and these newer diagnostic methods, with an estimation of the cost-effectiveness of each technique, is recommended.Circulating antigens levels in different clinical forms of the Schistosoma mansoni infection.With the aim to evaluate the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) levels in relation to the different clinical phases of Schistosoma sp. infection a sandwich ELISA using monoclonal antibody 5H11 was performed. The sera of three groups of 25 Brazilian patients with acute, intestinal and hepatosplenic forms of S. mansoni infection were tested and compared to a non-infected control group. Patients and control groups were matched for age and sex and the number of eggs per gram of feces was equally distributed among the three patient groups. Sensitivity of 100%, 72%, 52% of the assay was observed for the intestinal, hepatosplenic and acute toxemic groups respectively. The specificity was 100%. Intestinal and hepatosplenic groups presented CCA levels significantly higher in comparison to those observed for acute patients (F-ratio = 2,524; p = 0.000 and F-ratio = 6,314; p = 0.015 respectively). There was no significant difference of CCA serum levels between hepatosplenic and intestinal groups (F-ratio = 1,026; p = 0.316).Preliminary study of urinary schistosomiasis in a village in the delta of the Senegal river basin, Senegal.Three years after the first cases of urinary schistosomiasis infection were reported in the village of Mbodiene, Senegal, Schistosoma haematobium eggs were found in 87% of the inhabitants of this village; 30% were heavily infected (> 50 eggs per 10 mL urine). The prevalence of infection was very high in all age groups, but children showed more intense infections. No difference between sexes was found. In the special situation of a very high prevalence, test strips for proteinuria and haematuria are not very useful for the individual diagnosis of S. haematobium infection. Six and 12 weeks after treatment with a single dose of praziquantel (40 mg/kg), S. haematobium eggs were found in 25% and 30% of the treated subjects, respectively. Bulinus globosus was identified as intermediate host, but other snail vectors may also play a role. S. mansoni eggs were found in 1% of the population. Both S. haematobium and S. mansoni are spreading in the delta of the Senegal river.Screening of Tanzanian women of childbearing age for urinary schistosomiasis: validity of urine reagent strip readings and self-reported symptoms.The screening of women of childbearing age for haematuria, leukocyturia and proteinuria to detect urinary schistosomiasis can be confounded by several factors such as menstruation, pregnancy and genitourinary infections. We therefore undertook a study in an area endemic for Schistosoma haematobium in the United Republic of Tanzania to carry out the following: assess the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values--in women of childbearing age--of indirect indicators of urinary schistosomiasis, as measured by urine reagent strip readings; assess the predictive values of self-reported symptoms; and finally to estimate the morbidity attributable to S. haematobium. A total of 303 women (128 and 175, respectively, living in high- and low-risk sites) participated in the study. Haematuria was more frequent among women excreting S. haematobium eggs than among those who did not (65% versus 32%). The predictive potential of all indirect disease markers was poor in the highly endemic site, while in the sites with low endemicity the negative predictive values were high. Among infected women, 54% of haematuria could be attributed to S. haematobium, but for patients with more than 10 eggs/10 ml the attributable fraction rose to 70%. Symptoms of "bloody urine" and "pain while urinating" were recalled significantly more often by women living in the highly endemic site. On a population level, one-third of the self-reported cases with bloody urine could be attributed to urinary schistosomiasis. Screening of women of childbearing age for urinary schistosomiasis using urine reagent strips can be biased in two directions. The prevalence of S. haematobium will be overestimated if other causes of haematuria, such as reproductive tract infections, are highly endemic. On the other hand, women with light or very light infections will be missed and will not be treated. This is of concern because genital schistosomiasis, a possible risk factor for the transmission of HIV, occurs among women even with light infections.Use of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) dipsticks for detection of intestinal and urinary schistosomiasis.An evaluation of a commercially available antigen capture dipstick that detects schistosome circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine was conducted in representative endemic areas for intestinal and urinary schistosomiasis in Uganda and Zanzibar, respectively. Under field-based conditions, the sensitivity (SS) and specificity (SP) of the dipstick was 83 and 81% for detection of Schistosoma mansoni infections while positive predictive (PPV) and negative predictive values (NPV) were 84%. Light egg-positive infections were sometimes CCA-negative while CCA-positives included egg-negative children. A positive association between faecal egg output and intensity of CCA test band was observed. Estimating prevalence of intestinal schistosomiasis by school with dipsticks was highly correlated (r=0.95) with Kato-Katz stool examinations, typically within +/-8.5%. In Zanzibar, however, dipsticks totally failed to detect S. haematobium despite examining children with egg-patent schistosomiasis. This was also later corroborated by further surveys in Niger and Burkina Faso. Laboratory testing of dipsticks with aqueous adult worm lysates from several reference species showed correct functioning, however, dipsticks failed to detect CCA in urine from S. haematobium-infected hamsters. While CCA dipsticks are a good alternative, or complement, to stool microscopy for field diagnosis of intestinal schistosomiasis, they have no proven value for field diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis. At approximately 2.6 US dollars per dipstick, they are presently too expensive to be cost-effective for wide scale use in disease mapping surveys unless Lot Quality Assurance Sampling (LQAS) strategies are developed.Urinary schistosomiasis in schoolchildren in Dar-es-Salaam, Tanzania, and the factors influencing its transmission.The prevalence of urinary schistosomiasis among the schoolchildren living in Kigogo administrative ward of the Kinondoni district of Dar-es-Salaam city, Tanzania, and the factors influencing the transmission of the causative agent, Schistosoma haematobium, were investigated in a cross-sectional study. The estimate of overall prevalence, based on microscopical examination of a single urine sample/subject, was 47.6%. Compared with the girls, the boys were more likely to be excreting schistosome eggs (54.6% v. 40.8%; P = 0.004) and had, in general, higher intensities of infection (54 v. 38 eggs/10 ml urine; P = 0.001). The children aged 10-14 years had higher prevalences and intensities of infection than those in the younger or older age-group studied. The sensitivity of micro-haematuria as an indicator of infection (compared with the microscopical examination of single urine samples) was 84.3% overall, reaching 92% among the children excreting > or = 50 eggs/10 ml urine. The corresponding positive and negative predictive values were 77% and 84%, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of the history of haematuria as an indirect screening technique for S. haematobium were 60.4%, 72.7%, 67% and 67%, respectively. Recreational activities such as bathing, swimming and playing in the water were the most frequent activities attracting children to water bodies and carried the highest risks of infection with S. haematobium. Knowledge about the disease, especially on the symptoms and mode of transmission, was generally good but the methods of prevention were inadequately known. Chemotherapy to control urinary schistosomiasis in schoolchildren is recommended; infected children may be identified on the basis of haematuria, detected using questionnaires or reagent strips. Additional health education, to heighten awareness of the disease and its prevention, would also be beneficial.Urine test strips: reliability of semi-quantitative findings under tropical conditions.Semi-quantitative urinalysis with urine reagent strips (URS) for erythrocyturia (EU), leucocyturia (LU) and proteinuria (PU) was performed in Congolese and Sudanese school children with Schistosoma haematobium and/or S. mansoni infection. Quantitative urinalysis was performed on the same specimen using microscopy and a Neubauer counting chamber for EU and LU and the Coomassie blue dye-binding assay for PU. Microscopically detectable EU of more than 10 cells/microliters was found in 63% of all samples and LU of more than 20 cells/microliters was found in 60% of all samples. With the Coomassie blue method, PU of more than 150 mg/l was detected in 51% of all samples. URS gave positive results of grade 1-3 for EU in 69% of all samples, for LU in 63% of all samples and for PU in 66% of all samples. The sensitivity and specificity of URS compared with standard reference methods were as follow: EU 95% and 75%, LU 81% and 81% and PU 90% and 56%. When the results of all three test were combined, URS differentiated abnormal from normal urine specimens with a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 70%. Median quantitative results showed a good correlation with semiquantitative URS readings for all parameters, but there was a wide range of URS scores. We concluded that URS sensitivity detect urinary abnormalities and thus may be used as a general screening method under field conditions when more specific methods cannot be performed.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Diagnostic accuracy of urine filtration and dipstick tests for Schistosoma haematobium infection in a lightly infected population of Ghanaian schoolchildren.Two screening methods, reagent dipsticks for hematuria and urine filtration for Schistosoma haematobium eggs, were evaluated for their sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing infection with S. haematobium in lightly infected Ghanaian children. Schoolchildren aged 8-18 years (n=255) provided urine samples on three occasions. Overall, 36.4% of girls and 50.7% of boys presented with eggs at least once; 3.3% of girls and 7.5% of boys presented with both eggs and hematuria three times. Many children presented with eggs but without hematuria, or with hematuria but without eggs. When each child was screened three times, the sensitivity of each test method improved by at least 22.9% as compared with single screening, but previously unidentified infections were detected at the third screening, indicating that even three screenings is insufficient. Nearly half of lightly infected children (<50 eggs/10 ml urine, by maximum egg count) were egg-positive during only one of three screenings. Thus, data presented here indicate that when individuals are screened repeatedly, infection status can be assessed more accurately, control programs can be properly evaluated, and population estimates of S. haematobium infection may be made with increased confidence, as compared with single screening.Malumfashi Endemic Diseases Research Project, XV. The potential medical importance of bilharzia in northern Nigeria: a suggested rapid, cheap and effective solution for control of Schistosoma haematobium infection.[Modelling sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of hematuria testing using reagent sticks in the diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium infection].Since its recognition as an effective tool to identify Schistosoma haematobium infection, haematuria detection has been used in several large scale control programs. However, large variations in performance between age groups, gender, prevalence and areas were observed. Correlation between the degree of haematuria and the intensity of infection and between intensity of infection with age and/or gender could partly explained these variations. Other factors, such as the circadian cycles and day-to-day variations of haematuria and egg excretion, a concomitant presence of blood in urine for another reason than schistosomiasis and the intrinsic characteristics of the reagents strips also contribute to the observed variations. This study assessed the influence of age, gender and intensity of infection taken together on the performance of the diagnostic test by fitting logistic regression models. During a socio-economic study of schistosomiasis, carried out between 1989 and 1991 in a rice-growing area located in Mali, West Africa, haematuria was detected by reagent strips among 2,873 six-year-old and more subjects randomly chosen from 14 villages. The "gold standard" of infection was provided by the parasite egg counts. Laboratory quality controls were implemented. Observed sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values were calculated by the standard two-by-two tables. The influence of age, gender, intensity of infection, measured in a continuous scale, on these parameters were studied by fitting two logistic models. The first one modelled sensitivity and specificity The second one modelled predictive values. Goodness-of-fit tests were performed. Large variations in the observed values of sensitivities, specificities and predictive values by age and gender were observed. The best fitted model for sensitivity and specificity included infection status, age, gender, intensity and an age by gender interaction. For the predictive values, the best model included haematuria, age, and an haematuria by age interaction. Given the large variations in the performances across the covariates strata defined by cross-tabulation of the age/gender and intensity categories, this modelling approach provided a more realistic appraisal of the performances than using overall values obtained from a general two- by-two table. It allowed to assess the effect of the covariates of interest on the performances of the test and provided an adjustment of the performances on these covariates. The best fitted model was able to provide estimates of sensitivity for each age/gender stratum as a function of the intensity of infection, which could not be done by using the two-by-two table approach. A decrease in sensitivity adjusted for intensity of infection above 10 years of age among males is discussed. This modelling approach also uses all the information available and not only the data from the stratum of interest.Efficacy and safety of praziquantel in preschool-aged children in an area co-endemic for Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium.In sub-Saharan Africa the recommended strategy to control schistosomiasis is preventive chemotherapy. Emphasis is placed on school-aged children, but in high endemicity areas, preschool-aged children are also at risk, and hence might need treatment with praziquantel. Since a pediatric formulation (e.g., syrup) is not available outside of Egypt, crushed praziquantel tablets are used, but the efficacy and safety of this treatment regimen is insufficiently studied.We assessed the efficacy and safety of crushed praziquantel tablets among preschool-aged children (<6 years) in the Azaguié district, south Côte d'Ivoire, where Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium coexist. Using a cross-sectional design, children provided two stool and two urine samples before and 3 weeks after treatment. Crushed praziquantel tablets, mixed with water, were administered at a dose of 40 mg/kg. Adverse events were assessed and graded 4 and 24 hours posttreatment by interviewing mothers/guardians.Overall, 160 preschool-aged children had at least one stool and one urine sample examined with duplicate Kato-Katz thick smears and a point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen (POC-CCA) cassette for S. mansoni, and urine filtration for S. haematobium diagnosis before and 3 weeks after praziquantel administration. According to the Kato-Katz and urine filtration results, we found high efficacy against S. mansoni (cure rate (CR), 88.6%; egg reduction rate (ERR), 96.7%) and S. haematobium (CR, 88.9%; ERR, 98.0%). POC-CCA revealed considerably lower efficacy against S. mansoni (CR, 53.8%). Treatment was generally well tolerated, but moderately severe adverse events (i.e., body and face inflammation), were observed in four Schistosoma egg-negative children.Crushed praziquantel administered to preschool-aged children at a dose of 40 mg/kg is efficacious against S. mansoni and S. haematobium in a co-endemic setting of Côte d'Ivoire. Further research is required with highly sensitive diagnostic tools and safety must be investigated in more depth.Controlled-Trials.com ISRCTN53172722.Sensitivities and specificities of diagnostic tests and infection prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium estimated from data on adults in villages northwest of Accra, Ghana.Substantial uncertainties surround the sensitivities and specificities of diagnostic techniques for urinary schistosomiasis. We used latent class (LC) modeling to address this problem. In this study, 220 adults in three villages northwest of Accra, Ghana were examined using five Schistosoma haematobium diagnostic measures: microscopic examination of urine for detection of S. haematobium eggs, dipsticks for detection of hematuria, tests for circulating antigens, antibody tests, and ultrasound scans of the urinary system. Testing of the LC model indicated non-invariance of the performance of the diagnostic tests across different age groups, and measurement invariance held for males and females and for the three villages. We therefore recommend the use of LC models for comparison between and the identification of the most accurate schistosomiasis diagnostic tests. Furthermore, microscopy and hematuria dipsticks were indicated through these models as the most appropriate techniques for detection of S. haematobium infection.Urinary schistosomiasis on Zanzibar: application of two novel assays for the detection of excreted albumin and haemoglobin in urine.As part of a urinary schistosomiasis control programme on Zanzibar, an aged cross-sectional survey of 305 children from three schools on Unguja was conducted to investigate the relationships between levels of excreted albumin and haemoglobin in urine and Schistosoma haematobium infection status. Diagnosis was determined by standard parasitological methods, dipstick reagents for microhaematuria, visual inspection for macrohaematuria as well as collection of case-history questionnaire data for self-diagnosis. Prevalence of infection as determined by parasitology was 53.9% and approximately, one quarter of the children examined were anaemic (<11 g dl(-1)). A statistically significant negative association of blood haemoglobin levels of boys and S. haematobium infection intensity status was observed (rs=-0.23, P=0.005). Through sensitivity analysis of urine-albumin values it was determined that a concentration of above >40 mg l(-1), as measured with the HemoCue urine-albumin photometer, had sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of 0.90, 0.83, 0.86 and 0.89 respectively against 'gold-standard' parasitology. There was a clear association of reported pain upon micturition for children with elevated urine-albumin levels, with an odds ratio of 20 to 1. Levels of excreted blood in urine were quantified with the HemoCue Plasma/Low Hb photometer. However, dipsticks remain the method of choice for urine-haemoglobin of 0.1 g l(-1) and below. Urine parameters over a 24-h period were assessed in a small sub-sample. Reductions in both albumin and haemoglobin excretion were observed in 11 children 54 days after praziquantel treatment. It was concluded that these rapid, high-through-put, portable HemoCue assays could play a role in better describing and monitoring the occurrence, severity and evolution of urinary schistosomiasis disease. The urine-albumin assay has particular promise as a biochemical marker of S. haematobium induced kidney- and upper urinary tract-morbidity.Circulating anodic and cathodic antigen in serum and urine from Schistosoma haematobium-infected Cameroonian children receiving praziquantel: a longitudinal study.A cohort of 148 Cameroonian children infected with Schistosoma haematobium was followed before praziquantel therapy and 1, 2, 3, 5, and 12 months thereafter. Egg output, the reagent strip index (RSI, a pathological marker), and circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in serum and urine were quantified. At enrollment, the median level of egg output was 365/10 mL of urine; 97% of children had a positive RSI; CAA was detected in serum from 76% of children and in urine from 64%; and CCA was detected in serum from 55% of children and in urine from 87%. Two months after chemotherapy, egg output and RSI had decreased significantly; reinfection later developed in parallel with increases in the serum and urine concentrations of CAA and the urine concentrations of CCA. The measurement of CAA and CCA is useful for diagnosis, evaluation of disease severity, and follow-up of chemotherapy in individuals infected with S. haematobium.Urine circulating soluble egg antigen in relation to egg counts, hematuria, and urinary tract pathology before and after treatment in children infected with Schistosoma haematobium in Kenya.A cohort of 117 school children infected with Schistosoma haematobium was followed-up after therapy with praziquantel (0, 2, 4, 6, 12, and 18 months) and various infection and morbidity parameters (egg counts, hematuria, soluble egg antigen [SEA] in urine, and ultrasonography-detectable pathology) were quantified. At the onset of the study, 97% of the children were positive for S. haematobium with a geometric mean egg count of 45.7 eggs/10 ml of urine. Eighty-one percent of the children were positive for SEA in urine with a geometric mean SEA concentration of 218.8 ng/ml of urine. Ninety-two percent and 56% of the children were microhematuria positive and macrohematuria positive, respectively. Two months after treatment, all infection and morbidity indicators had significantly decreased. Reinfection after treatment as determined by detection of eggs in urine was observed by four months post-treatment while the other parameters remained low. The clearance of SEA was slower than that of egg counts while pathology resolved at an even slower pace. Levels of SEA and egg output showed similar correlations with ultrasound detectable pathology; these correlations were better than the correlation between hematuria and pathology.Detection of circulating anodic antigen by ELISA for seroepidemiology of schistosomiasis mansoni.Sera of individuals from Burundi excreting eggs of Schistosoma mansoni (prevalence 35%; 178 subjects) and of similar individuals from Maniema, Zaire (prevalence 95%; 99 subjects), and of 159 Dutch and 81 Zairean non-infected controls, were screened by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for the presence of schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA). No false positive results were obtained. The sensitivity of the test was 75% in Burundi and 93% in Zaire, a significant difference (P less than 0.05). However, in matched egg output classes the test results did not differ significantly; 60% and 67%, respectively, of those excreting 1-100 eggs per gram of faeces (epg), 86% and 100% of those excreting 101-400 epg, and 100% of those excreting over 400 epg were detected. The efficiency of the assay was 91% in Burundi and 93% in Zaire. The Spearman rank coefficient of correlation between antigen titre and egg output (determined by 3 consecutive Kato egg counts) was 0.61 in Burundi and 0.82 in Zaire. The sensitivity of the test compared well with a single egg count. In addition, preliminary data showed that occasionally CAA was detectable in serum of individuals not excreting schistosome eggs. As CAA is found only in the presence of living worms, such cases reflect active infections.Control of morbidity due to Schistosoma haematobium on Pemba Island: egg excretion and hematuria as indicators of infection.The variability of Schistosoma haematobium egg excretion using a quantitative syringe filtration technique and the variability of hematuria detected visually and by reagent strips were studied in a population of 520 subjects from the village of Pujini (Pemba Island, Zanzibar, Tanzania) for 6 consecutive days. A high degree of day-to-day variability of egg excretion within subjects was found both in the whole population and in the 5-19 year age group. Subjects with 1 urinary egg count of greater than or equal to 50 eggs/10 ml urine were not similarly classified in 36-61% of the other 5 examinations and 4-16% of their other examinations were negative. Gross hematuria had a specificity of almost 100%, when related to a positive filtration on any day, and was closely related to egg counts of greater than or equal to 50 eggs/10 ml urine. The finding of a strongly positive reaction for hematuria on a given single day was closely associated with the subject having a high egg count (greater than or equal to 50 eggs/10 ml urine) on at least one of the 6 days of the study. At the primary health care level, single highly positive semiquantitative values for hematuria were a more useful diagnostic indicator than a single egg count to select patients with heavy infections for selective population chemotherapy.Evaluation of an ELISA for combined measurement of CAA and CCA in schistosomiasis mansoni.An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was developed for combined measurement of schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). Monoclonal antibodies against CAA and CCA were used as coating and as fluorescein-labeled detecting antibodies in a FITC-anti-FITC system. The lower detection limit of the assay was 1.1 ng antigen (AWA-TCA)/ml. Serum samples of Schistosoma mansoni infected individuals from Zaire (n = 60) and Burundi (n = 60) were tested in this assay and in single-antigen ELISAs. Sensitivities of assaying for CAA, CCA, combined CAA + CCA, and of parallel testing for CAA and for CCA were calculated from titres and antigen concentrations. With serum samples from the heavily infected individuals (Zaire), all assays had a sensitivity of 97% or higher. In contrast, with serum samples from individuals from Burundi (low to moderate infections) it was shown that combined testing resulted in a slightly lower sensitivity than testing for individual antigens. By parallel testing for CAA and CCA, the sensitivity could be increased considerably (to 95%), however.Frequency of haematuria and proteinuria in relation to prevalence and intensity of Schistosoma haematobium infection in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.Evaluation of haematuria as an indirect screening test for schistosomiasis haematobium: a population-based study in the White Nile province, Sudan.Haematuria elicited in the history, seen macroscopically or detected by reagent strips, was used as an indirect screening test for Schistosoma haematobium infection in Um-Hani Irrigation Scheme in the White Nile province, Sudan. These approaches were used separately or combined in different sequences. Reagent strips alone detected 81% of cases and 88% of those who excreted 50 egg/10 ml of urine or more. The sequence of observation of gross haematuria followed by screening with reagent strips and then taking history of haematuria had the highest sensitivity of all the orders, 0.87, and it saved 18% of reagent strips. If history and inspection were done first, followed by reagent strips, the sensitivity would be 0.86 and 47% of strips would be saved. The specificity of haematuria as a diagnostic index for schistosomiasis, however, was low.Accuracy of circulating cathodic antigen tests for rapid mapping of Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium infections in Southern Sudan.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of a circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine dipstick test for detecting Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium alongside an integrated rapid mapping survey in Southern Sudan.A total of 373 children aged 5-16 years were included in the study. Of these 26.0% were infected with S. haematobium and 24.5% were infected with S. mansoni, as identified by urine filtration or single Kato-Katz thick smear, respectively. The CCA performed moderately in detecting S. mansoni, with sensitivity of 89.1% and specificity of 74.2%, and poorly in detecting S. haematobium infections, with a sensitivity of 36.8% and specificity of 78.9%. This may be a slight underestimate of true CCA accuracy, since only single stool and urine samples were examined by microscopy. The true 'gold standard' for comparison would have been the collection of multiple stool samples over consecutive days.The poor CCA accuracy for diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis means that this test is currently not suitable for rapid mapping of schistosomiasis in areas where both S. mansoni and S. haematobium may be endemic.Circulating anodic antigen (CAA) levels in different age groups in a Zimbabwean rural community endemic for Schistosoma haematobium determined using the magnetic beads antigen-capture enzyme-linked immunoassay.A simplified version of the magnetic bead antigen-capture enzyme-linked immunoassay (MBAC-EIA) was used to detect circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in individuals of different age groups with Schistosoma haematobium infection only in an endemic area of Zimbabwe. An overall positive correlation between S. haematobium egg excretion and CAA levels was demonstrated. The age profile for CAA levels was generally comparable with the age profile of S. haematobium prevalence and intensity of infection. The CAA levels were higher in younger (5-14 years of age) individuals than in older (greater than 14 years of age) ones. Since the sensitivity of the MBAC-EIA in the diagnosis of S. haematobium infection was found to be 97%, CAA levels appear to be a useful indicator of worm burden in an endemic area.Urinary schistosomiasis: options for control within endemic rural communities: a case study in south-west Nigeria.A preliminary investigation was conducted into factors that may bring about control of morbidity due to endemic urinary schistosomiasis in rural communities. A Knowledge, Attitudes, Practices and Beliefs (KAPB) study was conducted among primary schoolchildren (those with more than four years elementary education) in Ogbagba village, Osun State, Nigeria, from October 1990 to December 1993, to ascertain their understanding of urinary schistosomiasis. The study further assessed the potential of subjective haematuria, i.e. asking children with haematuria in the recent past to so indicate, in detecting urinary schistosomiasis. It was established that subjective haematuria is both sensitive and specific for detecting urinary schistosomiasis in endemic communities. The study also established that subjective haematuria offers a valid, easy to recognize target for morbidity control in endemic situation. It is proposed that with appropriate health education; availability of safe, effective, easy-to-administer drugs, such as praziquantel, morbidity control of urinary schistosomiasis is feasible within the primary health care system with the lower cadre health worker or even a volunteer village health worker (VVHW) at the centre of the control effort.During October 1990 to December 1993, in Ife-Central Local Government Area of Osun State, Nigeria, interviews with and physical and laboratory examinations of 106 grade 4-6 pupils aged 8-16 were conducted in Ogbagba village so the researchers could determine their knowledge, attitudes, practices, and beliefs about urinary schistosomiasis as well as the factors that offer opportunities for morbidity control of urinary schistosomiasis in an endemic area. There was no health facility in Ogbagba. 89.5% of the children had urinary schistosomiasis. 75.5% of all pupils knew the local name for urinary schistosomiasis. 66% had previously passed blood in their urine. 85.7% of these pupils believed hematuria was serious. 70.8% gave a positive history of current episode of hematuria. 62.7% of these pupils did not seek any treatment. Symptoms associated with past hematuria included abdominal pain, weakness, weight loss, and fever. 65.7% of all pupils did not know what causes urinary schistosomiasis. 67.1% believed that urinary schistosomiasis was acquired via some form of contact with water, especially swimming (57.1%). The leading types of water contact included washing clothes (95.3%), fetching water (94.3%), bathing (87.7%), and swimming (74.5%). 74.5% of all pupils urinated deliberately in the river. The sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, and efficiency of alternative methods of detecting urinary schistosomiasis revealed that subjective hematuria was comparable to gross/microscopic hematuria. These findings will be used to design information, education, and communication materials for a health education program on urinary schistosomiasis using the primary health control approach. The researchers propose that both subjective and gross hematuria be used as the basis for treating children aged 4-19 living in areas endemic for urinary schistosomiasis. Praziquantel should be used as the only drug for treating urinary schistosomiasis. Health education in the schools' curriculum and information, education, and communication developed by health authorities should promote better water contact practices. Teachers need to regularly ask their pupils about hematuria and encourage them to seek medical treatment.Bacteriuria and hematuria in infections due to Schistosoma haematobium.Urinary schistosomiasis: influence of the circadian variation of hematuria and proteinuria on reagent stick testing.The impact of a school health programme on the prevalence and morbidity of urinary schistosomiasis in Mwera Division, Pangani District, Tanzania.The prevalence of urinary schistosomiasis among schoolchildren in Pangani District (Tanzania) was assessed rapidly by a questionnaire approach. Based on the results, a strategy of selective treatment with praziquantel was adopted. Eleven primary schools in Mwera Division, Pangani District, with about 2500 schoolchildren were included in a control programme for urinary schistosomiasis. Macro- and microscopic haematuria diagnosed visually and with urine reagent strips was used as an indirect indicator of Schistosoma haematobium infection. Intensity of infection among children was monitored in class 5 (median age 14 years, range 11-17) by urine filtration techniques. Treatment was administered as 40 mg/kg praziquantel in a single dose at the beginning of the school year. The programme was implemented by schoolteachers and coordinated by the District Health Management Team in collaboration with the District Education Office. Teachers were responsible for carrying out all programme activities. Community participation was through collaboration with Teachers-Parents Associations and Village Health Committees. Coverage at yearly (1995-99) examination varied from 67.7% to 80.3%. Prevalence of haematuria decreased from 51.2% (range 22.2-89.5%) at baseline to 23.4% (range 5.8-56.7%) in 1999, a reduction of 54.3%. Macrohaematuria was 21.2% at baseline and 7.2% in 1999, a reduction of 66.0%. Prevalence of infection in class 5 was reduced by 71.4% and geometric mean intensity of positives reduced from 71 eggs/10 mL (95% confidence interval [CI] 52.5-97.7) to 28 eggs/10 mL (95% CI 25.7-55.0), a reduction of 60.6%. Teachers were highly committed, and secured community participation and a smooth implementation of the programme. The community accepted the introduction of a cost-recovery system, whereby parents pay for the treatment of children with episodes of visible haematuria during the school year. Communities also participated in the improvement of sanitary installations at the schools.Urinary schistosomiasis among school children in an endemic community in south-eastern Nigeria.Studies were carried out on urinary schistosomiasis among school children aged 6 to 21 in Abia State, Nigeria. Of the total 1,165 children examined for eggs of S. haematobium in their urine, 245 (21.03%) were infected. Male children had significantly (P < 0.05) higher infection (64.08%) than their female counterparts (35.92%). Age-related infection rate showed significant difference (P < 0.05) with the highest infection rate (46.94%) recorded among children between the ages of 12 and 14 years. As with infection rate, the intensity of infection was significantly higher (P < 0.05) in males (35.50 eggs/10 ml urine) then in females (28.73 eggs/10 ml urine). 4 (1.63%) of the infected individuals had heavy infection (400 eggs/10 ml urine). There was a gradual increase of mean egg count with age up to 12-14 years after which there was a decrease. Viability test showed that of the 245 children infected 151 (61.63%) had viable eggs in their urine sample. The number of males with viable eggs (62.25%) was significantly higher (P < 0.05) than the females (37.74%). Also in the number of infected individuals with viable eggs a significant difference among age groups was observed. It was significantly higher (P < 0.05) among the age group 12-14 years than in any other group. Among the infected children 38 (15.51%) had haematuria (which represents 95% of the 41 individuals with trace of blood in their urine). There was a significant association (P < 0.05) between haematuria and infection rate/intensity.Performance of microhaematuria and proteinuria as measured by urine reagent strips in estimating intensity and prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium infection in Nigeria.To assess if microhaematuria and proteinuria as measured by reagent strips could estimate intensity of Schistosoma haematobium (S. haematobium) infection in endemic areas and evaluate their screening performance among children in Benue State, Nigeria.A total of 1,124 urine samples were collected, screened for microhaematuria and proteinuria using reagent strips (Combi 9) and results were compared to filtration technique, the gold standard method.A significant correlation was observed between microhaematuria (rho= 0.66, P<0.01), proteinuria (rho = 0.71, P<0.01) and intensity of S. haematobium eggs. Proteinuria had sensitivity of 95.7% and specificity of 67.2%, while microhaematuria had sensitivity of 64.8% and specificity of 89.6%. The proportion of false positive diagnoses was higher in proteinuria (19.2%) than microhaematuria (6.0%).The findings suggest that use of urine reagent strips could potentially estimate intensity of S. haematobium infection and their performance to screen urinary schistosomiasis agreed with previous observations.Day-to-day fluctuation of point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen test scores and faecal egg counts in children infected with Schistosoma mansoni in Ethiopia.Determining the variation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine and egg counts variation in stool between days in Schistosoma mansoni (S. mansoni) infected individuals is vital to decide whether or not to rely on a single-sample test for diagnosis of Schistosomiasis. In this study, the magnitude of day-to-day variation in urine-CCA test scores and in faecal egg counts was evaluated in school children in Ethiopia.A total of 620 school children (age 8 to 12 years) were examined for S. mansoni infection using double Kato-Katz and single urine-CCA cassette methods (batch 32727) on three consecutive days.The prevalence of S. mansoni infection was 81.1% based on triple urine-CCA-cassette test and 53.1% based on six Kato-Katz thick smears. Among the study participants, 26.3% showed fluctuation in urine CCA and 32.4% showed fluctuation in egg output. Mean egg count as well as number of cases in each class of intensity and intensity of cassette band color varied over the three days of examination. Over 85% of the children that showed day-to-day variations in status of S. mansoni infection from negative to positive or vice versa by the Kato-Katz and the CCA methods had light intensity of infection. The fluctuation in both the CCA test scores and faecal egg count was not associated with age and sex.The current study showed day-to-day variation in CCA and Kato-Katz test results of children infected with S. mansoni. This indicates the necessity of more than one urine or stool samples to be collected on different days for more reliable diagnosis of S. mansoni infection in low endemic areas.Simultaneous use of a sensitive filtration technique and reagent strips in urinary schistosomiasis.A sensitive filtration technique and polyvalent urine analysis reagent strips were used simultaneously in patients with urinary schistosomiasis in order to detect pathological conditions other than haematuria and proteinuria. A significant correlation was found between haematuria, proteinuria, leucocyturia and intensity of infection as measured by egg excretion in urine. The best correlation between the reagent strip findings and intensity of infection was obtained when the three parameters were combined. After treatment with metrifonate the reduction of egg excretion was paralleled by the normalization of the reagent strip findings. Analysis of day-to-day variation demonstrated a similar low variation of the filtration technique and the reagent strip findings. Specificity of urine analysis of reagent strips was tested in two age-matched control groups. Although the study was designed only as a pilot study, the results suggests that polyvalent reagent strips may be a useful tool for diagnosis of heavily infected patients under field conditions, as they permit rapid and easy identification of subjects with high egg counts.Analysis of worm burden variation in human Schistosoma mansoni infections by determination of serum levels of circulating anodic antigen and circulating cathodic antigen.Serum circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) concentrations, as a possible direct measure of worm burden, were compared with fecal egg counts in a heavily Schistosoma mansoni-infected population from Zaire to allow differentiation between worm loads and worm fecundity in relation to age and intensity of infection. Of the 517 subjects, 95% excreted eggs and 97% demonstrated circulating antigens. Fecal egg counts showed an age-related pattern characteristic for an area in which schistosomiasis is endemic with intense transmission levels. Regression analysis showed that antigen concentrations were strongly associated with egg counts. For CAA, but not for CCA, this relation was found to be nonlinear, which would be consistent with density-dependent fecundity or crowding. The trend was uniform for all age groups, which for this particular population indicated a genuine reduction of worm loads rather than reduced worm fecundity with age of the host.The use of Baye's theorem and other indices of agreement in evaluating the use of reagent strips in screening rural schoolchildren for Schistosoma haematobium in Zambia.The diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium disease on the basis of history and physical examination alone is often difficult. Tests have thus been developed to allow an early and more accurate diagnosis. However these tests have substantial imperfections and many different results obtained from these tests must be integrated into a diagnostic conclusion about the probability of disease in a given patient. Also the accuracy of these tests in detecting S. haematobium disease is critically dependent not only on its sensitivity and specificity but also on the prevalence or pretest likelihood of disease in the population under study. The diagnostic accuracy of haematuria, proteinuria and the combined criteria tests in detecting S. haematobium eggs in schoolchildren are evaluated by calculating the sensitivity and specificity and also by the use of 'Bayes' theorem of conditional probability. The graphic relation between the predictive value of a given test result and the pretest risk of disease in the test subjects was obtained for each of these tests. This method reveals that the prevalence of S. haematobium disease is an important determinant of the predictive value of any test result in the individual patient.Evaluation of eosinophiluria in the diagnosis of schistosomiasis hematobium: a field-based study.Using Hansel's stain, eosinophiluria greater than 5% of total urinary white blood cells was found in 59% of a randomly selected population sample in an area endemic for schistosomiasis hematobium. The prevalence and mean level of eosinophiluria were significantly higher in infected subjects than in noninfected subjects (P less than 0.05). The sensitivity (80%), specificity (86%), and positive predictive value (82%) of eosinophiluria as a diagnostic index for schistosomiasis hematobium were significantly higher (Youdin index 0.66; P less than 0.05) than those of proteinuria, hematuria, and leukocyturia taken singly or in combination. However, unlike the latter three measurements, this method involves microscopy. There is a great need for a chemical method for measuring eosinophiluria.Circulating schistosomal antigen in diagnosis and assessment of cure in individuals infected with Schistosoma mansoni.The effectiveness of praziquantel in treating schistosomiasis is most commonly assessed by quantitating egg production or anti-schistosome antibodies in serum. We have used a monoclonal antibody (MAb)-based antigen-capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for the serologic diagnosis of schistosomiasis, and to monitor the efficacy of praziquantel therapy in 49 individuals with parasitologically proven schistosomiasis. The MAb used, 128C3/3/21, recognizes a repeating carbohydrate epitope expressed at all stages of parasite development, and antibodies recognizing this epitope are found in the serum of infected humans. The overall sensitivity of the ELISA was 78%, with a sensitivity of 100% for patients excreting greater than 100 eggs/g of feces and 72% for those excreting less than 100 eggs/g of feces. The positivity of the ELISA was directly related to the fecal egg counts obtained on days -3, -2, and -1 before treatment with praziquantel, but there was no correlation between antigen levels and the clinical stage of the disease. After praziquantel treatment, we observed a highly significant correlation (P less than 0.0001) between the time elapsed since treatment and the decrease in antigenemia. Furthermore, although no eggs were detected in any of the stool specimens at week 12 after treatment, the antigen was detected in 21% of the treated patients (seven of 33 ELISA-positive patients). Antigen levels decreased over the 12-week period in six of these patients, whereas the antigen level increased with time in one individual. The persistence of antigenemia suggests that these individuals are either still clearing antigen or remain infected.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Indirect screening for Schistosoma haematobium infection: a comparative study in Ghana and Zambia.Four indirect approaches, based on inquiry into a past history of haematuria, visual inspection for blood in the urine specimens, and the use of reagent strips to detect haematuria and proteinuria, were evaluated to identify persons with Schistosoma haematobium infection. These approaches were applied individually and in three different screening sequences on two populations in Ghana and Zambia in order to identify infected children and adults for subsequent treatment in both areas. Detection of haematuria using reagent strips was the single approach with the highest sensitivity and specificity. The observation of gross haematuria (bloody urine), followed by detection of blood by reagent strips, identified 87% of infected children in both areas. This screening sequence showed the highest combined sensitivity and specificity in the identification of infected children as well as adults for treatment in both areas. Differences in the results between the two countries are discussed. This study emphasizes the need for evaluation of indirect screening procedures for the diagnosis of S. haematobium infection in each endemic area so as to establish criteria for their interpretation, prior to large-scale field application.Schistosomiasis among young children in Usoma, Kenya.Although schistosomiasis burden is greatest among school-age children (SAC) (6-15 years of age), infection among preschool-age children (PSAC) (1-5 years), may be underestimated in endemic areas. We conducted a cross-sectional study evaluating Schistosoma mansoni infection among children 1-15 years of age in a highly endemic community in Kenya. Diagnostic tests included stool exam (Kato/Katz technique), serum testing for schistosome-specific antibodies, and urine testing for circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). Overall, 268 SAC and 216 PSAC were enrolled; prevalence increased with age, with 14% of 1 year olds and more than 90% of children > 10 years of age infected. Stool exam was more sensitive among SAC than PSAC, but performance was similar after adjusting for infection intensity (based on CCA). Schistosomiasis poses a threat to PSAC in endemic areas, and stool exam may underestimate the prevalence of infection. Control programs in such areas should consider PSAC in addition to SAC.The diagnostic value of haematuria and proteinuria in Schistosoma haematobium infection in southern Nigeria.Haematuria and proteinuria as detected by chemical reagent strips correlated moderately (r = 0.7) with prevalence and intensity of infection with Schistosoma haematobium in an area of Anambra State, Nigeria. Differences attributable to age and sex were also reflected in a similar pattern, all peaks occurring in the 5-14 year age group. The differences observed with varying levels of intensity and haematuria at both 10 and 50 erythrocytes/microliter (p < 0.001) and proteinuria at 0.3 g/dl (p < 0.01) were statistically significant. At a proteinuria level of 1 g/dl, the observed differences were however not statistically significant (p > 0.5). The percentage of specimens from children (0-14 years) positive for S. haematobium eggs and with at least traces of haematuria and proteinuria (63.4% and 95%, respectively) was higher than in adults (33.3% and 80.2%, respectively). All individuals with more than 50 eggs/10 ml of urine were correctly identified using both indices either separately or in combination. For egg counts of less than 50 eggs/10 ml of urine, false diagnosis occurred in only 5% of all specimens examined. The sensitivity and specificity of haematuria and proteinuria at trace quantities was very high, but haematuria had a higher predictive value for a positive test (PvPt) and was considered the overall better indicator. A combination of both indices did not significantly increase the PvPt. When trace haematuria and moderate proteinuria were combined, both the sensitivity, specificity and PvPt were all above 90%, giving the best overall values in all the combinations made.Screening methods for urinary schistosomiasis in an endemic area (the Kraboa/Coaltar district of Ghana).Control of Schistosoma haematobium morbidity on Pemba Island: validity and efficiency of indirect screening tests.Four indirect screening methods for the detection of Schistosoma haematobium morbidity are compared (history of haematuria, visual haematuria, and microhaematuria at the 1+ and 2+ positivity limit by reagent strips) in terms of their diagnostic performance under conditions of progressive decrease in prevalence of infection, intensity and risk of morbidity as a result of repeated schistosomiasis control programmes on Pemba Island, United Republic of Tanzania. The results show that the sensitivity of a history of haematuria was higher (71%) in children but lower in adults (40%), similar to the findings for visual haematuria in children (60%) and adults (40%) at baseline. However, visual haematuria had a higher specificity, positive predictive value, and efficiency than a history of haematuria in both children and adults. Microhaematuria at the 1+ positivity limit (by reagent strips) had the highest sensitivity of all the methods investigated, but the lowest specificity, positive predictive value, and efficiency. Quantitatively, the indirect methods tended to increase in specificity, negative predictive value, and efficiency during the course of the intervention programme. In contrast, positive predictive value tended to decrease, while the sensitivity remained fairly stable. Overall, these findings suggest that a history of haematuria and/or visual haematuria are appropriate methods for preliminary screening of communities to identify those at risk of morbidity. Thereafter, microhaematuria (1+ positivity limit) may be the more appropriate method for targeting intervention at the individual level.Evaluation of urinalysis reagent strips versus microscopical examination of urine for Schistosoma haematobium.This study deals with the effectivecess of chemical reagent strips for detection of haematuria and proteinuria in selecting S. haematobium egg positive subjects as compared to microscopical examination of urine. Out of 222 students from primary and secondary rural schools, 191 were S. haematobium and 59 were parasitologically negative. 135 students had a count of less than 50 eggs/10 ml. urine and 56 had more than 50 eggs/10ml. The sensitivity of reagent strips in detecting haematuria was 10% and 36% for the groups with less than and more than 50 eggs/10 ml. of urine respectively. The correspondant microscope figures were 42% and 93% respectively. Proteinuria was detected in 11% and 29% of urines from the groups with less than and more than 50 eggs/10 ml. respectively. The specificity of strips and microscopical examination in detection of haematuria was 100%, while that for proteinuria was 97% as detected by strips. These results show that urinalysis strips cannot be used as an alternative to microscopic examination of urine for the presence of S. haematobium eggs.A comparative study on specific antibodies and circulating antigen (CAA) in serum and parasitological findings for diagnosis of schistosomiasis mansoni in an endemic area in Tanzania.A baseline study to evaluate the prevalence of Schistosoma mansoni infection as well as the diagnostic efficacy of serodiagnostic tests was performed in Kabaganga village, Kome island, Lake Victoria, Tanzania. A total of 1108 individuals were examined parasitologically and clinically. Egg excretion was demonstrated by one-sample Kato-Katz test. Specific IgG1 and IgG4 antibodies against S. mansoni adult worm (SAWA) and egg (SEA) antigens as well as circulating anodic antigen (CAA) were determined in serum samples from 250 of these subjects. As a control population 41 individuals from a non-endemic area were examined parasitologically, clinically and serologically. In the parasitologically examined Kabaganga population 45% were excreting eggs. The pattern of egg excretion was typical for an endemic area with a peak in the age group 10-14 years. Sixty-five percent of the serologically tested villagers were positive in the CAA test. A total of 80% were positive in either of the two tests, indicating an active infection. In 67-95% of these individuals the levels of isotype specific antibodies were increased. The prevalence of CAA positivity corresponded fairly well with that of Kato-Katz results in the age groups 10-29 years, but in the younger age groups a considerably greater number of individuals were positive in the CAA test than in the Kato-Katz test. The results obtained indicate that virtually all of the Kabaganga villagers, regardless of age, had an ongoing, active infection or had previously been infected with S. mansoni. This population, therefore, may be useful for evaluation of the diagnostic efficacy of various antibody tests. The highest degree of discrimination between the endemic and the non-endemic village populations was noted for anti-egg IgG4 antibodies. It is concluded that the combined determination of parasite eggs in faeces and CAA in serum provides high sensitivity as regards active infection. Increased levels of isotype-specific antibodies, particularly of the IgG4 subclass, is a sensitive indicator of past or present infection, and the prevalence of individuals with such increased levels may be a simple and reliable indicator of the frequency of schistosomiasis in a community.An evaluation of urine-CCA strip test and fingerprick blood SEA-ELISA for detection of urinary schistosomiasis in schoolchildren in Zanzibar.To develop better monitoring protocols for detection of urinary schistosomiasis during ongoing control interventions, two commercially available diagnostic tests - the urine-circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) strip and the soluble egg antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (SEA-ELISA) - were evaluated for detection of Schistosoma haematobium infections in 150 schoolchildren from Zanzibar. The children originated from five primary schools representative of different levels of disease endemicity across the island; using standard urine filtration assessment with microscopy, mean prevalence of S. haematobium was 30.7% (95% confidence interval (CI)=23.4-38.7%) and a total of 35.3% (95% CI=27.7-43.5%) and 8.0% (95% CI=4.2-13.6%) children presented with micro- and macro-haematuria, respectively. Diagnostic scores of the urine-CCA strip were not satisfactory, a very poor sensitivity of 9% (95% CI=2-21%) was observed, precluding any further consideration. By contrast, the performance of the SEA-ELISA using sera from fingerprick blood was good; a sensitivity of 89% (95% CI=76-96%), a specificity of 70% (95% CI=60-79%), a positive predictive value of 57% (95% CI=45-69%) and a negative predictive value of 90% (95% CI=86-98%) were found. At the unit of the school, a positive linear association between prevalence inferred from parasitological examination and SEA-ELISA methods was found. The SEA-ELISA holds promise as a complementary field-based method for monitoring infection dynamics in schoolchildren over and above standard parasitological methods.Field-based evaluation of a reagent strip test for diagnosis of schistosomiasis mansoni by detecting circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine in low endemic area in Ethiopia.The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of a reagent strip test for the diagnosis of schistosomiasis mansoni by detecting circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine were evaluated using 184 stool and urine samples collected from schoolchildren living in relatively low endemic area of schistosomiasis mansoni in Ethiopia. A combined result of stool samples processed by Kato and formol-ether concentration methods was used as gold standard. The results showed that detection of CCA in urine using reagent strip test was slightly higher than the combined results of the stool techniques (65.2 % vs 42.4 %, p > 0.05) in suggesting the prevalence of the disease. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the reagent strip test were 76.9 %, 43.4 %, 50 % and 71.9 %, respectively. The result of egg counts using Kato method suggested that detection of urine CCA could be used to indicate the intensity of infection. Nevertheless, like that of stool examination, the reagent strip test was found to be less sensitive in case of light to moderate infections. About 23.1 % of the study children who were excreting the eggs of the parasite were found negative by the reagent strip test. The relative insensitivity of a reagent strip test in low intensity of infection necessitates for the development of more sensitive assay that can truly discriminate schistosome-infected from non-infected individuals.The validity of haematuria in the community diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis infections.The validity and reliability of haematuria when used as screening criteria in community diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis is presented. Between May and July, 1998, 1173 persons were screened for haematuria and examined for the presence of eggs of Schistosoma haematobium in their urine from all participating households in the Ozitem area of Bende Local Government Area, Abia State, Nigeria. Haematuria showed a sensitivity rate of 41.0% and specificity of 82.0% when used to identify cases of urinary schistosomiasis. Some factors that influenced the validity of haematuria as a diagnostic criterion are discussed. The use of haematuria amongst subjects in the first twenty years of their life is recommended.Rapid diagnosis of schistosomiasis by antigen detection in urine with a reagent strip.For the rapid and simple diagnosis of schistosomiasis, a reagent strip assay for detection of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine was developed. The test was based on a previously developed sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) using a combination of two anti-CCA monoclonal antibodies. For the reagent strip assay, as the capture matrix, monoclonal antibody was coated onto a nitrocellulose membrane and mounted on polyvinyl chloride strips. Urine samples were then tested in an assay consisting of a combined incubation step of the urine sample and biotinylated detecting antibody followed by incubation in streptavidin peroxidase and a subsequent staining. The specificity and the sensitivity of the assay, as determined with urine samples of 61 uninfected controls and 67 Schistosoma mansoni-infected individuals, were 96.7 and 95.5%, respectively. The results of the reagent strip assay compared very well with microscopical parasitological diagnosis by the standard Kato-Katz method for the same individuals. The reagent strip test has a lower detection limit of 1 ng of CCA per ml and can be completed in 75 min. By the inclusion of two reference bands on the strips, standardized reading could be achieved. This reagent strip assay is a promising tool for qualitative diagnosis of S. mansoni infections in control programs.Evaluation of the reagent strip test for haematuria in the control of Schistosoma haematobium infection in schoolchildren.Several recent reports have indicated the potential of the reagent strip test for haematuria in the diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium infection. Approximately 15,000 schoolchildren from a population of 40,000 people were examined for reagent strip microhaematuria on three occasions between 1986 and 1987 and treated with praziquantel 40 mg/kg if positive. The reagent strip was evaluated against a single filtration of 10 ml urine for S. haematobium eggs. Initially 65.9% of children were treated followed by 37.5% at the second examination 6 months later and 44.5% at the third examination a further 12 months later. Reagent strip sensitivity was shown to be related to the intensity of infection. The reagent strip specificity improved significantly with successive treatments indicating that haematuria was more sensitive than parasitology for light infections. The amount of S. haematobium reinfection was highest in the 7-9 year olds decreasing to the 16-20 year age group which suggested an impact of protective immunity. It was concluded that microhaematuria is a valuable indicator for the diagnosis of S. haematobium in national control programmes and can be substituted for parasitological examination with advantage but sensitivity and specificity should continue to be evaluated throughout the programme.Evaluation of urine-circulating cathodic antigen (Urine-CCA) cassette test for the detection of Schistosoma mansoni infection in areas of moderate prevalence in Ethiopia.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of antigen detecting urine-CCA cassette test for the detection of Schistosoma mansoni infection in areas of moderate prevalence in Ethiopia.Stool specimens were collected from 620 schoolchildren on three consecutive days. The samples were microscopically examined using double Kato slides; midstream urine specimens were also collected for three consecutive days and tested for S. mansoni. The sensitivity of the urine-CCA cassette test was determined using combined results of six Kato-Katz thick smears and three urine-CCA cassette tests as gold standard. The specificity of the urine-CCA cassette test was evaluated in an area where schistosomiasis is not endemic.Prevalence of S. mansoni infection as determined by single urine-CCA cassette test was 65.9%, by single Kato-Katz smear 37.3% and by six Kato-Katz thick smears 53.1% (P < 0.001). A single urine-CCA cassette test was significantly (P < 0.001) more sensitive (89.1%), had a lower negative predictive value (78.2%), was more accurate (92.6%) and agreed better with the gold standard (k = 0.83) than one or six Kato-Katz thick smears. However, both the Kato-Katz and urine-CCA cassette test showed 100% specificity in endemic settings.In moderate and high prevalence areas, urine-CCA cassette test is more sensitive than the Kato-Katz method and can be used for screening and mapping of S. mansoni infection.[Simple indicators of prevalence and intensity of urinary bilharziasis in Chad].Comparison of urine filtration and a chemical reagent strip in the diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in Ethiopia.The diagnostic efficacy of a chemical reagent strip (Ames Multistix) was compared with syringe-Nytrel urine filtration technique in the detection of S. haematobium infection at varying disease endemicity levels in the Awash Valley of Ethiopia. In low endemicity area (Afambo), the reagent strip showed highest sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of 80%, 96%, 40% and 99% respectively at "1+ limit" of microhaematuria. In the moderate (Dahitele) to high (Enta Doyta) areas, the highest diagnostic values of 77%, 83%, 56% and 93% respectively and 78%, 67%, 51% and 87% respectively were obtained at "trace limit". Using these cut-off points of haematuria, the prevalence of S. haematobium were 4.5%, 30.8% and 47% at low, moderate and high endemicity areas compared to 3.2%, 21% and 31% respectively using the filtration technique. A highly significant (maximum Kendall's tau = 0.44271; p < 0.002) was observed between N + 1 transformed geometric mean egg counts and micro-haematuria in the 10-19 years of age at all levels of endemicity. The efficacy and simplicity of chemical reagent strips and limitations of single parasitological examinations are discussed.Detection and quantification of soluble egg antigen in urine of Schistosoma haematobium-infected children from Kenya.While research on alternative diagnostic and morbidity markers for infection with Schistosoma haematobium has been going on for a long time, egg counts continue to be used as the gold standard, and infection intensity is thought to reflect the severity of the disease. However, this relationship is not always clear and fluctuation in egg output makes it difficult to classify prevalence correctly. The use of circulating adult worm antigen detection as an alternative diagnostic technique has been applied with varying success. However, this is a measure of worm burden and does not reflect the tissue egg load(s). In the present study we have used an assay that detects soluble egg antigen (SEA) in urine of S. haematobium-infected children, and we have evaluated the applicability of the assay as a diagnostic and morbidity indicator. To evaluate this assay, we have studied a group of 470 children from two schools (Tsunguni and Kibaokiche) in the Coast province of Kenya; 84.8% and 77% were egg-positive while the percentage positive as determined by the SEA-ELISA were 78.8% and 76.2% in Tsunguni and Kibaokiche, respectively. In both schools, SEA levels in urine of S. haematobium-infected children significantly correlated with egg counts (Pearson's r=0.73, P < 0.0001) and with hematuria (Spearman's r=0.65, P < 0.0001). In addition, urinary tract pathology as determined by ultrasound significantly correlated with the SEA levels in urine (Spearman's r=0.3, P < 0.001). The SEA-ELISA compared well with microhematuria within egg count classes and with egg counts within hematuria classes.Schistosomiasis of the lower reproductive tract without egg excretion in urine.The individual and public health impact of female genital schistosomiasis (FGS) has been studied and FGS as a risk factor for acquiring human immunodeficiency virus is discussed. In a community-based study in Tanzania, 40% of the women of child-bearing age (n=543) showed excretion of Schistosoma haematobium eggs in the urine (median=2.2 eggs/10 ml of urine) and 32% (n=263) had S. haematobium eggs in their cervical tissue. Urinary and genital schistosomiasis coexisted in 62% of the women, but S. haematobium eggs were found in the cervix without detectable egg excretion in the urine in 23%. Only 43% of the FGS cases had hematuria. Since FGS frequently exists in women with scanty or no egg excretion in the urine and because this disease manifestation is a considerable individual and public health hazard in S. haematobium-endemic areas, mass treatment targeted to women of child-bearing age should be considered.Field-based evaluation of a reagent strip test for diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni by detecting circulating cathodic antigen in urine before and after chemotherapy.The sensitivity of a reagent strip test for the diagnosis of schistosomiasis by detecting circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine was evaluated under field conditions using 251 stool and urine samples collected from a Schistosoma mansoni-endemic area of Ethiopia. The specificity of the test was evaluated in an area where schistosomiasis is not endemic. Stool samples were examined microscopically using duplicate Kato slides and formol-ether concentration methods. The effectiveness of the test in monitoring efficacy was also evaluated following chemotherapy. The results revealed that detection of CCA in urine using the one-step reagent strip test was superior to the stool examination methods (P<0.05) in indicating the prevalence of the disease. Assuming the combination of parasitological test results as the gold standard, the sensitivity and specificity of the test were 82.1% and 75.9%, respectively. The results of egg counts suggested the potential use of urine CCA in indicating the intensity of infection as an alternative to parasitological methods. The sensitivity and specificity of the test were 75% and 73.7%, respectively, following chemotherapy. Diagnosis of S. mansoni infection in urine using reagent strips would provide information on the prevalence of the disease, although further study is needed to improve its sensitivity and specificity.Eosinophil cationic protein, soluble egg antigen, circulating anodic antigen, and egg excretion in male urogenital schistosomiasis.Markers of male genital schistosomiasis (MGS) are needed to elucidate the consequences for reproductive health. Eosinophil cationic protein (ECP) and soluble egg antigen (SEA) in urine and semen, and circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in serum were assessed as MGS markers. Egg counts, ECP, and SEA in urine and CAA in serum, correlated positively. Seminal egg excretion exhibited marked day-to-day variations, but counts correlated positively with urinary egg counts and SEA in semen and with CAA. Positive predictive values with reference to seminal egg excretion were as follows: seminal ECP (52%), seminal SEA (83%), CAA (97%), and urinary egg excretion (82%). SEA in semen and CAA in serum constitute potential markers of MGS. However, urine egg counts as an indirect marker of MGS remains the preferred diagnostic method from a public health perspective.A reagent strip antigen capture assay for the assessment of cure of schistosomiasis patients.Presence of the schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in urine of patients with Schistosoma mansoni or S. haematobium infections.We investigated the presence of the circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in the urine of schistosomiasis patients. This genus specific antigen was hitherto demonstrated only in the serum of schistosomiasis patients. The urine of 80 patients with Schistosoma mansoni infections, 33 patients with S. haematobium infections, and 2 patients with mixed S. haematobium and S. mansoni infections were screened by a quantitative enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). CAA was demonstrated in 81% of those with intestinal schistosomiasis and in 97% of those with urinary schistosomiasis. CAA titers were less than 1:0.2-1:51.2. Results were compared with circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) titers in urine obtained in an indirect hemagglutination assay (IHA). CCA was generally not detectable in the urine of patients with S. haematobium infection, but was demonstrated in the urine of 85% of the patients with S. mansoni infection. Both CAA titers and CCA titers correlated positively with the number of S. mansoni eggs excreted in the feces, but CAA titers did not show a significant correlation with the number of S. haematobium eggs in urine. Both antigen titers showed a moderate correlation with the serum CAA level in schistosomiasis mansoni. The discovery of CAA in the urine of the majority of schistosomiasis patients tested suggests the use of urine samples for non-invasive immunodiagnosis of the disease.Urban transmission of urinary schistosomiasis in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.A cross sectional survey for Schistosoma haematobium infections was undertaken in 12 primary schools in the city of Dar es Salaam. The prevalence in the schools ranged from 5.3 to 55.1%, with an overall prevalence of 19.3%. More males (23.5%) than females (15.0%) were infected, and the highest prevalence was recorded in the 11-16 year age group. Intensity of infection was high, ranging from 12 to 96 eggs/10 ml urine in individual schools. 26% of the infected excreted more than 50 eggs/10 ml urine, and high rates of haematuria and proteinuria were observed in infected children. Interviews indicated that the majority of the children had acquired their infection in the city. Malacological surveys showed two potential vectors, Bulinus (Physopsis) globosus and B. (Ph.) nasutus, to be common in Dar es Salaam. Laboratory and field findings confirmed that these two species were vectors of S. haematobium. Factors responsible for continued transmission in this urban environment are discussed.Application of immunodiagnostic assays: detection of antibodies and circulating antigens in human schistosomiasis and correlation with clinical findings.In an initial cross-sectional survey, serum, urine, and stool samples were collected from 370 participants representing about 10% of the population (n = 4,438) in Behbeet village, 50 km south of Cairo, Egypt, an area well known to be endemic solely for Schistosoma haematobium. Diagnosis was approached in two parallel ways. The first approach, which simulated actual conditions in many endemic areas in Egypt, was based on physical examination and urine and stool microscopic analysis. The second approach was based on two advanced immunodiagnostic assay systems. One system detected antibodies to species-specific microsomal antigens, the other detected circulating schistosomal antigens. Microsomal antigens from S. haematobium and S. mansoni were used to detect antibodies in the Falcon assay screening test (FAST)-ELISA and the enzyme-linked immunoelectrotransfer blot (EITB). Circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) were quantified in serum and urine samples in a sandwich ELISA using monoclonal antibodies. Parasitologically, the prevalence of S. haematobium was 7.01% in females and 25.82% in males, giving an overall prevalence of 15.8%. The combination of urine CCA and serum CAA for detecting circulating antigens and the combination of the S. haematobium adult worm microsomal antigens (HAMA) FAST-ELISA and the HAMA EITB for detecting antibodies significantly improved the sensitivity of detecting S. haematobium circulating antigens and antibodies. Also, including a medical examination as an integral part of field studies and correlating immunodiagnostic results with other clinical and investigational data allowed us to calculate an accurate estimation of S. haematobium prevalence in this area of low endemicity.Mixed Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni infection: effect of different treatments on the serum level of circulating anodic antigen (CAA).In this study, levels of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in serum were investigated after differential treatment of 160 Sudanese patients with mixed Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni infections. The patients were randomly divided into four groups, which were treated with metrifonate (two doses of 10 mg/kg bodyweight), oxamniquine (60 mg/kg), praziquantel (40 mg/kg), or a multivitamin preparation, respectively. Serum, stool and urine samples were taken prior to treatment as well as one month and five months after chemotherapy. Before chemotherapy CAA levels were similar in the four groups. Antigenemia remained unchanged in the control group. In patients treated with praziquantel or oxamniquine the concentration of CAA decreased to a similar extent. However, whereas in the praziquantel group absence of CAA was already observed one month after treatment, clearing of CAA from the circulation seemed to take longer in patients treated with oxamniquine. Treatment with metrifonate did not result in a reduction of the CAA titres.Applicability of a monoclonal antibody-based dipstick in diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in the Central Region of Ghana.Summary We tested a rapid visually read monoclonal antibody (MoAb) based dipstick assay for specific diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis against microscopy and the use of haematuria and proteinuria in a schistosomiasis haematobia endemic area in the Central Region of Ghana. The study group consisted of 141 school children (83 males, 58 females) aged 8-19 years. A total of 129 of 141 (91.5%) submitted stool samples, and 7.8% had Schistosoma mansoni, 55% had hookworms and 6.2% had tapeworms. The presence of S. mansoni and intestinal parasites did not appear to influence the results of the MoAb-dipstick assay. The urinary schistosomiasis prevalence by MoAb-dipstick (78%) was higher (P < 0.05) than the estimate by microscopy (60.3%), microhaematuria (27%) and proteinuria (30.5%). The MoAb-dipstick correctly identified 98.8% of microscopically confirmed cases and missed one (1.3%). The dipstick was also positive for 26 of 56 (46.4%) egg-negative individuals, thereby giving a sensitivity of 98.8% and a specificity of 53.6%. On the other hand, microhaematuria and proteinuria were 38.8% and 30.6% sensitive, and 91.1% and 69.6% specific, respectively. Microhaematuria and proteinuria were less sensitive (P < 0.05) than both microscopy and MoAb-dipstick.Validation of reagent sticks in diagnosing urinary schistosomiasis in an urban setting.In view of the established potential of reagent sticks for detecting haematuria, a pilot survey to validate their use in the diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in an urban setting was done at Kinyerezi primary school of Ilala district in Dar es salaam. From 404 pupils screened for the disease, 273 were positive for the eggs by microscopy (filtration method), giving a prevalence of 67.6% and 253 (92.6%) of those who were positive by microscopy were also positive for haematuria by reagent sticks. Out of 131 who had no disease, 113 (86.2%) were negative for haematuria by the reagent sticks. These findings indicate a high sensitivity and specificity of microhaematuria by the reagent sticks (92.6% and 86.2%) respectively. Taking microscopy as a standard test, macrohaematuria had a sensitivity and specificity of 40.6% and 90% respectively, for urinary schistosomiasis. The accuracy of microhaematuria by reagent sticks was 90% compared to macrohaematuria which was only 56.6%. The use of reagent sticks test in detecting microhaematuria is thus recommended as a valid and rapid diagnostic test for urinary schistosomiasis in the present setting.Evaluation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine-cassette assay as a survey tool for Schistosoma mansoni in different transmission settings within Bugiri District, Uganda.Diagnosis of schistosomiasis at the point-of-care (POC) is a growing topic in neglected tropical disease research. There is a need for diagnostic tests which are affordable, sensitive, specific, user-friendly, rapid, equipment-free and delivered to those who need it, and POC is an important tool for disease mapping and guiding mass deworming. The aim of present study was to evaluate the relative diagnostic performance of two urine-circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) cassette assays, one commercially available and the other in experimental production, against results obtained using the standard Kato-Katz faecal smear method (six thick smears from three consecutive days), as a 'gold-standard', for Schistosoma mansoni infection in different transmission settings in Uganda. Our study was conducted among 500 school children randomly selected across 5 schools within Bugiri district, adjacent to Lake Victoria in Uganda. Considering results from the 469 pupils who provided three stool samples for the six Kato-Katz smears, 293 (76%) children had no infection, 109 (23%) were in the light intensity category, while 42 (9%) and 25 (5%) were in the moderate and heavy intensity categories respectively. Following performance analysis of CCA tests in terms of sensitivity, specificity, negative and positive predictive values, overall performance of the commercially available CCA test was more informative than single Kato-Katz faecal smear microscopy, the current operational field standard for disease mapping. The current CCA assay is therefore a satisfactory method for surveillance of S. mansoni in an area where disease endemicity is declining due to control interventions. With the recent resolution on schistosomiasis elimination by the 65th World Health Assembly, the urine POC CCA test is an attractive tool to augment and perhaps replace the Kato-Katz sampling within ongoing control programmes. Control of morbidity due to Schistosoma haematobium on Pemba Island: programme organization and management.A programme to control urinary schistosomiasis was initiated on Pemba island in January 1986 with the objectives of eliminating morbidity due to S. haematobium by utilizing a primary health care approach of strengthening the existing health care delivery system and creating a sound basis for future control of other parasitic and communicable diseases. The plan of action included training of rural health assistants to undertaken an intervention phase targeted to schools for selective population chemotherapy surveys at six-month intervals during the first two years, using indirect diagnostic techniques (observation of gross haematuria and detection of microscopic haematuria by chemical reagent strips) to identify individuals for treatment with praziquantel at a dose of 40 mg/kg body weight. The evaluation of the indirect techniques indicated that both sensitivity and specificity of the chemical reagent strips to detect infection were greater than 90%. After three selective population chemotherapy surveys, the prevalence of gross haematuria was reduced by 94.2% (15.8% to 0.9%) and both gross and microscopic haematuria were reduced by 76.4% (54.1% to 12.8%) among school children. Community involvement and health education were stressed in this programme. The use of dispensary laboratories to maintain control of urinary schistosomiasis is now being evaluated.Epidemiologic application of circulating antigen detection in a recent Schistosoma mansoni focus in northern Senegal.Quantitative enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISAs) for the detection of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in serum and urine were applied as an epidemiologic tool in a recent, intense focus of Schistosoma mansoni in Senegal. Both CAA and CCA in serum and CCA in urine were found in 94%, 83%, and 95%, respectively, of the population, of which 91% were positive on stool examination. Circulating antigens were also detectable in sera and urines of most egg-negative individuals. The sensitivities of the urine CCA and serum CAA ELISA were substantially higher than that of a single egg count, and increased with egg output. The CAA and CCA levels correlated well with egg counts and with each other. The age-related evolution of antigen levels followed a similar pattern as egg counts, providing supplementary evidence for a genuine reduction of worm burdens in adults in spite of the supposed absence of acquired immunity in this recently exposed community. The antigen:egg ratios decreased in adults, suggesting lower worm fecundity in children. This would be compatible with a density-dependent reduction of fecundity, but not with anti-fecundity immunity in adults that perhaps has not yet developed in this new focus.Urinary tract morbidity in schistosomiasis haematobia: associations with age and intensity of infection in an endemic area of Coast Province, Kenya.To gain better understanding of the natural history of Schistosoma haematobium associated disease, age- and intensity-related urinary tract morbidity were assessed in a cross-sectional study of Kilole (population 719) in Coast Province, Kenya. Overall prevalence of infection was 65% (39% light, 16% moderate, 9% heavy). Infection prevalence and mean intensity of infection were highest in the 5-14-year-old bracket for both sexes. Although significant intensity-associated increases in hematuria prevalence were noted for both children and adults in all infection categories, hematuria was more common in those less than 15 years of age. Children had a significant increase in the prevalence of dysuria at higher levels of infection, whereas adults did not. Radiographic study of a 1:9 random sample, stratified for age, revealed a greater prevalence of urinary tract granulomas in those less than 15 years. Subjects greater than 15 years of age had a greater frequency of hydronephrosis. Hydronephrosis, hydroureter, and bladder calcification were not associated with higher infection intensity. Among individuals with bladder calcification, a potential marker of cumulative inflammation, 87% had hydronephrosis or hydroureter, compared to a 40% prevalence among individuals without bladder calcification. These findings suggest that certain structural forms of urinary tract disease, such as hydronephrosis, progress during the course of untreated schistosomiasis haematobia despite age-related reductions in egg burden, whereas other forms of morbidity, such as hematuria, remain sensitive to the level of urinary egg excretion at the time of diagnosis.The use of reagent strips for detection of urinary schistosomiasis infection in the middle Awash Valley, Ethiopia.Reagent strip test was carried out to detect haematuria in urinary schistosomiasis infection in ten schools (1114 children) in the middle Awash Valley, Ethiopia. In five schools (557 children), were compared with results of urine filtration technique conducted simultaneously. The prevalence of infection by reagent sticks and urine filtration was 19.5% and 3.1%, respectively. Haematuria, detected by the reagent strip, was highly related with the results of urine filtration at the 2+ limit rather than the 1+ limit. However, the intensity of infection of all children was highly associated with prevalence rate at both haematuria limits. The possible use of reagent strips in Ethiopia to monitor morbidity (haematuria) due to S. haematobium infection is discussed.New approaches with different types of circulating cathodic antigen for the diagnosis of patients with low Schistosoma mansoni load.Schistosomiasis mansoni is a debilitating and sometimes fatal disease. Accurate diagnosis plays a key role in patient management and infection control. However, currently available parasitological methods are laborious and lack sensitivity. The selection of target antigen candidates has turned out to be a promising tool for the development of more sensitive diagnostic methods. In our previous investigations, the use of crude antigens led to false-positive results. Recently, focus has been given to highly purified Schistosoma mansoni antigens, especially to circulating antigens.Thus, our main goal was to test different types of circulating cathodic antigen glycoprotein (CCA), as "crude antigen," the protein chain of recombinant CCA and two individual peptides. These schistosome proteins/peptides were tested in a new diagnostic method employing immunomagnetic separation based on the improvement of antigen-antibody binding.Use of recombinant CCA as a diagnostic antigen allowed us to develop a diagnostic assay with high sensitivity and specificity with no false-negative results. Interestingly, the "crude antigen" worked as a good marker for control of cure after praziquantel treatment.Our new diagnostic method was superior to enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in diagnosing low endemicity patients.Day-to-day fluctuation of schistosome circulating antigen levels in serum and urine of humans infected with Schistosoma mansoni in Burundi.Day-to-day fluctuations of both circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in serum and urine were examined simultaneously in a group of Schistosoma mansoni-infected individuals from Burundi and compared with each other and with fecal egg count fluctuations. Significant correlations were found between fecal egg counts and circulating antigens (CAA and CCA) and between circulating antigen levels in serum and urine samples. The cumulative percentage of positive results after three samplings was highest for urine CCA detection, followed by fecal egg counts, serum CCA, serum CAA, and urine CAA detection, respectively. It was demonstrated that circulating antigen levels in both serum and urine showed less fluctuation than fecal egg counts, except for urine CAA levels. The serum CAA detection assay in particular, although less sensitive in this low endemic area in Burundi, gave very constant measurements over a period of one week. Our results indicate that detection of circulating antigens in a single serum or urine sample provides a quantitatively more stable diagnosis of S. mansoni infection than fecal egg counts based on a single stool examination.Quantitative determination of circulating antigens in human schistosomiasis mansoni using an indirect hemagglutination assay.In serum and urine specimens collected from a group of Schistosoma mansoni infected individuals from Makundju, Zaire, the schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) were quantitatively determined using an indirect hemagglutination reaction with sheep erythrocytes sensitized with mouse IgM monoclonal antibodies directed against these circulating antigens. Levels of CAA in serum (up to 5 ng/ml) and CCA in serum and urine (up to 50 ng/ml) were strongly correlated with egg excretion and with each other. No correlation was found between egg excretion and antibody levels against the circulating antigens. Antigen was detectable only in patients excreting greater than 500 eggs per gram of feces.Detection and quantification of circulating antigen in schistosomiasis by monoclonal antibody. II. The quantification of circulating antigens in human schistosomiasis mansoni and haematobium: relationship to intensity of infection and disease status.Circulating cathodic and circulating anodic antigens were quantified in sera of patients infected with S. mansoni, S. haematobium or both parasites. A monoclonal antibody and a polyclonal antiserum were applied in precipitation and solid phase immunosorbent techniques using radio- and enzyme-labelled antibody as a tracer to detect the cathodic and anodic antigen respectively. The results show that circulating cathodic antigen can frequently be detected in an immunoprecipitation or an immunoradiometric assay in serum of infected patients. The serum concentration of this antigen was found to be significantly correlated to the number of S. mansoni worms and to be higher in patients with the hepatosplenic form of the disease than in those without such complications. Examining paired serum samples before and after specific treatment the determination of this antigen by monoclonal antibody reliably indicated efficacy of chemotherapy in patients having received different forms of treatment.Hematuria and dysuria in the self-diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis among school-children in Northern Cameroon.The present study was designed to assess the value of self reported hematuria and dysuria in the diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis at the individual level. A sample of 964 school children of grade 5 and 6 from 15 schools of the French speaking educational system in the Sudano-sahelian zone of northern Cameroon were submitted to a questionnaire related to hematuria and dysuria, and provided a urine sample each. The urine samples were processed using the dip stick and sedimentation methods, and the degree of microhematuria and oviuria determined. In all 964 questionnaires were collected, 843 urine samples examined for microhematuria and 871 for oviuria. The percentage of children reporting hematuria increased with the degree of microhematuria and the intensity of infection. Among the various indicators of urinary schistosome infection, microhematuria had the highest sensitivity (76%), followed by self reported hematuria or dysuria (65%), and dysuria (52%). The specificity was highest for self reported hematuria, and lowest for self reported hematuria or dysuria. The efficiency of self reported hematuria or dysuria increased with the intensity of infection and was highest (100%) for heavy infections (> 400 eggs/ml g urine). We advocate the use of self reported hematuria or dysuria for the assessment of S. haematobium at the individual level.Urinary schistosomiasis among pregnant women in some endemic tropical semi - urban communities of Anambra State, Nigeria.Urinary schistosomiasis is caused by the deposition of eggs by adult flukes in the blood vessels surrounding the bladder of the infected host. Schistosomiasis is ranked the second most important parasitic disease of man and undoubtedly the most important of helminth origin. This paper reports the prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium infection among pregnant women in some endemic tropical semi - urban communities of Anambra State, Nigeria, screened using Medi-Test Combi 9 and urine centrifugation methods. Laboratory analysis of urine samples collected from 172 pregnant women indicated that 41 (23.8%) had urinary schistosomiasis with Anam community having the highest prevalence of 35.1% among other communities. The overall prevalence and intensity of infection among age groups showed that the youngest age group in the study, 16-20 years had the highest prevalence. Out of 24 women within this age group, 12 (50.0%) were infected among which 8 (33.3%) had light infection while 4 (16.6%) had moderate infection. The peak mean intensity of 7.6 eggs/10ml urine was observed in age group 16-20 years while the oldest age group, 41-45 years had the lowest mean intensity of 1.0 egg/10ml urine. Haematuria and proteinuria which are diagnostic for schistosomiasis were higher within age group 16-20 years in all the communities with Anam community having the highest prevalence of 50% for both biochemicals within age group 16-20 years. The findings from this study will be useful in developing specific programme for this special group of women.Urinary schistosomiasis in southern Ghana: 1. Prevalence and morbidity assessment in three (defined) rural areas drained by the Densu river.Epidemiological studies on urinary schistosomiasis were carried out in eight villages in the Ga and Akuapem South districts in Ghana. Single urine samples were collected from individuals aged 5 years and above between 10.00 and 14.00 h. The samples were examined for the presence of Schistosoma haematobium eggs using a filtration technique. Indirect morbidity was determined as the presence of microhaematuria and proteinuria using reagent strips, and macrohaematuria was recorded with the naked eye. Out of the study population of 3912 subjects, 2562 (65.5%) submitted urine samples. The prevalence of a Schistosoma haematobium infection ranged between 54.8 and 60.0%. Infection rates increased by age with a peak in the 10-19 years category, and decreased with increasing age. Disease prevalence was higher in males aged 15 years and above in Areas 2 (Ntoaso and Sansami Amanfro) and 3 (Dom Faase, Papase, Chento and Gidi Kope), whereas it was higher among males aged 10 years and above in Area 1 (Ayikai Doblo and Akramaman). The intensity of infection was highest among children aged 10-14 years in most of the villages. More than half of egg-positive children in this age group had a heavy infection (100 eggs and above in 10 ml of urine). Although both egg-positive and egg-negative individuals manifested variable degrees of macro- or micro-haematuria, microhaematuria was more prevalent among egg-positives (chi(2)=918.5, d.f.=1, P<0.01). The degree of microhaematuria and proteinuria were significantly associated with the intensity of the infection. These results indicate a high transmission of disease in the study area.Circulating anodic antigen levels in serum before and after chemotherapy with praziquantel in schistosomiasis mansoni.The kinetics of serum levels of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) of Schistosoma mansoni were studied in patients with intestinal schistosomiasis before and after treatment with praziquantel. Day to day fluctuation in faecal egg excretion was compared with fluctuation in antigen level in 20 patients by serum and stool examination on 3 consecutive days before treatment. Antigen levels - calculated either as absorbance value of undiluted serum or as titre - showed less fluctuation than the number of eggs per gram of faeces determined by stool examinations based on single or duplicate 25 mg Kato smears. Compared with a placebo control group of 11 individuals, there was a significant reduction in CAA level in serum of 10 patients treated with praziquantel (40 mg/kg), 10 weeks after treatment. A similar decrease in serum CAA level was observed in a group of 46 patients treated with praziquantel, 6 weeks after treatment. In both groups, patients who remained seropositive after treatment still excreted eggs in their faeces. The kinetics of the antigen decrease were studied in more detail in 20 patients in hospital. Within 10 d after treatment with a double dose of 40 mg praziquantel per kg body weight, the antigen level fell to less than 10% of the original serum level, with a CAA half-life of approximately 2 d.Circulating anodic antigen levels in two areas endemic for schistosomiasis mansoni indicate differences in worm fecundity.Serum levels of the adult schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) were compared in 2 populations, both living in an area with extremely high transmission levels of Schistosoma mansoni. In one focus (Maniema, eastern Zaire) transmission has been established for several decades, while in the other focus (Ndombo, northern Senegal) transmission started only recently. While parasite egg counts in the 2 populations were virtually similar, including analogous age-related distributions, serum levels of CAA were approximately 5 times higher in the chronically exposed community. This difference in antigen level was most pronounced in adolescents and adults. As the level of CAA is assumed to be a direct reflection of worm burden, these findings suggest higher parasite fecundity in the recently exposed community. It is not very likely that these observations could be explained solely by differences in clearance mechanisms caused by a variation in experience of infection. The relationship between circulating antigen levels and egg counts was consistent for all age groups in the Maniema population, while in the Ndombo population only children showed a pattern similar to that in the chronically exposed community.The significance of proteinuria and haematuria in Schistosoma haematobium infection.The intensity and prevalence of proteinuria and haematuria were studied with urinanalysis reagent strips in a Gambian community in which the intensity of infection with Schistosoma haematobium was high. The level of proteinuria present was shown to be related to the intensity of infection. Follow-up for 12 months showed that infected subjects with heavy proteinuria had a good prognosis. These findings suggest that the urinary protein in such subjects is likely to originate from lesions in the bladder and ureters and that advanced glomerular pathology is probably rare. The relationship of the levels of proteinuria and haematuria to the egg count suggests they may be parameters which could have value as indications for chemotherapy. Detailed study showed that the effect of treating all the subjects who had both 30 mg/100 ml or more of protein and at least a trace of haematuria would have been very similar to treating all those with an egg count of 200 ova/10 ml or more. Since urinalysis with reagent strips is very simple and rapid it could have a role in mass chemotherapy campaigns, particularly those aimed at the identification and treatment of heavily infected subjects.Immunodiagnosis of schistosomiasis mansoni in a low endemic area in Surinam by determination of the circulating antigens CAA and CCA.We evaluated the applicability of circulating antigen detection in serum and urine for the diagnosis of Schistosoma infections in a low endemic area. In total 389 individuals from Saramacca (Surinam) participated in the survey. Stool samples were examined using the Kato method, while circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) were determined by highly specific monoclonal antibody-based ELISA's. Also schistosome specific IgM antibodies were measured by the indirect immunofluorescence assay, but the diagnostic performance of this test was found to be poor in this population. S. mansoni eggs were found in 29% of the examined cases, while CAA and CCA could be demonstrated in 23% and 17% of the serum samples and in 3% and 28% of the urine samples, respectively. Forty three percent of the study population was positive in at least one of these diagnostic assays, indicating that each individual test misses a substantial part of the subjects with an active infection. In most positive cases, intensities of infection were very low. As 204 individuals participated in all screening assays, diagnostic performance of each test was evaluated in this sub-population. The highest sensitivities were achieved with the urine-CCA assay and the parasitological examination, detecting 59 and 58 out of the 107 cases with an active infection, respectively. The serum-CAA assay detected 47 positive cases. Our results demonstrate that determination of circulating antigens, especially CCA in urine and CAA in serum, provides information additional to the parasitological examination, for the assessment of prevalence and intensity of Schistosoma infection in low endemic areas.Use of circulating cathodic antigen strips for the diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis.Rapid diagnostic tests are needed for the implementation and monitoring of national schistosomiasis control programmes. The field applicability of the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine reagent strip for the diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium infection was evaluated among 265 pre- and primary schoolchildren aged 2-19 years in a rural area of Zimbabwe. The CCA strip was compared with egg detection before and six weeks after treatment with praziquantel. Pre-treatment prevalence (overall 40.4%) and intensity of infection, as determined by egg counts, increased with age. CCA and parasitological results were significantly correlated (P<0.001), although concordance was slight (kappa=0.21). Discordant results were mainly attributable to CCA-positive, egg-negative individuals. Correlations and levels of agreement improved significantly with age (P<0.001, kappa=0.40) and intensity of infection (P<0.001). Praziquantel treatment led to 'cure' in 90.9% and 70.5% of children as measured by the egg detection and CCA methods, respectively. An arbitrary gold standard was constructed that included both CCA and egg detection results. Using this standard, the sensitivities of the CCA test were 88.2% and 95.8%, respectively, for pre- and post-treatment results. The improved version that is field applicable now has an acceptable role in the field diagnosis of S. haematobium.Circulating anodic and cathodic antigen in serum and urine of mixed Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni infections in Office du Niger, Mali.In Office du Niger, an area endemic for both Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni in Mali, circulating anodic (CAA) and cathodic (CCA) antigen detection assays were performed on pretreatment serum and urine samples from two villages, Rigandé and Siguivoucé, and compared with egg counting methods. The highest prevalence was obtained with the urine-CCA assay which also had the highest sensitivity to S. haematobium, S. mansoni or mixed infection. A single urine-CCA assay was as sensitive as repeated egg counts (one stool+two urine examinations per individual). When the different assays were tested in parallel, several combinations including assays on serum were found to be highly sensitive. As urine sampling is widely accepted, urine assays will be used for further monitoring these villages one and two years after chemotherapy.Schistosoma mansoni Infections in young children: when are schistosome antigens in urine, eggs in stool and antibodies to eggs first detectable?in uganda, control of intestinal schistosomiasis with preventive chemotherapy is typically focused towards treatment of school-aged children; the needs of younger children are presently being investigated as in lakeshore communities very young children can be infected. In the context of future epidemiological monitoring, we sought to compare the detection thresholds of available diagnostic tools for Schistosoma mansoni and estimate a likely age of first infection for these children.a total of 242 infants and preschool children (134 boys and 108 girls, mean age 2.9 years, minimum 5 months and maximum 5 years) were examined from Bugoigo, a well-known disease endemic village on Lake Albert. Schistosome antigens in urine, eggs in stool and host antibodies to eggs were inspected to reveal a general prevalence of 47.5% (CI(95) 41.1-54.0%), as ascertained by a positive criterion from at least one diagnostic method. Although children as young as 6 months old could be found infected, the average age of infected children was between 3¼-3¾ years, when diagnostic techniques became broadly congruent.whilst different assays have particular (dis)advantages, direct detection of eggs in stool was least sensitive having a temporal lag behind antigen and antibody methods. Setting precisely a general age of first infection is problematic but if present Ugandan policies continue, a large proportion of infected children could wait up to 3-4 years before receiving first medication. To better tailor treatment needs for this younger ageclass, we suggest that the circulating cathodic antigen urine dipstick method to be used as an epidemiological indicator.Evaluation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine-tests for diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni infection in Cameroon.The Kato-Katz is the most common diagnostic method for Schistosoma mansoni infection. However, the day-to-day variability in host egg-excretion and its low detection sensitivity are major limits for its use in low transmission zones and after widespread chemotherapy. We evaluated the accuracy of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine-assay as a diagnostic tool of S. mansoni. In comparison, a low sensitive CCA test (CCA-L) was assessed.THE STUDY WAS CONDUCTED IN THREE SETTINGS: two foci with single S. mansoni infections (settings A and B), and one mixed S. mansoni - S. haematobium focus (setting C). Stool and urine samples were collected from school-children on three consecutive days. Triplicate Kato-Katz readings were performed per stool sample. Each urine sample was tested with one CCA and only the first urine sample was subjected to CCA-L. Urine samples were also examined for S. haematobium eggs using the filtration method and for microhaematuria using urine reagent strips. Overall, 625 children provided three stool and three urine samples.Considering nine Kato-Katz thick smears as 'reference' diagnostic test, the prevalence of S. mansoni was 36.2%, 71.8% and 64.0% in settings A, B and C, respectively. The prevalence of S. haematobium in setting C was 12.0%. The sensitivities of single Kato-Katz, CCA and CCA-L from the first stool or urine samples were 58%, 82% and 46% in setting A, 56.8%, 82.4% and 68.8% in setting B, and 49.0%, 87.7% and 55.5% in setting C. The respective specificities were 100%, 64.7% and 100%; 100%, 62.3% and 91.3%; and 100%, 42.5% and 92.0%. Mixed infection with S. haematobium did not influence the CCA test results for S. mansoni diagnosis.Urine CCA revealed higher sensitivity than CCA-L and triplicate Kato-Katz, and produced similar prevalence as nine Kato-Katz. It seems an attractive method for S. mansoni diagnosis.Improved diagnostic performance of the circulating antigen assay in human schistosomiasis by parallel testing for circulating anodic and cathodic antigens in serum and urine.Serum and urine levels of two Schistosoma circulating antigens, the circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA), were determined by monoclonal antibody-based enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays in 56 Egyptian patients infected with S. mansoni and in 12 patients infected with both S. mansoni and S. haematobium. Both CAA and CCA could be specifically demonstrated in 82% and 88% of the serum samples and in 88% and 87% of the urine samples, respectively. While complete specificity was maintained, sensitivity was increased to a range of 91-98% by parallel use of the two circulating antigen assays, i.e., an individual with a positive titer for at least one of the assays was considered to be infected. A combination of CAA and CCA determinations in urine samples only resulted in a sensitivity of 94%. However, the highest sensitivity was achieved when the serum-CCA assay was combined with the urine-CCA assay (98%) or with the urine-CAA assay (97%). Sensitivity could not be increased further by combining more than two tests. A significant correlation was demonstrated between the level of circulating antigen and the number of parasite eggs in feces in each of the four assays. In addition, the levels of CAA and CCA in serum and urine were significantly correlated with each other. Our results indicate that diagnosis of schistosome infections by detection of circulating antigens can be significantly improved by parallel testing for multiple antigens.The usefulness of urinalysis reagent strips in selecting Schistosoma haematobium egg positives before and after treatment with praziquantel.The effectiveness of urinalysis reagent strips for haematuria and proteinuria in selecting Schistosoma haematobium egg-positive persons was studied on 426 subjects of all ages in a Kenyan community before and 3 months after treatment with praziquantel. Before and after treatment, the degree of urinary blood or protein and prevalence of egg positives were closely associated. Haematuria and proteinuria were positively correlated with urinary egg counts. For selecting egg-positive persons with reagent strips, a combined criterion 'haematuria trace up or proteinuria 1 + up' was considered the best in this area. With this criterion, sensitivity and specificity before treatment were 69.6 and 84.4 respectively. These values remained at the same level (70.7 and 81.2%) even after treatment with praziquantel reduced prevalence from 59.4 to 13.6% (77% reduction) and intensity of infection from 57.2 to 11.3 eggs 10 ml-1 of urine (80% reduction). Although the sensitivity was not very high, heavy infections were not missed. If all those selected with reagent strips were treated and cured, a 98% reduction in total egg excretion by the community would be expected in both our first and second urine examinations.Daily fluctuation of levels of circulating cathodic antigen in urine of children infected with Schistosoma mansoni in Brazil.The fluctuation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) levels in urine was studied in 69 Brazilian school-children infected with Schistosoma mansoni and compared to egg counts. Faeces and urine samples were simultaneously collected at 7 times during a period of 2 weeks. CCA was determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay and could be detected in 96% of the urine samples; the individual mean CCA level ranged from 609 to 350,700 pg/mL. 90% of the faecal samples contained S. mansoni eggs and the individual mean egg output ranged from 9 to 5510 eggs/g. The Spearman rank correlation coefficient between these individual means was 0.69. Kendall's coefficient of concordance (W) was 0.88 for CCA levels and 0.80 for egg counts.Detection of the schistosome circulating cathodic antigen by enzyme immunoassay using biotinylated monoclonal antibodies.We have developed an enzyme immunoassay (ELISA) for the quantification of the schistosome circulating cathodic antigen (CCA), a glycoprotein associated with the syncitium lining the gut of the parasite. A mouse monoclonal antibody of IgG3 isotype was used as coating (antigen-capture) antibody, while a biotinylated mouse monoclonal IgM was used as second (antigen-detecting) antibody. Streptavidin-alkaline phosphatase was used as enzyme label. The lower detection limit of the assay was 1.0 ng of the trichloroacetic acid soluble fraction of adult worm antigen (AWA-TCA) per ml, which corresponds to approximately 0.2 ng CCA per ml. The ELISA showed a linear range from 1.0 to 62.5 ng AWA-TCA per ml. Serum and urine samples of 16 individuals infected with Schistosoma mansoni (egg counts ranging from 5 to 4820 eggs per gram of faeces) were tested in the assay. Antigen titres ranged from less than 4-8192. This assay represents a considerable advantage in diagnosis of Schistosoma infections as it allows the detection and quantification of CCA in serum and urine in even lightly infected individuals.Control of urinary schistosomiasis: an investigation into the effective use of questionnaires to identify high-risk communities and individuals in Niger State, Nigeria.Schistosomiasis is a public health problem in Nigeria. Although there is a national programme for its control, there is the need for reliable and simple means of rapidly diagnosing communities to provide a detailed map on the distribution of the disease in the country, in order to prioritize control activities, as well as to monitor the effectiveness of control operations. A rapid assessment technique using school questionnaires was tested in Borgu Local Government Area (LGA), Niger State, north-western Nigeria. Following a series of focus group discussions, the questionnaires were adapted before they were administered through the school system to 60 primary schools in Borgu LGA. Correctly completed questionnaires were returned from 58 schools (97%) within 4 weeks. Questionnaires were validated by reagent stick tests performed by trained teachers. Their results proved to be reliable compared to those obtained by our research team in 20 randomly selected schools. Overall prevalences of microhaematuria at 1+ and 2+ levels were 45.7% and 27. 1%, respectively. Highly significant correlations were obtained between school prevalence of microhaematuria and reported schistosomiasis, as well as reported blood in urine. The diagnostic performance of the questionnaires at the 2+ level of microhaematuria was very good. The design of our study also allowed data analysis on an individual level, and multivariate analysis revealed highly significant odds ratios for reported schistosomiasis and reported blood in urine to detect an individual with urinary schistosomiasis. Our results are in good agreement with reports from other African countries, and questionnaires can be recommended for rapid identification of communities at highest risk of urinary schistosomiasis in Nigeria, so that scarce resources of the national control programme can be used most effectively.Evaluation of dipsticks in Schistosoma haematobium infections in four villages in the middle valley of the Senegal River Basin, Senegal.Magnetic bead antigen capture enzyme-linked immunoassay in microtitre trays for rapid detection of schistosomal circulating anodic antigen.We have developed a new magnetic bead antigen capture enzyme-linked immunoassay for the detection of schistosomal circulating anodic antigen. The assay utilizes IgG1 monoclonal antibody coated monodisperse magnetic beads in microtitre trays fitted to a special magnet. The total test time was found to be 1-2 h, using 0.05 mg beads per well. The lower detection level was 0.7 ng AWA-TCA per ml (approximately 0.07 ng CAA per ml). Validation by sera from uninfected and Schistosoma mansoni infected Africans and Norwegians resulted in an assay specificity of 100% and sensitivity was close to 90% for cases excreting more than 100 eggs per gram faeces. At such clinically relevant levels the inter-assay CV was below 10% and photometric absorbance correlated to antigen levels was nearly linear. There was a significant correlation between the magnetic bead EIA absorbance values and the titres obtained using the previously established ELISA. The new bead assay, however, was easier and less laborious because TCA pretreatment and the titration of positive results were unnecessary.Accuracy of urine circulating cathodic antigen test for the diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni in preschool-aged children before and after treatment.The Kato-Katz technique is widely used for the diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni, but shows low sensitivity in light-intensity infections. We assessed the accuracy of a commercially available point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen (POC-CCA) cassette test for the diagnosis of S. mansoni in preschool-aged children before and after praziquantel administration.A 3-week longitudinal survey with a treatment intervention was conducted in Azaguié, south Côte d'Ivoire. Overall, 242 preschoolers (age range: 2 months to 5.5 years) submitted two stool and two urine samples before praziquantel administration, and 86 individuals were followed-up posttreatment. Stool samples were examined with duplicate Kato-Katz thick smears for S. mansoni. Urine samples were subjected to POC-CCA cassette test for S. mansoni, and a filtration method for S. haematobium diagnosis.Before treatment, the prevalence of S. mansoni, as determined by quadruplicate Kato-Katz, single CCA considering 'trace' as negative (t-), and single CCA with 'trace' as positive (t+), was 23.1%, 34.3% and 64.5%, respectively. Using the combined results (i.e., four Kato-Katz and duplicate CCA(t-)) as diagnostic 'gold' standard, the sensitivity of a single Kato-Katz, a single CCA(t-) or CCA(t+) was 28.3%, 69.7% and 89.1%, respectively. Three weeks posttreatment, the sensitivity of a single Kato-Katz, single CCA(t-) and CCA(t+) was 4.0%, 80.0% and 84.0%, respectively. The intensity of the POC-CCA test band reaction was correlated with S. mansoni egg burden (odds ratio = 1.2, p = 0.04).A single POC-CCA cassette test appears to be more sensitive than multiple Kato-Katz thick smears for the diagnosis of S. mansoni in preschool-aged children before and after praziquantel administration. The POC-CCA cassette test can be recommended for the rapid identification of S. mansoni infections before treatment. Additional studies are warranted to determine the usefulness of POC-CCA for assessing drug efficacy and monitoring the impact of control interventions.Evaluation of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) strip for diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in Hassoba school children, Afar, Ethiopia.A total of 206 urine samples collected from Hassoba Elementary schoolchildren, Afar, Ethiopia, a low Schistosoma haematobium endemic setting, was diagnosed to evaluate the performance of CCA strip using double references, urine filtration technique and urinalysis dipstick (Combur 1.0 Test) that detect schistosome eggs and blood in urine, respectively. The former was used as a gold standard reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values for the CCA were 52%, 63.8%, 56.7% and 59% respectively, with reference to urine filtration technique whereas these parameters were 50.4%, 62.4%, 55.6% and 57.5% respectively, with reference to Combur 10 Test. 47 S. haematobium egg-positive children were found negative by CCA strip while 38 egg-negative children were found positive by CCA strip. Moreover, among the pre-tests done in duplicate, inconsistent results were also recorded. Assays were also compared with regard to the cost of equipment and reagents, speed and simplicity of use. Though CCA strip was found to be rapid and could be performed with minimal training, it was found to be expensive (US $ 4.95 per test) to use it for large-scale field use even if its diagnostic value would have been satisfactory. Further development and standardization of the CCA strip are required for its applicability for field use. It is also recommended that its cost per strip should be substantially cut down if it is to be used in poor schistosomiasis endemic countries.Performance of three rapid screening methods in the detection of Schistosoma haematobium infection in school-age children in Southeastern Nigeria.A cross-sectional study of primary school children was conducted to evaluate and compare the performance of some rapid screening methods in the detection of Schistosoma haematobium infection in Nigeria Cement Factory (NigerCem) and Nike Lake areas of Southeastern Nigeria.Urine samples of school children were examined for macro-haematuria and tested for micro-haematuria and proteinuria using reagent strips followed by egg microscopy. Self-reported haematuria was assessed using simple questionnaire. The performances of these rapid diagnoses singly and in combination were calculated using egg microscopy as gold standard.The prevalence of the infection was 26·6% in NigerCem and 5·1% in Nike Lake area, classifying these areas as moderate- and low-prevalence areas (MPA and LPA); while in the subsample used for self-reported haematuria, the prevalence was 27·2 and 4·2% in MPA and LPA, respectively. The positive predictive value (PPV) of micro-haematuria was comparable in MPA (55·26%) and LPA (57·89%). Overall PPV of macro-haematuria was 87·50% in MPA and 66·70% in LPA while in the detection of heavy infection; PPV was higher in LPA (75%) than in MPA (66·67%). In LPA and MPA, combination of micro-haematuria and proteinuria, and concomitant presence of macro-haematuria, micro-haematuria, and proteinuria had PPV of 83·33 and 63·16%, and 100 versus 66·67%, respectively. Generally, the rapid screening tests had lower negative predictive values (NPVs) in MPA than in LPA. The use of simple questionnaire increased the PPV of heavy infection in MPA (77·78%). This was further increased to 80% when self-reported haematuria was combined with micro-haematuria.The result suggests that in MPA with chronic infections, combination of self-reported haematuria and micro-haematuria may reduce the chance of missing those who should be treated.Levels of circulating soluble egg antigen in urine of individuals infected with Schistosoma mansoni before and after treatment with praziquantel.We used a recently developed sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay to determine the kinetics of Schistosoma mansoni circulating soluble egg antigen (CSEA) after chemotherapy and compared these with previously determined levels of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). Urine samples were collected from 35 Egyptian patients with S. mansoni infection before, and one, 3 and 6 weeks after treatment. Thirteen patients were treated with 60 mg praziquantel/kg body weight and 22 patients with 40 mg/kg. Following chemotherapy, the kinetics of CSEA in urine appeared to be clearly different from those of the worm-derived antigen CCA, levels of which decreased markedly within one week after chemotherapy; CSEA levels decreased at a much lower rate. Six weeks after successful chemotherapy, CSEA could still be detected in urine of 7 cases while CCA had already disappeared and no viable egg was found by faecal examination. There was no significant difference between the 2 dose regimens during follow-up in the percentage remaining positive or in the CSEA level. These results suggest that the egg antigens detected are primarily derived from viable eggs in the tissues and might be used as a marker for morbidity.A simple approach improving the performance of urine reagent strips for rapid diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in Nigerian schoolchildren.In Nigeria, schistosomiasis, caused predominantly by the species Schistosoma haematobium, is highly endemic in resource-poor communities. We performed a school-based survey in two rural communities in Osun State (Southwestern Nigeria) and assessed macrohaematuria, microhaematuria and proteinuria as indirect indicators for the presence of disease. Urine samples were inspected macroscopically for haematuria and screened for microhaematuria and proteinuria using urine reagent strips. The microscopic examination of schistosome eggs was used as the gold standard for diagnosis. In total, 447 schoolchildren were included in this study and had a 51% prevalence of urinary schistosomiasis. The sensitivity of microhaematuria (68%) and proteinuria (53%) for infection with S. haematobium was relatively low. In patients with a heavy infection (>or= 500 eggs/10 mL), the sensitivity of microhaematuria was high (95%). When the presence of macrohaematuria and the concomitant presence of microhaematuria and proteinuria were combined, it revealed a sensitivity of 63%, a specificity of 93% and a positive predictive value of 91%. Macrohaematuria also showed high specificity (96%) and a positive predictive value of 92%, while sensitivity was < 50%. These data show that combining urine reagent strip tests (presence of proteinuria and microhaematuria) and information on macrohaematuria increased the accuracy of the rapid diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis in an endemic rural West African setting. This simple approach can be used to increase the quality of monitoring of schistosomiasis in schoolchildren.Detection of antibodies against circulating cathodic antigen of Schistosoma mansoni using the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.The applicability of a Schistosoma mansoni polysaccharide antigen, circulating cathodic antigen (CCA), for the detection of antibodies in S. mansoni infection was tested in the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). Antibodies against this secretory antigen were detected in hamster infections after three weeks, while in infected humans anti-CCA antibodies could be demonstrated eight weeks after infection. Antibodies could be demonstrated both in recent and chronic infections in man, but more false-negative results were observed in chronic infections. The antibody response was composed of both IgM and IgG antibodies.Urine reagent strips for diagnosis of schistosomiasis haematobium in women of fertile age.Hematuria, proteinuria and leukocyturia were semiquantitatively assessed by reagent strips in single morning urine of women of fertile age visiting the outpatient department of the Mangochi district hospital, Malawi. This was part of a diagnostic approach to female genital schistosomiasis (FGS). In 51 women ova of Schistosoma haematobium were detected in urine by a filtration technique. In 33 of these women ova were also present in genital tissue as demonstrated by microscopic examination of biopsies. In 209 women no ova were found in the single urine filtered. There were significantly higher scores for hematuria, proteinuria and leukocyturia as well as of the combined reagent strip index (RSI) in egg-excreting than in egg-negative women. The sensitivity of a single hematuria, proteinuria and leukocyturia reading was 98, 84 and 73%, respectively. However, the respective specificity was only 24, 22 and 23%. The best prediction of urinary schistosomiasis was achieved by a +2 score for hematuria, of which the sensitivity was 94% and the specificity was 61%. The high false-positive rates can probably be explained by contamination of urine by vaginal secretion. Moreover, cases of schistosomiasis have probably been overlooked because only a single morning urine sample was examined. The total absence of hematuria, proteinuria and leukocyturia, however, may be used to rule out heavy infections in community surveys. There was no difference in reagent strip scores between women with genital and urinary schistosomiasis as compared with those with urinary tract lesions alone. Thus urine analysis reagent strip readings do not help to discriminate between S. haematobium infected women with and without FGS.Sensitivity and specificity of reagent strips in screening of Kenyan children for Schistosoma haematobium infection.The reliability of using urinalysis reagent strips, which semi-quantitatively measure hematuria and proteinuria, to correctly select urine specimens found by microscopy to have Schistosoma haematobium eggs was studied in 359 previously unscreened Kenyan primary school children. The presence of and degree of hematuria and proteinuria were highly correlated with the presence of S. haematobium eggs and with egg counts in urine specimens. Hematuria was more strongly correlated with S. haematobium egg counts than was proteinuria. The ability of presence of hematuria or proteinuria, or both, to select all microscopically positive cases of urinary schistosomiasis for treatment was tested using sensitivity (ST) and specificity (SP) analysis. Selection of cases using 1) presence of hematuria alone, and 2) presence of either hematuria or proteinuria had the highest combined ST and SP (88% ST, 97% SP; 91% ST, 92% SP, respectively). Most of the few cases detected by microscopy but not by reagent strips had low egg counts. The presence of hematuria alone failed to detect only 12% of S. haematobium-positive cases (mostly low egg counts), and only 3% of S. haematobium-negative persons had urinary blood and would have received unnecessary treatment. Preliminary studies on the use of reagent strips to screen previously infected children 6 months after treatment, and the effects of seasonal variations in temperature and humidity on urine specimen volume, egg counts, and reagent strip results are also presented. The practical field use and cost of reagent strips in S. haematobium control programs are discussed.Proteinuria and haematuria as predictors of schistosomiasis in children.Examination of urine samples from 922 children from Epe and surrounding communities in south-western Nigeria indicated a 13% prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium infection. Children, 10-14 years of age, accounted for 65% of the disease prevalence. Approximately 79% of the study population was negative for proteinuria, while 52.6% of children with 30 mg% proteinuria were positive for S. haematobium infection. However, 96% and 100% of all children who, respectively, had 30 mg% and 100 mg% proteinuria, in addition to haematuria, were found to be positive for the schistosome infection. This finding indicates that the use of haematuria and proteinuria as a combined diagnostic index significantly increased the sensitivity and specificity of the individual tests. Bacteriuria was found in 8.5% of infected children, compared with 5.2% of the control group. Streptococcus faecalis and E. coli were the two bacteria isolated from the urine specimens.The diagnostic potential of three indirect tests for urinary schistosomiasis in Nigeria.Schistosomiasis is one of the major parasitic infections of man in the tropical and subtropical areas of the world. Diagnosis of the disease is usually based on microscopic detection of eggs in excreta which is both laborious and time consuming. In Nigeria, the Government's emphasis on the control of the disease dictates the need for a simple, fast, reliable and affordable diagnostic test for the identification of infected communities and detection of infected persons. Three indirect diagnostic tests for urinary schistosomiasis: interview technique, visual examination for macrohaematuria and the use of a chemical reagent strip were employed in screening 1056 individuals of the Kainji Lake area of Nigeria for urinary schistosomiasis, using haematuria as the disease indicator. The sensitivity of the three tests were determined using the filtration (egg counting) technique as the reference test. The sensitivity of the reagent strip test was 69.0% and 44 and 38% for the interview technique and visual examination respectively. The reagent strip test was particularly useful for screening children (5-19 years old). The implication of these findings are discussed.In Nigeria, where control of schistosomiasis is a public health goal, diagnosis based on microscopic detection of eggs in excreta is both labor-intensive and time-consuming. The present study evaluated the diagnostic potential of 3 indirect tests for urinary schistosomiasis in 1056 children and adults from Nigeria's Kainji Lake area: interview technique, visual examination for macrohematuria, and use of a chemical reagent strip. Sensitivity was determined through use of the filtration (egg counting) technique as the reference diagnosis. Sensitivity was 69% for the reagent strip test, 44% for the interview technique, and 38% for visual examination. The reagent strip was particularly sensitive for screening children 5-19 years of age. All 3 tests showed increases in sensitivity with increases in infection intensity.A five-country evaluation of a point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen urine assay for the prevalence of Schistosoma mansoni.We evaluated a commercial point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen (POC-CCA) test for assessing Schistosoma mansoni infection prevalence in areas at risk. Overall, 4,405 school-age children in Cameroon, Côte d'Ivoire, Ethiopia, Kenya, and Uganda provided urine for POC-CCA testing and stool for Kato-Katz assays. By latent class analysis, one POC-CCA test was more sensitive (86% versus 62%) but less specific (72% versus ~100%) than multiple Kato-Katz smears from one stool. However, only 1% of POC-CCA tests in a non-endemic area were false positives, suggesting the latent class analysis underestimated the POC-CCA specificity. Multivariable modeling estimated POC-CCA as significantly more sensitive than Kato-Katz at low infection intensities (< 100 eggs/gram stool). By linear regression, 72% prevalence among 9-12 year olds by POC-CCA corresponded to 50% prevalence by Kato-Katz, whereas 46% POC-CCA prevalence corresponded to 10% Kato-Katz prevalence. We conclude that one urine POC-CCA test can replace Kato-Katz testing for community-level S. mansoni prevalence mapping.Rapid diagnosis of schistosomiasis in Yemen using a simple questionnaire and urine reagent strips.Schistosomiasis ranks second to malaria in terms of socioeconomic and public health importance in Yemen. This study assessed the validity of a morbidity questionnaire and urine reagent strips as a rapid tool for screening schoolchildren for urinary schistosomiasis as compared with the presence of eggs in urine as the gold-standard parasitological diagnosis. The study examined urine samples and interviewed 696 children (mean age 12.5 years) attending a primary-preparatory school in south Yemen. Urinary schistosomiasis was confirmed in 126 (18.1%) children. Diagnostic performance was poor for 2 items in the morbidity questionnaire (self-reported history of previous infection and self-reported history of antischistosomal treatment). However, self-reported dysuria, self-reported haematuria in the questionnaire and microhaematuria by reagent strips (alone or with macrohaematuria) revealed good diagnostic performance. The results indicated that reagent strips are a valid method for detection of microhaematuria for identifying individuals and communities infected with Schistosoma haematobium. التشخيص السريع لداء البلهارسيات في اليمن باستخدام استبيان بسيط مع أشرطة كواشف للبولحسن بسيوني، علي حسب، نسرين النمر، لطيفة الشيباني، علي الوليدييحتل داء البلهارسيات الموقع الثاني بعد الملاريا من حيث الأهمية من وجهة نظر الصحة العمومية في اليمن. وتقيِّم هذه الدراسة صحة استبيان يتناول المراضة مع استخدام أشرطة وكواشف للبول، باعتبارهما أداتَيْن سريعتَيْن لتحري أطفال المدارس بحثاً عن داء البلهارسيات البولي، ومقارنة ذلك بوجود البيوض في البول باعتباره المعيار الذهبي للتشخيص بفحص الطفيليات. وقد شملت الدراسة فحص عينات بول مع مقابلة 696 طفلاً (وسطي أعمارهم 12.5 عاماً) ممن يداومون في مدرسة ابتدائية في جنوب اليمن. وقد تأكَّد تشخيص داء البلهارسيات البولي لدى 126 طفلاً (18.1%). واتضح أن الأداء التشخيصي كان سيئاً في بندَيْن اثنَيْن من بنود استبيان المراضة (وهما الإبلاغ الذاتي عن سوابق عدوى بولية سابقة، والإبلاغ الذاتي عن سوابق معالجة مضادة للبلهارسيا). وبالمقابل فقد أثبت كل من الإبلاغ الذاتي عن عسر التبول، والإبلاغ الذاتي عن تبول الدم في الاستبيان، وكشف أو كاشف وجود الدم في البول بكميات زهيدة بالفحص المجهري بالأشرطة ذات الكواشف (لوحده أو مع وجود الدم في البول بالعين المجردة) أنها ذات أداء تشخيصي جيد. وتشير النتائج إلى أن الأشرطة ذات الكواشف تعتبر طريقة صحيحة لكشف وجود البول في الدم بكميات زهيدة، من أجل التعرف على الأفراد والمجتمعات المصابة بعدوى البلهارسيا الدموية.Diagnostic rapide de la schistosomiase au Yémen à l’aide d’un questionnaire simple et de bandelettes urinaires réactives.La schistosomiase vient en deuxième place après le paludisme en termes de poids socioéconomique et de problème de santé publique au Yémen. La présente étude a évalué la validité d’un questionnaire sur la morbidité ainsi que des bandelettes urinaires réactives comme outils rapides de dépistage de la schistosomiase urinaire chez des écoliers par rapport à la recherche d’œufs dans les urines en tant que méthode diagnostique parasitologique de référence. Au cours de l’étude, les échantillons d’urine de 696 enfants fréquentant une école primaire ou préparatoire dans le sud du Yémen ont été examinés, puis les enfants ont été interrogés (âge moyen 12,5 ans). Une schistosomiase urinaire a été confirmée chez 126 enfants (18,1 %). La performance du diagnostic était médiocre pour deux items du questionnaire sur la morbidité (antécédents autodéclarés d’une infection antérieure et d’un traitement contre la schistosomiase). Toutefois, une dysurie autodéclarée, une hématurie autodéclarée dans le questionnaire et une microhématurie par bandelettes urinaires réactives (seule ou associée à une macrohématurie) ont fait ressortir une bonne performance diagnostique. Les résultats ont indiqué que les bandelettes urinaires réactives étaient une méthode valable pour le dépistage de la microhématurie permettant d’identifier les personnes et les communautés infestées par Schistosoma haematobium.Frequency of haematuria and proteinuria among Schistosoma haematobium infected children of two communities from Liberia and Tanzania.The frequencies of haematuria and proteinuria among children of two rural communities with different Schistosoma haematobium endemicity from Liberia and Tanzania were compared. Although the prevalence and intensity of S. haematobium infections were lower in the Tanzanian community, the frequencies of haematuria and proteinuria were significantly higher when compared to the Liberian community. The semi-quantitative dip stick tests for haematuria and proteinuria showed a comparable, good specificity (haematuria 85%, proteinuria 80%), but a community-specific sensitivity. The dip stick test for haematuria detected 85% (proteinuria 82%) of all S. haematobium infected subjects in Tanzania compared to 68% (proteinuria 57%) in Liberia. The significance of these observations in relation to S. haematobium related morbidity is discussed.A study of some factors influencing the epidemiology of urinary schistosomiasis at Ifakara (Kilombero District, Morogoro Region, Tanzania).Some factors influencing the epidemiology of urinary schistosomiasis were studied at Ifakara between 1978 and 1980. Ifakara is situated in the fertile plain of the Kilombero river in the south-eastern part of Tanzania. The overall prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium infection among primary school children (6-19 years) in the Ifakara agglomeration was 21% (730/3478). The highest prevalence was observed in both sexes in the age group 15-19 years. Distinct variations in prevalence were found between the individual schools examined, ranging from 5 to 71% and indicating a focal transmission of the disease. The intensity of S. haematobium infection in the individual schools was relatively low, ranging from 5 to 36 eggs/10 ml urine. However, the frequency of microhaematuria among infected subjects was high, reaching 100% from an egg output of 50 eggs/10 ml onwards. Forty-nine waterbodies--most of them man-made--with Bulinus (Ph.) globosus and/or B. (Ph.) nasutus were found, 12 of them harboured B. (Ph.) globosus shedding cercariae of the mammalian type. These waterbodies were mainly localized in the northern and north-eastern areas of Ifakara where the primary schools with the highest prevalence of S. haematobium were found. Most of these waterbodies were known to be bathing places for the children. Susceptibility experiments with B. (Ph.) globosus and B. (Ph.) nasutus indicated that B. (Ph.) globosus is possibly the only intermediate host for S. haematobium in the areas examined. No Biomphalaria, the intermediate hosts for S. mansoni, were found. In addition, the knowledge and awareness of the local population about urinary schistosomiasis were assessed by a questionnaire survey.Proteinuria, hematuria, and leukocyturia in children with mixed urinary and intestinal schistosomiasis.Quantitative parasitological assessment and quantitative analysis of proteinuria, hematuria, and leukocyturia were carried out in 182 Sudanese schoolboys with mixed urinary and intestinal schistosomiasis. Pathological proteinuria was found in 73% of patients (median = 380, 95% confidence limits = 200 to 500 mg/liter). The median protein/creatinine ratio was 0.54. SDS polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis showed an excretion of albumin, transferrin, and IgG consistent with a postrenal pattern of proteinuria. Pathological erythrocyturia occurred in 84% of patients (median = 255, 95% CL = 95 to 629 cells/microliter) and leukocyturia in 77% of patients (median = 148, 95% CL = 93 to 246 cells/microliter). Phase contrast microscopy revealed intact erythrocytes, suggestive of postrenal hemorrhage. Proteinuria, erythrocyturia, and leukocyturia correlated significantly with the ova excretion in the urine, but not with egg excretion in the stool. Oxamniquine reduced ova excretion in the stool but did not influence pathological urine findings. In patients treated effectively with Praziquantel or Metrifonate, pathological PU, EU, and LU decreased markedly 1 month post treatment. PU in severely proteinuric patients reached physiological values 5 months post therapy. We suggest that the proteinuria, erythrocyturia, and leukocyturia in mixed schistosomiasis were of postrenal origin.Blood in the urine of adolescent girls in an area of Ghana with a low prevalence of infection with Schistosoma haematobium.Relationship between circulating antigen level and morbidity in Schistosoma mansoni-infected children evaluated by ultrasonography.Ninety-eight Schistosoma mansoni-infected children from an endemic area in Sharkia Governorate, Egypt were evaluated by abdominal ultrasonography to determine liver and spleen sizes, grade of periportal fibrosis, and splenic vein diameter. Circulating antigen levels were measured using a double sandwich ELISA in which the sensitivity was 91.8% and specificity was > 99%, with no evidence of cross-reactivity with other parasites. No significant relationship was observed between antigen level and clinical stages of the disease as assessed by physical examination (P > 0.05). When ultrasound was used to stage disease, the mean antigen level was significantly higher among hepatosplenic cases than intestinal cases (P < 0.05). No difference in mean antigen levels were found between the splenic and hepatic cases. Furthermore, a direct correlation (P < 0.01) was observed between antigen level and disease severity as monitored by ultrasonography. Antigen level showed a positive correlation with the degree of periportal fibrosis (P < 0.05). Moreover, a significant increase in the percent of children who were antigen positive (> 80 ng/ml) was found in those with more severe periportal fibrosis (P < 0.001). The findings suggest that ultrasonography along with measurement of circulating antigen levels predict morbidity in schistosomiasis mansoni.Detection of urinary schistosomiasis in a low prevalence region.A simple technique to pretreat urine and serum samples for quantitation of schistosome circulating anodic and cathodic antigen.For the detection of the circulating schistosome antigens CAA (circulating anodic antigen) and CCA (circulating cathodic antigen) in serum and urine samples of Schistosoma infected individuals, pretreatment of samples with trichloroacetic acid (TCA) is a standard procedure. In the present study several methods were evaluated in order to develop a more simple and rapid technique than the--especially for pretreatment of urine samples--laborious TCA technique. Optimal results were obtained with a method in which serum or urine samples were pretreated by a heat-incubation step (70 degrees C, 30 min) in an alkaline buffer (pH 9.6). In a comparison of the new technique with the TCA pretreatment, serum and urine samples of S. mansoni infected individuals from Zaire (n = 80) and of uninfected controls from The Netherlands (n = 208) were pretreated and assayed for CAA and CCA. Both pretreatment techniques showed similar sensitivities and specificities for CAA and CCA in serum, and CCA in urine. However, for the determination of CAA in urine the new technique performed significantly better, resulting in an increase of the sensitivity from 32 to 70% (titre determination).Schistosomiasis prevalence after administration of praziquantel to school children in Melela village, Morogoro region, Tanzania.A study of the prevalence of schistosomiasis was carried out in 253 school children in Melela, Tanzania, one year after a single dose of praziquantel, 40 mg/kg body weight. The cure rate was 90.4%. However the new incidence estimate was 21.2% in children who were initially negative. The use of reagent strips in urine tests for the detection of urinary schistosomiasis was also evaluated. The presence of blood in the urine was highly sensitive (> 96%) and specific (87%). The sensitivity of proteinuria was less, but it was highly specific (94%). This study shows that chemotherapy will have to be combined with other measures to achieve lasting benefits and raises the question as to how often the population should be treated. It also confirms the value of urine test strips as an indirect diagnostic test for urinary schistosomiasis in an endemic area. Further follow-up is necessary to make useful predictions concerning incidence and reinfection rates in the community. This will also help in deciding how often chemotherapy should be given to the population.Diagnostic accuracy of different urine dipsticks to detect urinary schistosomiasis: a comparative study in five endemic communities in Osun and Ogun States, Nigeria.The diagnostic accuracy of urine dipsticks was investigated using two different brands in five endemic communities of south-western Nigeria. The BM-5L test was used in 1992 to screen 566 subjects in two communities in Ogun State, while 1457 subjects in three other communities in Osun State were screened with the Combur-9 test in 2006. Haematuria gave a higher prevalence of infection than proteinuria irrespective of which strip brand was used (e.g. BM-5L test: 58.3 and 36.2%; Combur-9 test: 46.5 and 41.9%, respectively). Compared with egg microscopy (gold standard), haematuria identified over 90% of egg-positive samples using either the BM-5L test in 1992 or the Combur-9 test in 2006. The corresponding values for proteinuria were 58% using the BM-5L test and 82% using the Combur-9 test. Sensitivity of haematuria to infection was higher using the BM-5L test (92.4-93.5%) than Combur-9 (58.6-73.3%), while sensitivity of proteinuria to infection was higher using Combur-9 (55.5-80.4%) than BM-5L test (26.0-58.3%). However, both strip brands have comparable specificity for haematuria (BM-5L test, 88.3-99.5%; Combur-9, 88.9-100%) and proteinuria (BM-5L test, 94.4-100%; Combur-9, 98.7-100%) to infection. Based on these results we conclude that neither brand nor manufacturer has a significance effect on the performance of chemical reagent strips. However, the diagnostic value of both haematuria and proteinuria varied according to the positivity level adopted, intensity of infection and age, but was not affected by sex and village of residence.Schistosomiasis haematobia in coast province Kenya. Relationship between egg output and morbidity.Several studies of schistosomiasis haematobia in Africa have revealed a correlation between intensity of infection as measured by urine egg counts and severity of disease as determined by intravenous pyelography. The present study consisted of a survey of 390 school children in the coastal area of Kenya involving a single egg count, and intravenous pyelograms in a stratified random sample of 69 children; the results showed a greater prevalence of urinary tract disease in those with higher intensities of infection. This survey was then followed by a more detailed study in which nine consecutive daily egg counts were done on 121 children; 17 of these children, subdivided into three groups with different intensities in infection, were given intravenous pyelograms. The results were similar in the 11 children with minimal and moderate counts (averaging, respectively, less than 1 egg and 167 eggs/10 ml urine daily), with approximately 30% having bladder or renal abnormalities. In comparison, all of the six children with heavy counts (averaging 1,288 eggs/10 ml urine daily) had bladder lesions and five of them had renal lesions.Urinary schistosomiasis in Zimbabwean school children: predictors of morbidity.The morbid effects of urinary bilharziasis are becoming more evident with the advent of sophisticated diagnostics such as ultrasound. However, such diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium morbidity is often hampered by lack of funds, proper equipment, or training.We performed a cross-sectional investigation of schoolchildren in a highly endemic area of east central Zimbabwe in order to assess the utility of a number of simple clinical indicators to predict Schistosoma haematobium morbidity.Prevalence and intensity of S. haematobium infection was determined in 551 schoolchildren, with ultrasound examination of the kidneys and bladder performed on 222. The association of a number of demographic, parasitological, and clinical parameters with clinical outcome was evaluated.Overall, 60% of the children were infected with S. haematobium . Although lacking specificity, proteinuria and parasite eggs count best predicted bladder pathology. Presence of kidney dilation was associated with fatigue and pain upon urination, but these variables were not very sensitive.None of the variables assessed were ideal predictors of morbidity. However, the results suggest that a combination of inexpensive, simple indicators may allow for improved targeting of S. haematobium treatment to those with severe morbidity and better monitoring of the progress of control campaigns when more expensive diagnostic methods are not available.Evaluation of reagent strips in urine tests for detection of Schistosoma haematobium infection: a comparative study in Ghana and Zambia.The presence of haematuria and proteinuria, detected by reagent strips, was compared with Schistosoma haematobium egg counts in the urines of human subjects from two epidemiologically distinct areas in Ghana and Zambia. In children and adults in both areas, the individual or combined semiquantitative levels of proteinuria and haematuria were related directly to increasing urinary egg counts. In both areas the presence of blood in the urine was highly specific (greater than 85%) and sensitive, being positive in 97% of urine specimens with more than 64 eggs per 5-ml sample of urine. The sensitivity of the protein indicator was also high, but its specificity was less than the blood indicator. The specificity of combined proteinuria and haematuria was higher than either alone; on the other hand, the sensitivity was lower than either alone. At each level of proteinuria and haematuria, the geometric mean urinary egg count was higher in Ghana than in Zambia. This study confirms the necessity to evaluate indirect diagnostic techniques in each endemic country, in order to establish criteria for their interpretation, before wide-scale use.Schistosoma haematobium infection in Egyptian schoolchildren: demonstration of both hepatic and urinary tract morbidity by ultrasonography.Parasitological, clinical and ultrasonographical studies were performed upon 422 schoolchildren aged 12-16 years living in a village in the Fayoum where Schistosoma haematobium, but not S. mansoni, was transmitted. Over half of the children gave a history of receiving praziquantel therapy during the preceding 2 years. Symptoms (e.g., haematuria, burning micturition), signs (e.g., hepatomegaly, splenomegaly) and urinary findings (e.g., haematuria, proteinuria) correlated better with the presence and intensity of S. haematobium infection after correcting for this variable. Renal obstructive lesions detected by ultrasound were 2 and 3 times as common in those with moderate and heavy infections as in those with no or light infections, and urinary bladder wall lesions were far more frequent in those with moderate and heavy infections. A mild grade of periportal fibrosis, hepatomegaly and splenomegaly were present in some children in all groups. However, the prevalence of splenomegaly correlated directly with the intensity of infection; liver lesions occurred much more frequently in children with infection or a history of treated infection than in non-infected children denying recent treatment; and no child had hepatomegaly or splenomegaly in the absence of periportal fibrosis.Urinary schistosomiasis: testing with urine filtration and reagent sticks for haematuria provides a comparable prevalence estimate.The relationship between school prevalence rates of urinary schistosomiasis, measured by urine filtration and by reagent sticks detecting haematuria, was investigated in nine primary schools in Tanzania. The aim of the study was to provide a methodological tool to compare results from studies that used these two different diagnostic techniques. A strong correlation was found between both measures (r = 0.96, P < 0.0001), and the equation of this linear relationship could be used to extrapolate the parasitological prevalence rate on the basis of the reagent stick testing, or the reverse. A review of the available literature indicated that the relationship holds true for certain settings, mainly in East Africa, but not for others, and it is therefore likely to be setting-specific. The same data demonstrated also a good relationship, at school level, between the mean school parasitological intensity and the sensitivity of the reagent sticks. A comparative testing of two different reagent stick brands (Hemastix and Combur 9) on 320 samples showed that the latter detected about 1.2-times more haematuria positives, and that this had also to be taken into account when aiming for a comparison of different techniques.Relation between intensity of Schistosoma haematobium infection and clinical haematuria and proteinuria.In an endemic area on Lake Volta, Ghana, urinary blood and protein levels as determined by chemical reagent strips in persons infected with Schistosoma haematobium, particularly in children aged between 5 and 14, correlated positively with urinary egg counts. Geometric mean S haematobium egg counts were 10 or more times higher in urine specimens with at least 10 mg/dl of protein and detectable haematuria than in those without detectable blood or protein. Chemical reagent strips were both specific and sensitive for detection of urinary blood associated with S haematobium infection. This simple technique could be useful for screening entire populations in which urinary schistosomiasis is endemic so that heavily infected persons needing specific treatment can be identified.Circulating antigens for assessing cure in schistosomiasis mansoni.An antigen capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay using antibodies made in rabbits and sheep to adult Schistosoma mansoni extract antigens has been developed and evaluated as a diagnostic test for schistosomiasis. 25 of 42 patients with S. mansoni infections had detectable circulating antigen while sera from all of 45 normal subjects and patients with other parasitic infections did not react. When the 25 with antigenaemia were retested 3 months after treatment, all 21 who were cured were negative while the 4 with persisting S. mansoni eggs in their stools remained positive. Antibodies to a fractionated egg antigen (CEF6) also diminished in most patients following successful treatment, but the reduction was insufficient to predict successful therapy.The epidemiology of schistosomiasis in Egypt: Minya Governorate.Risk factors, prevalence, and intensity of infection with Schistosoma sp. and prevalence and magnitude of morbidity caused by schistosomiasis was assessed in a stratified random sample of 16,433 subjects from 2,409 households in 33 rural communities in Minya Governorate, Egypt. The prevalence of S. haematobium ranged from 1.9% to 32.7% among the communities and averaged 8.9%. The average intensity of infection was a geometric mean egg count (GMEC) of 8.5 per 10 ml of urine and ranged from 1.6 to 30.9. Prevalence was maximum (18-20%) in those 10-20 years of age and higher in males than in females. Intensity of infection followed the same pattern. Infection with S. mansoni was present almost exclusively in a single village, confirming spread of this species up the Nile River and its focality in Minya. Risk factors for S. haematobium infection were an age from 11 to 20; male gender; males bathing in, women washing clothing or utensils in, and children swimming or playing in canals; and a history of, or treatment for, schistosomiasis. Recent history of burning micturition was associated with infection in children but not in adults, while a history of blood in urine correlated with S. haematobium infection in both age groups. Reagent strip-detected hematuria and proteinuria were highly associated, particularly in children, with S. haematobium infection. The presence of hepatomegaly or splenomegaly on physical examination was not associated with S. haematobium ova in the urine. Hepatomegaly, as measured by ultrasonography in the midclavicular line or the midsternal line, or ultrasonography-detected splenomegaly were not present more frequently in infected subjects than in uninfected subjects. Schistosoma ova were not detected more frequently in urine of subjects with ultrasonography-detected periportal fibrosis than in the urine from subjects without this finding. Ultrasonography-detected urinary bladder wall lesions were detected in only 6 (0.3%) subjects and obstructive uropathy was observed in 54 (2.7%) subjects. The absence of an association between prevalence of urinary tract morbidity and S. haematobium infections was surprising. Two possible explanations are 1) that repeated chemotherapy has reduced the prevalence of urinary tract morbidity and 2) that morbidity was not being detected by the ultrasonographic operators.The epidemiology of schistosomiasis in Egypt: Assiut governorate.In the Assiut, Egypt Epidemiology 1, 2, 3 investigation, a sample of 14,204 persons in 10 villages, 31 ezbas (satellite communities), and 2,286 households was drawn from a rural population of 1,598,607. Parasitologic examination of urine and stool were made for Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni, and physical and ultrasound examinations were made on a 20% subsample. The overall estimated prevalence of S. haematobium was 5.2 +/- 0.5 (+/- SE). This varied considerably by village and ezba, ranging from 1.5% to 20.9%, with ezbas having a slightly higher overall prevalence than villages. The overall estimated geometric mean egg count was 6.6 +/- 0.5 eggs per 10 ml of urine and was consistently low throughout the communities. Infection with S. haematobium was associated with age (peak prevalence of 10.6 +/- 1.5% in 15-19-year-old age group) males, children playing in the canals, a history of blood in the urine, and reagent strip positivity for hematuria and proteinuria. The prevalence of either hepatomegaly or splenomegaly detected by physical examination was low (4.0% and 1.5%, respectively). The prevalence of hepatomegaly determined by ultrasonography was substantially higher, 24.1%. The prevalence of periportal fibrosis (PPF) was 12.0%, but grade II or III PPF was present in less than 1%. Ultrasonography-determined hepatomegaly, in both the midclavicular line and the midsternal line, increased by age to more than 30%. Periportal fibrosis was more common in the age groups in which infection rates were the highest. At the village and ezba level of analysis, the prevalence of hepatomegaly, splenomegaly, and PPF tended to be higher in communities having the highest prevalence of infection with S. haematobium.The epidemiology of schistosomiasis in Egypt: Fayoum Governorate.Health questionnaires and parasitologic examinations of urine and stool were performed upon a stratified random sample of 7,710 individuals from 1,109 households in 21 rural communities in Fayoum Governorate, Egypt in 1992 to investigate the prevalence of, risk factors for, and changing pattern of, infection with Schistosoma sp. in the governorate. A subset, every fifth household, or 1,038 subjects, had physical and ultrasound examinations to investigate prevalence of, and risk factors for, morbidity. The prevalence of S. haematobium ranged from 0% to 27.1% and averaged 13.7%. The geometric mean egg count (GMEC) was 10.0 eggs/10 ml of urine. Age-stratified prevalence and intensity of infection were 18-25% and 10-15 eggs/10 ml of urine in those 5-25 years of age. Schistosoma mansoni were detected in inhabitants of 13 communities, but 78.5% of the infections were focally present in a group of 4 satellite hamlets around a single village. The overall prevalence of S. mansoni in the governorate was 4.3% and the GMEC was 44.0 ova/g of stool. Risk factors for infection with either species were male gender, an age <20 years, living in smaller communities, and exposures to canal water by males. Histories of burning micturation, blood in the urine, or prior schistosomiasis and reagent strip-detected hematuria and proteinuria were risks for S. haematobium, but not for S. mansoni. Both urinary tract and higher grades of hepatic morbidity were rare. Obstructive uropathy was present in 6.3% of the subjects and was more common in males and older people. Ultrasonography-detected bladder lesions were present in 5.2% and correlated with S. haematobium only in younger subjects and in those with hematuria and proteinuria. The prevalences of hepatomegaly, splenomegaly, and periportal fibrosis (PPF) were associated with each other and increased with age and in males. Ultrasonography-detected hepatomegaly and splenomegaly were weakly associated with S. mansoni infections only in children. The prevalence of PPF was greater in the 4 communities with >25% S. mansoni infection rates in comparison with the 17 other villages and ezbas. Transmission of S. mansoni is focally well established in Fayoum, which also has the highest prevalence of S. haematobium in the governorates surveyed by the Epidemiology 1, 2, 3 Project. However, both urinary tract and hepatic morbidity are relatively rare in the governorate. This probably results from the long-standing schistosomiasis control program in Fayoum, which suppressed intensity more than prevalence of infection, leading to less community morbidity.The epidemiology of schistosomiasis in Egypt: Qena governorate.Qena is the southernmost governorate of Egypt included in the Epidemiology 1, 2, 3 national study. A probability sample selected 17,822 individuals from 2,950 households in 34 ezbas and 10 villages from a total rural target population of 1,731,252 (based on the most recent 1986 census of the population by the Egyptian Central Agency for Public Mobilization And Statistics). Parasitologic examination of urine and stool were made for Schistosoma haematobium and S. mansoni, respectively, and physical and ultrasound examinations were made on a 20% subsample. The overall estimated prevalence of S. haematobium was 4.8 +/- 0.7% (+/-SE) and geometric mean egg count (GMEC) was 7.0 ova per 10 ml of urine. Considerable variation in prevalence was observed between the villages and ezbas, ranging from 0.0% to 20%, with the smaller ezbas having a slightly higher overall prevalence. The age- and sex-specific patterns of S. haematobium showed typical peak prevalence in early adolescence, with males having a higher prevalence than females. A history of hematuria was associated with current infection (odds ratio = 3.6, 95% confidence interval = 2.32-5.63). Hepatomegaly and splenomegaly determined by physical examination present in 7.9% and 3.0%, respectively. Ultrasonography-determined hepatomegaly of the left liver lobe was found in 10.1%. Ultrasonography-detected hepatomegaly in both the left and right lobes increased in prevalence from approximately 5% in children to 15-20% in adults. The prevalence of ultrasonography-detected splenomegaly increased slightly with age. Grade III periportal fibrosis was detected in only 2 individuals in the sample. Bladder wall lesions and obstructive uropathy were also very infrequent. Other associations with these measures are given. Most villages and ezbas had an S. mansoni prevalence of less than 1%. The exception was Nag'a El-Sheikh Hamad, where the prevalence was 10.3 +/- 0.5% (GMEC = 57.4 +/- 2.6). Two other communities also had a prevalence >1% (Ezbet Sarhan and Kom Heitin).Hematuria and proteinuria as predictors of Schistosoma haematobium infection.An investigation of a population-based stratified random sample of 11,970 inhabitants of Minya Governorate in Egypt included examining urine specimens for Schistosoma haematobium ova using the filtration technique and for hematuria and proteinuria using reagent strips. Age- and gender-specific sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, and likelihood ratios of reagent strip-detected hematuria and proteinuria as indicators of S. haematobium infection were assessed. Results showed that in this population with a 9.0% infection rate, sensitivity (from 45.9 to 70.9) and specificity (from 65.9 to 86.3) were much lower than in previous reports. The most clinically valuable parameters, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and likelihood ratio (LR), were highest with the presence of hematuria > or = +++ and proteinuria > or = ++, especially in males less than 20 years of age. Using the LR allowed effective altering of the pretest probability of infection among age and gender subgroups. The study concluded that reagent strip-detected hematuria and proteinuria, although valuable, are less reliable predictors of S. haematobium within communities than previously reported and their usefulness is improved with stratification by age and gender. In addition, predictive values and likelihood ratios provide practical information for predicting the presence or absence of infection within population subgroups.The public health significance of urinary schistosomiasis as a cause of morbidity in two districts in Mali.Schistosoma haematobium-related morbidity was studied in the perennial irrigation area of Office du Niger and the small reservoirs area of Plateau Dogon in Mali. Questionnaire, clinical, parasitologic, and ultrasound examination data were collected from 1,041 individuals at the baseline survey in 1991; 705 were re-examined one year after treatment. At baseline, the overall prevalence of S. haematobium infection was 55.2%; half of those infected had no clinical symptoms and 30% had pathologic lesions. Both infection and morbidity were more frequent in children than in adults, with a peak prevalence at 7-14 years of age. The rates of lesions were more than twice as high in those heavily infected as in lightly infected individuals. Reagent strip testing for microhematuria was more sensitive in detecting individuals with pathologic lesions than in detecting individuals with infection. One year after treatment with praziquantel, more than 80% of the urinary tract lesions had cleared. It is concluded that S. haematobium-related morbidity is frequent in Mali, but passive case detection for treatment would not cover a great deal of early stages of the disease; active intervention using reagent strip testing for microhematuria at the most peripheral levels would be an efficient system for morbidity control and monitoring of control operations.Relating serum circulating anodic antigens to faecal egg counts in Schistosoma mansoni infections: a modelling approach.Circulating anodic antigen (CAA) levels in serum and faecal egg counts are both quantitative measures of Schistosoma mansoni worm burdens. In this study, we have tested whether circulating anodic antigens can be included into an established egg count model. A data set with 3 repeated faecal egg count and serum CAA measurements of 50 individuals from a community in Burundi with moderate endemicity was used. By means of Monte Carlo simulation, both antigens and egg counts were related to an underlying worm pair distribution, taking into account the variation in repeated measurements (within individuals) and the variation in worm burdens (between individuals). Models with various assumptions (e.g. presence or absence of density-dependent egg production) were tested. Whereas observed and predicted egg counts agreed fairly well, the circulating antigen data could not be described satisfactorily. In particular, the predicted number of negative antigen concentrations was much lower than observed, while the number of light positives was overestimated. There seems to be a mechanism that causes a shift of expected (low) positive CAA concentrations towards zeros, which the proposed models do not provide for. Possible biological as well as assay-related mechanisms that may account for this shift are discussed. The assumption that serum CAA concentrations are a simple direct reflection of worm (pair) burdens could not be corroborated by this modelling exercise. Apparently, the relationship between (measured) CAA concentrations, egg counts and worm burdens in human S. mansoni infections is more complex than assumed.[Value of macroscopic urine examination and reagent strips for the detection of hematuria and proteinuria in the mass diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis, before and after treatment].In this study, dip-stick examination for the detection of hematuria and proteinuria, and macroscopic examination of the urine as diagnostic methods for mass screening for urinary schistosomiasis, were compared with the technique of urinary filtration for Schistosoma haematobium eggs. Dip-sticks and macroscopic examination were proved to be simple and rapid. Before treatment, the revealing of hematuria by dip-stick was shown to be a sensitive method by comparison with filtration, but it is not specific. The tests for proteinuria, and macroscopic examination are more specific, but less sensitive. Nevertheless, all these methods give similar prevalences as distributed by age groups. Dip-sticks and macroscopic exams could therefore be duly considered for the detection of new high endemic regions. After treatment, these methods result in less valid prevalences than those obtained by filtration, but their specificity increases; they become good indicators of clinical improvement.Diagnostic performance of Schistosoma real-time PCR in urine samples from Kenyan children infected with Schistosoma haematobium: day-to-day variation and follow-up after praziquantel treatment.In an effort to enhance accuracy of diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium, this study explores day-to-day variability and diagnostic performance of real-time PCR for detection and quantification of Schistosoma DNA compared to other diagnostic tools in an endemic area before and after treatment.Previously collected urine samples (N = 390) from 114 preselected proven parasitological and/or clinical S. haematobium positive Kenyan schoolchildren were analyzed by a Schistosoma internal transcribed spacer-based real-time PCR after 14 years of storage. Pre-treatment day-to-day fluctuations of PCR and microscopy over three consecutive days were measured for 24 children using intra-class correlation coefficient. A combined 'gold standard' (PCR and/or microscopy positive) was used to measure sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV) of several diagnostic tools at baseline, two and 18 months post-treatment with praziquantel.All 24 repeatedly tested children were PCR-positive over three days with little daily variation in median Ct-values, while 83.3% were found to be egg-positive for S. haematobium at day 1 and 75.0% at day 2 and 3 pre-treatment, signifying daily fluctuations in microscopy diagnosis. Of all 114 preselected schoolchildren, repeated microscopic measurements were required to detect 96.5% versus 100% of positive pre-treatment cases by single PCR. At two months post-treatment, microscopy and PCR detected 22.8% versus 69.3% positive children, respectively. Based on the 'gold standard', PCR showed high sensitivity (>92%) as compared to >31% sensitivity for microscopy, both pre- and post-treatment.Detection and quantification of Schistosoma DNA in urine by real-time PCR was shown to be a powerful and specific diagnostic tool for detection of S. haematobium infections, with less day-to-day variation and higher sensitivity compared to microscopy. The superior performance of PCR before, and two and 18 months post-treatment provides a compelling argument for PCR as an accurate and reproducible tool for monitoring treatment efficacy.[Screening for urinary schistosoma by strips reactive to hematuria. Evaluation in zones of intermediate and weak endemicity in the Ivory Coast].Sticks Hemastix, reactive to haematuria have been tested into a focus ivory coast located in a humid savanna area. Into this focus the prevalence rate of urinary schistosomiasis (Schistosoma haematobium) was 27% taken as a whole and 40% for 5 to 19 years old persons. This study has shown that reactive sticks have a good sensitivity and an acceptable specificity compared with filtration. More, a good correlation between intensity of eggs count and the haematuria is observed.Urinalysis reagent strips in the screening of children for urinary schistosomiasis in the RSA.The use of urinalysis reagent strips (Labstix; Ames) in screening for Schistosoma haematobium infection in various schistosomiasis-endemic areas of the RSA was assessed in 941 children. Sensitivity, specificity, false-positive and false-negative rates and the positive predictive value for haematuria and proteinuria were calculated. Both haematuria and proteinuria were positively correlated with the presence of S. haematobium eggs in the urine. Intensity of infection correlated positively with the degree of haematuria and proteinuria (P less than 0.001). The presence and intensity of S. haematobium infection were more closely related to the presence and degree of haematuria than to proteinuria. Screening for haematuria alone enabled 83.1% of S. haematobium-positive and 89.7% of negative subjects to be detected accurately. The false-positive rate was 2.7%. It was found that a single parameter, haematuria, could be used to identify infected children in endemic areas. It was also found to be possible to use the reagent strips to select out S. haematobium-infected children with egg counts greater than 200 ova/10 ml urine. The simple model developed allows rapid identification of moderately to heavily infected children and can be used by paramedical staff in field situations.Circulating anodic antigen for detection of Schistosoma mansoni infection in Egyptian patients.We evaluated the ability of circulating anodic antigen (CAA) to identify infection with Schistosoma mansoni in a prospective cohort study of 257 Egyptian men, 147 with infection diagnosed by repeated Kato thick smears, and 110 without detectable infection. The CAA levels were obtained and the stool examinations were performed two weeks and one, two, four, and six months after praziquantel therapy for infected men. A CAA enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was repeated twice on subjects who were otherwise negative for schistosomiasis. Circulating anodic antigen was detected in 117 cases, with an overall test sensitivity before treatment of 0.8. Sensitivity was related to the intensity of infection, ranging from 1.00 with > 400 eggs per gram (epg) of feces to 0.60 for those with < 100 epg. After praziquantel therapy, the level of the antigen was significantly reduced. Specificity was excellent before treatment (1.00, 95% confidence interval = 0.97-1.0), but it decreased to 0.98 four months after treatment. Likelihood ratios were significant for all titers > or = 4. We conclude that CAA has moderate sensitivity and excellent specificity when used to identify infection with schistosomiasis, as well as to monitor the results of therapy after at least one month after treatment.Chemotherapy-based control of schistosomiasis haematobia. I. Metrifonate versus praziquantel in control of intensity and prevalence of infection.To determine the effect of targeted field administration of oral chemotherapeutic agents on the prevalence, intensity, and morbidity of Schistosoma haematobium infections, we initiated a long-term school-based program in the Msambweni area of Kwale District, Coast Province, Kenya. Prior to treatment, 69% of the children examined (ages 4-21, n = 2,628) were infected; 34% had moderate or heavy infections (greater than 100 eggs/10 ml urine). Infected individuals were randomized to receive, during one year, either metrifonate (10 mg/kg x 3 doses) or praziquantel, (40 mg/kg x 1 dose). At the end of the first year, prevalence of infection fell to 19%; only 2% of the pupils remained in the moderately and heavily infected groups. Corresponding decreases in the prevalence of hematuria (54% in 1984 vs. 16% in 1985) and proteinuria (56% in 1984 vs. 26% in 1985) were noted. These were associated with significant declines in bladder thickening and irregularities noted during ultrasound examinations, but not with decreases in hydronephrosis. There was no significant difference in the post-treatment prevalence or intensity of infection after treatment with metrifonate as compared with praziquantel. These results demonstrate that field-applied chemotherapy with either agent offers a practical strategy for the control of S. haematobium infection and its associated morbidity.Prevalence and epidemiology of Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium infection in two areas of Egypt recently reclaimed from the desert.Projects are being carried out in many regions of Egypt to reclaim land from the desert for agriculture. This paper presents findings from a baseline epidemiologic study conducted in 1992 in two newly reclaimed areas near Ismailia, Egypt. In the first area, just east of the Suez Canal, 40.0% of the residents tested positive for Schistosoma mansoni and 1.7% tested positive for S. haematobium, while in the second area, 15 km southwest of Ismailia, 49.3% tested positive for S. mansoni and 3.3% tested positive for S. haematobium. The intensities of S. mansoni infection were moderately high, with a geometric mean egg count of 76 eggs/gram of feces among positive individuals in the first area, and 100 eggs/gram of feces in the second area. When compared with a previous study conducted in 1985, the prevalence of S. mansoni infection in the first area has increased from 21.7% to 42.1% among settlers in the last seven years, while that of S. haematobium has decreased from 7.8% to 1.7%. These trends may result from changes in irrigation practices or other alterations in the local environment. There is a risk of schistosomiasis becoming a major public health problem in reclaimed areas if adequate control measures are not taken.The urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) dipstick: a valid substitute for microscopy for mapping and point-of-care diagnosis of intestinal schistosomiasis.The World Health Organization now recommends the provision of praziquantel treatment to preschool-aged children infected with schistosomiasis. For intestinal schistosomiasis the current operational field diagnostic standard is examination of a thick Kato-Katz smear by microscopy prepared from a single stool specimen, and although pragmatic, this methodology has well-known shortcomings. Here, as a potential alternative, the performance of the urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) dipstick test was assessed in terms of disease-mapping and point-of-care diagnosis for intestinal schistosomiasis in preschool-aged children. Our manuscript reports on findings at baseline and at the end of a one-year longitudinal treatment study.A total of 925 children (mean age 2.8 years) were initially recruited from six lakeshore villages representative of high, moderate and low levels of disease transmission. At baseline, all children were tested for intestinal schistosomiasis by microscopic examination of duplicate Kato-Katz smears prepared from a single stool faecal, by antigen detection with the urine CCA dipstick test and by serology with a commercially available ELISA test (as 'gold-standard') that measures host antibody titres to soluble egg antigens. As a point-of-care diagnosis, the urine CCA dipstick test achieved sensitivity and specificity values ranging from 52.5-63.2% and 57.7-75.6%, respectively, with faecal microscopy achieving very high specificities (>87%) but sensitivities as low as 16.7% in the low transmission setting.The urine CCA test was shown to be more effective than faecal microscopy especially in lower transmission settings. The diagnostic performance of this test was not significantly impacted by treatment history or co-infections with other intestinal helminths.Diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni without the stool: comparison of three diagnostic tests to detect Schistosoma [corrected] mansoni infection from filtered urine in Zambia.Diagnosis for intestinal Schistosoma mansoni lacks sensitivity and is arduous to conduct. The standard diagnostic tests, Kato-Katz (KK) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) both lack sensitivity and with KK, require obtaining, transporting, and examining fresh stool. We compared diagnostic efficacy of KK, CCA, and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) to detect S. mansoni infection (species-specific DNA) from 89 filtered urine samples collected in Zambia. The PCR was the strongest indicator of positive cases with sensitivity and specificity of 100% in comparison to CCA (67% and 60%) and KK (50% and 100%). High positive and negative predictive values (100%) were also indicative of robustness of PCR. The same pattern was observed when stratified for sex and age group-specific analysis. Diagnosis of S. mansoni from filtered urine samples by PCR is an effective means to detect low intensity infection and would enhance the effectiveness of surveillance and control programs of schistosomiasis.Diagnosis of schistosomiasis by reagent strip test for detection of circulating cathodic antigen.A newly developed reagent strip assay for the diagnosis of schistosomiasis based on parasite antigen detection in urine of infected individuals was evaluated. The test uses the principle of lateral flow through a nitrocellulose strip of the sample mixed with a colloidal carbon conjugate of a monoclonal antibody specific for Schistosoma circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). The strip assay to diagnose a group of highly infected schoolchildren in Mwanza, Tanzania, demonstrated a high sensitivity and association with the intensity of infection as measured both by egg counts, and by circulating anodic antigen and CCA levels determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. A specificity of ca. 90% was shown in a group of schistosome-negative schoolchildren from Tarime, Tanzania, an area where schistosomiasis is not endemic. The test is easy to perform and requires no technical equipment or special training. The stability of the strips and the conjugate in the dry format lasts for at least 3 months at ambient temperature in sealed packages, making it suitable for transport and use in areas where schistosomiasis is endemic. This assay can easily be developed to an end-user format.Prevalence and intensity of urinary schistosomiasis in primary school children of the Kotto Barombi Health Area, Cameroon.To assess the prevalence and intensity of urinary schistosomiasis in school pupils aged five to sixteen years.Barombi Kotto Health Area, southwest Cameroon.A cross-sectional study.Three hundred and forty seven primary school children.All children found to be infected were treated with praziquantel (biltricide).The study would be able to provide baseline information on the epidemiology of schistosomiasis which is vital for control strategies.The overall prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium in the study areas was 53.6%, with the highest prevalence of 73.9% recorded in Barombi Kotto village. Children resident on Barombi Kotto island were more significantly infected than those on the peripheral mainland (93.3% versus 46.2%, p < 0.01). Prevalence rate and intensity of infection did not vary significantly (p > 0.05) with sex, class or age of the pupils. The mean egg count varied significantly between schools (p < 0.001).Barombi Kotto village was identified as the focus of urinary schistosomiasis, with the highest recorded in children dwelling on the island, the surrounding lake being the main focus of transmission. Focal snail control as an adjunct of chemotherapy and intensive health education for the local population are strongly recommended as a means of reducing the high infection rate in the area.Urinary schistosomiasis-associated morbidity in schoolchildren detected with urine albumin-to-creatinine ratio (UACR) reagent strips.To evaluate urine albumin-to-creatinine ratio (UACR) reagent strips for detection of urinary tract pathology (UTP) associated with urinary schistosomiasis in schoolchildren from Zanzibar.Sixty-six schoolchildren were examined for urinary schistosomiasis and UTP using urine reagent strips (Hemastix, urine microscopy and portable ultrasonography. The UACR was estimated using Microalbustix; univariate and logistic regression methods were used to test for statistical associations.Prevalence of egg-patent schistosomiasis was 65.2% while 77.3% had micro-haematuria and 66.1% had a least one ultrasound-identified UTP. Abnormal UACR (> or =3.4 mg/mmol) was frequent (88.4%) but an unsatisfactory identifier of UTP, albeit highly sensitive: sensitivity (SS) = 100.0%, specificity (SP) = 23.8%, positive predictive value (PPV) = 71.9%, negative predictive value (NPV) = 100.0%. When only severely abnormal UACR was considered (> or =33.9 mg/mmol), SS decreased while SP improved: SS = 58.5%, SP = 61.9%, PPV = 75.0%, NPV = 43.3%.Abnormal and severely abnormal UACRs were strongly associated with egg-patent urinary schistosomiasis and UTP, although via different mechanisms: respectively, from venous blood released directly into the urine from bladder wall perforations, and from leaching sera released from chronic egg-induced lesions throughout the urinary tract. From a control perspective, Microalbustix reagent strips are therefore best applied in pre-screening protocols allowing selection, or rather confident exclusion, of schoolchildren with urinary schistosomiasis for more detailed investigations.The performance of haematuria reagent strips for the rapid mapping of urinary schistosomiasis: field experience from Southern Sudan.The implementation of programmes to control neglected tropical diseases (NTDs) requires up-to-date information on the prevalence and distribution of each NTD. This study evaluated the performance of reagent strip testing for haematuria to diagnose Schistosoma haematobium infection among school-aged children in the context of a rapid mapping survey in Southern Sudan. The reagent strips were highly sensitive (97.8%) but only moderately specific (58.8%). The proportion of false positive diagnoses was significantly higher among girls than boys, especially among girls aged 5-10 years. These findings suggest that reagent strips alone are not sufficient for rapid mapping surveys. A two-step approach is thus recommended whereby haematuria-positive urine samples are subsequently examined using urine filtration.Accuracy of urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) test for Schistosoma mansoni diagnosis in different settings of Côte d'Ivoire.Promising results have been reported for a urine circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) test for the diagnosis of Schistosoma mansoni. We assessed the accuracy of a commercially available CCA cassette test (designated CCA-A) and an experimental formulation (CCA-B) for S. mansoni diagnosis.We conducted a cross-sectional survey in three settings of Côte d'Ivoire: settings A and B are endemic for S. mansoni, whereas S. haematobium co-exists in setting C. Overall, 446 children, aged 8-12 years, submitted multiple stool and urine samples. For S. mansoni diagnosis, stool samples were examined with triplicate Kato-Katz, whereas urine samples were tested with CCA-A. The first stool and urine samples were additionally subjected to an ether-concentration technique and CCA-B, respectively. Urine samples were examined for S. haematobium using a filtration method, and for microhematuria using Hemastix dipsticks.Considering nine Kato-Katz as diagnostic 'gold' standard, the prevalence of S. mansoni in setting A, B and C was 32.9%, 53.1% and 91.8%, respectively. The sensitivity of triplicate Kato-Katz from the first stool and a single CCA-A test was 47.9% and 56.3% (setting A), 73.9% and 69.6% (setting B), and 94.2% and 89.6% (setting C). The respective sensitivity of a single CCA-B was 10.4%, 29.9% and 75.0%. The ether-concentration technique showed a low sensitivity for S. mansoni diagnosis (8.3-41.0%). The specificity of CCA-A was moderate (76.9-84.2%); CCA-B was high (96.7-100%). The likelihood of a CCA-A color reaction increased with higher S. mansoni fecal egg counts (odds ratio: 1.07, p<0.001). A concurrent S. haematobium infection or the presence of microhematuria did not influence the CCA-A test results for S. mansoni diagnosis.CCA-A showed similar sensitivity than triplicate Kato-Katz for S. mansoni diagnosis with no cross-reactivity to S. haematobium and microhematuria. The low sensitivity of CCA-B in our study area precludes its use for S. mansoni diagnosis.Comparison of the circulating anodic antigen detection assay and urine filtration to diagnose Schistosoma haematobium infections in Mali.The applicability of a circulating Schistosoma antigen detection assay for determining rates of infection and efficacy of chemotherapy was evaluated in Mali. Urine egg counts were compared to circulating anodic antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (CAA-ELISA) titres in serum, before and 6 weeks after treatment with a single dose of praziquantel (40 mg/kg), in 2 villages in Dogon Country, an area endemic for S. haematobium, the predominant schistosome infection in Mali. In Kassa, a village with a moderate prevalence of infection, the serological prevalence (48%) was significantly higher than the parasitological prevalence (31%). In Boro, a village with high parasitological prevalence (76%), no difference was observed between the results of both methods (prevalence by CAA-ELISA was 75%). Cure rates estimated by CAA-ELISA were lower than those determined parasitologically, suggesting that cure rates are overestimated by egg counting. The sensitivity of the CAA-ELISA was 78%. In both villages, before treatment, a positive correlation was found between the number of eggs in urine and serum CAA titres. It is concluded that, although further simplification and improvement of the sensitivity of the assay is needed, in its present ELISA format the antigen detection assay is useful for monitoring sentinel populations. Furthermore, the serum CAA assay performed adequately in a public health laboratory within an endemic country.Limited field evaluation of a rapid monoclonal antibody-based dipstick assay for urinary schistosomiasis.A rapid, visually read monoclonal antibody (MoAb)-based dipstick assay for specific diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis was field tested with microscopy and the use of hematuria and proteinuria in a schistosomiasis hematobia endemic area in Southern Ghana. The study group consisted of 229 individuals (114 males and 115 females) aged 1 to 86 years; 145/229 (63.3%) of the subjects submitted stool samples from which no S. mansoni eggs were detected. However, infections with Necator americanus (hookworms) 33.1%, Ascaris lumbricoides 2.8%, Trichuris trichiura (whipworm) 2.8%, and Strongyloides stercoralis 0.7% were detected but did not appear to influence the results of the MoAb-dipstick assay. Urinary schistosomiasis prevalence was estimated as 47.6% by microscopy, 48% by MoAb-dipstick, 39.7% by microhematuria, and 23.6% by proteinuria. The MoAb-dipstick correctly identified 108/109 (99.1%) of microscopically confirmed cases and 118/120 (98.3%) of egg-negative individuals, thereby giving a sensitivity of 99.1% and a specificity of 98.3%. On the other hand, microhematuria and proteinuria were, respectively, 76.1% and 40.4% sensitive, and 94.2% and 92.5% specific when compared to microscopy. Microhematuria and proteinuria had significantly lower sensitivity (P < 0.001) than either microscopy or dipstick.Application of a circulating-cathodic-antigen (CCA) strip test and real-time PCR, in comparison with microscopy, for the detection of Schistosoma haematobium in urine samples from Ghana.In the detection of parasitic infection, the traditional methods based on microscopy often have low sensitivity and/or specificity compared with the newer, molecular tests. An assay based on real-time PCR and a reagent strip test for detecting circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) have both now been compared with urine filtration and microscopy, in the detection of Schistosoma haematobium infections. Urine samples, obtained from 74 'cases' in areas of Ghana with endemic S. haematobium and 79 'controls' from non-endemic areas, were each checked using the three methods. With the results of the filtration and microscopy taken as the 'gold standard', real-time PCR was found to be 100% specific and 89% sensitive whereas the CCA strips were 91% specific and 41% sensitive. With the samples found to contain > or =50 eggs/10 ml (indicating relatively intense infections), the sensitivities of the PCR and CCA were higher, at 100% and 62%, respectively. As expected, egg counts were negatively correlated with the number of amplification cycles needed, in the PCR, to give a signal that exceeded the background (r=-0.38; P<0.01). Although the real-time PCR and CCA strip tests are very different, both show promise in the detection of S. haematobium infections. The PCR has optimal specificity and high sensitivity but the specificity of the CCA strips and the sensitivity of both tools could still be improved. A more thorough re-evaluation of the sensitivity and specificity of microscopy and these newer diagnostic methods, with an estimation of the cost-effectiveness of each technique, is recommended.Circulating antigens levels in different clinical forms of the Schistosoma mansoni infection.With the aim to evaluate the circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) levels in relation to the different clinical phases of Schistosoma sp. infection a sandwich ELISA using monoclonal antibody 5H11 was performed. The sera of three groups of 25 Brazilian patients with acute, intestinal and hepatosplenic forms of S. mansoni infection were tested and compared to a non-infected control group. Patients and control groups were matched for age and sex and the number of eggs per gram of feces was equally distributed among the three patient groups. Sensitivity of 100%, 72%, 52% of the assay was observed for the intestinal, hepatosplenic and acute toxemic groups respectively. The specificity was 100%. Intestinal and hepatosplenic groups presented CCA levels significantly higher in comparison to those observed for acute patients (F-ratio = 2,524; p = 0.000 and F-ratio = 6,314; p = 0.015 respectively). There was no significant difference of CCA serum levels between hepatosplenic and intestinal groups (F-ratio = 1,026; p = 0.316).Preliminary study of urinary schistosomiasis in a village in the delta of the Senegal river basin, Senegal.Three years after the first cases of urinary schistosomiasis infection were reported in the village of Mbodiene, Senegal, Schistosoma haematobium eggs were found in 87% of the inhabitants of this village; 30% were heavily infected (> 50 eggs per 10 mL urine). The prevalence of infection was very high in all age groups, but children showed more intense infections. No difference between sexes was found. In the special situation of a very high prevalence, test strips for proteinuria and haematuria are not very useful for the individual diagnosis of S. haematobium infection. Six and 12 weeks after treatment with a single dose of praziquantel (40 mg/kg), S. haematobium eggs were found in 25% and 30% of the treated subjects, respectively. Bulinus globosus was identified as intermediate host, but other snail vectors may also play a role. S. mansoni eggs were found in 1% of the population. Both S. haematobium and S. mansoni are spreading in the delta of the Senegal river.Screening of Tanzanian women of childbearing age for urinary schistosomiasis: validity of urine reagent strip readings and self-reported symptoms.The screening of women of childbearing age for haematuria, leukocyturia and proteinuria to detect urinary schistosomiasis can be confounded by several factors such as menstruation, pregnancy and genitourinary infections. We therefore undertook a study in an area endemic for Schistosoma haematobium in the United Republic of Tanzania to carry out the following: assess the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values--in women of childbearing age--of indirect indicators of urinary schistosomiasis, as measured by urine reagent strip readings; assess the predictive values of self-reported symptoms; and finally to estimate the morbidity attributable to S. haematobium. A total of 303 women (128 and 175, respectively, living in high- and low-risk sites) participated in the study. Haematuria was more frequent among women excreting S. haematobium eggs than among those who did not (65% versus 32%). The predictive potential of all indirect disease markers was poor in the highly endemic site, while in the sites with low endemicity the negative predictive values were high. Among infected women, 54% of haematuria could be attributed to S. haematobium, but for patients with more than 10 eggs/10 ml the attributable fraction rose to 70%. Symptoms of "bloody urine" and "pain while urinating" were recalled significantly more often by women living in the highly endemic site. On a population level, one-third of the self-reported cases with bloody urine could be attributed to urinary schistosomiasis. Screening of women of childbearing age for urinary schistosomiasis using urine reagent strips can be biased in two directions. The prevalence of S. haematobium will be overestimated if other causes of haematuria, such as reproductive tract infections, are highly endemic. On the other hand, women with light or very light infections will be missed and will not be treated. This is of concern because genital schistosomiasis, a possible risk factor for the transmission of HIV, occurs among women even with light infections.Use of circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) dipsticks for detection of intestinal and urinary schistosomiasis.An evaluation of a commercially available antigen capture dipstick that detects schistosome circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in urine was conducted in representative endemic areas for intestinal and urinary schistosomiasis in Uganda and Zanzibar, respectively. Under field-based conditions, the sensitivity (SS) and specificity (SP) of the dipstick was 83 and 81% for detection of Schistosoma mansoni infections while positive predictive (PPV) and negative predictive values (NPV) were 84%. Light egg-positive infections were sometimes CCA-negative while CCA-positives included egg-negative children. A positive association between faecal egg output and intensity of CCA test band was observed. Estimating prevalence of intestinal schistosomiasis by school with dipsticks was highly correlated (r=0.95) with Kato-Katz stool examinations, typically within +/-8.5%. In Zanzibar, however, dipsticks totally failed to detect S. haematobium despite examining children with egg-patent schistosomiasis. This was also later corroborated by further surveys in Niger and Burkina Faso. Laboratory testing of dipsticks with aqueous adult worm lysates from several reference species showed correct functioning, however, dipsticks failed to detect CCA in urine from S. haematobium-infected hamsters. While CCA dipsticks are a good alternative, or complement, to stool microscopy for field diagnosis of intestinal schistosomiasis, they have no proven value for field diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis. At approximately 2.6 US dollars per dipstick, they are presently too expensive to be cost-effective for wide scale use in disease mapping surveys unless Lot Quality Assurance Sampling (LQAS) strategies are developed.Urinary schistosomiasis in schoolchildren in Dar-es-Salaam, Tanzania, and the factors influencing its transmission.The prevalence of urinary schistosomiasis among the schoolchildren living in Kigogo administrative ward of the Kinondoni district of Dar-es-Salaam city, Tanzania, and the factors influencing the transmission of the causative agent, Schistosoma haematobium, were investigated in a cross-sectional study. The estimate of overall prevalence, based on microscopical examination of a single urine sample/subject, was 47.6%. Compared with the girls, the boys were more likely to be excreting schistosome eggs (54.6% v. 40.8%; P = 0.004) and had, in general, higher intensities of infection (54 v. 38 eggs/10 ml urine; P = 0.001). The children aged 10-14 years had higher prevalences and intensities of infection than those in the younger or older age-group studied. The sensitivity of micro-haematuria as an indicator of infection (compared with the microscopical examination of single urine samples) was 84.3% overall, reaching 92% among the children excreting > or = 50 eggs/10 ml urine. The corresponding positive and negative predictive values were 77% and 84%, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of the history of haematuria as an indirect screening technique for S. haematobium were 60.4%, 72.7%, 67% and 67%, respectively. Recreational activities such as bathing, swimming and playing in the water were the most frequent activities attracting children to water bodies and carried the highest risks of infection with S. haematobium. Knowledge about the disease, especially on the symptoms and mode of transmission, was generally good but the methods of prevention were inadequately known. Chemotherapy to control urinary schistosomiasis in schoolchildren is recommended; infected children may be identified on the basis of haematuria, detected using questionnaires or reagent strips. Additional health education, to heighten awareness of the disease and its prevention, would also be beneficial.Urine test strips: reliability of semi-quantitative findings under tropical conditions.Semi-quantitative urinalysis with urine reagent strips (URS) for erythrocyturia (EU), leucocyturia (LU) and proteinuria (PU) was performed in Congolese and Sudanese school children with Schistosoma haematobium and/or S. mansoni infection. Quantitative urinalysis was performed on the same specimen using microscopy and a Neubauer counting chamber for EU and LU and the Coomassie blue dye-binding assay for PU. Microscopically detectable EU of more than 10 cells/microliters was found in 63% of all samples and LU of more than 20 cells/microliters was found in 60% of all samples. With the Coomassie blue method, PU of more than 150 mg/l was detected in 51% of all samples. URS gave positive results of grade 1-3 for EU in 69% of all samples, for LU in 63% of all samples and for PU in 66% of all samples. The sensitivity and specificity of URS compared with standard reference methods were as follow: EU 95% and 75%, LU 81% and 81% and PU 90% and 56%. When the results of all three test were combined, URS differentiated abnormal from normal urine specimens with a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 70%. Median quantitative results showed a good correlation with semiquantitative URS readings for all parameters, but there was a wide range of URS scores. We concluded that URS sensitivity detect urinary abnormalities and thus may be used as a general screening method under field conditions when more specific methods cannot be performed.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Diagnostic accuracy of urine filtration and dipstick tests for Schistosoma haematobium infection in a lightly infected population of Ghanaian schoolchildren.Two screening methods, reagent dipsticks for hematuria and urine filtration for Schistosoma haematobium eggs, were evaluated for their sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing infection with S. haematobium in lightly infected Ghanaian children. Schoolchildren aged 8-18 years (n=255) provided urine samples on three occasions. Overall, 36.4% of girls and 50.7% of boys presented with eggs at least once; 3.3% of girls and 7.5% of boys presented with both eggs and hematuria three times. Many children presented with eggs but without hematuria, or with hematuria but without eggs. When each child was screened three times, the sensitivity of each test method improved by at least 22.9% as compared with single screening, but previously unidentified infections were detected at the third screening, indicating that even three screenings is insufficient. Nearly half of lightly infected children (<50 eggs/10 ml urine, by maximum egg count) were egg-positive during only one of three screenings. Thus, data presented here indicate that when individuals are screened repeatedly, infection status can be assessed more accurately, control programs can be properly evaluated, and population estimates of S. haematobium infection may be made with increased confidence, as compared with single screening.Malumfashi Endemic Diseases Research Project, XV. The potential medical importance of bilharzia in northern Nigeria: a suggested rapid, cheap and effective solution for control of Schistosoma haematobium infection.[Modelling sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of hematuria testing using reagent sticks in the diagnosis of Schistosoma haematobium infection].Since its recognition as an effective tool to identify Schistosoma haematobium infection, haematuria detection has been used in several large scale control programs. However, large variations in performance between age groups, gender, prevalence and areas were observed. Correlation between the degree of haematuria and the intensity of infection and between intensity of infection with age and/or gender could partly explained these variations. Other factors, such as the circadian cycles and day-to-day variations of haematuria and egg excretion, a concomitant presence of blood in urine for another reason than schistosomiasis and the intrinsic characteristics of the reagents strips also contribute to the observed variations. This study assessed the influence of age, gender and intensity of infection taken together on the performance of the diagnostic test by fitting logistic regression models. During a socio-economic study of schistosomiasis, carried out between 1989 and 1991 in a rice-growing area located in Mali, West Africa, haematuria was detected by reagent strips among 2,873 six-year-old and more subjects randomly chosen from 14 villages. The "gold standard" of infection was provided by the parasite egg counts. Laboratory quality controls were implemented. Observed sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values were calculated by the standard two-by-two tables. The influence of age, gender, intensity of infection, measured in a continuous scale, on these parameters were studied by fitting two logistic models. The first one modelled sensitivity and specificity The second one modelled predictive values. Goodness-of-fit tests were performed. Large variations in the observed values of sensitivities, specificities and predictive values by age and gender were observed. The best fitted model for sensitivity and specificity included infection status, age, gender, intensity and an age by gender interaction. For the predictive values, the best model included haematuria, age, and an haematuria by age interaction. Given the large variations in the performances across the covariates strata defined by cross-tabulation of the age/gender and intensity categories, this modelling approach provided a more realistic appraisal of the performances than using overall values obtained from a general two- by-two table. It allowed to assess the effect of the covariates of interest on the performances of the test and provided an adjustment of the performances on these covariates. The best fitted model was able to provide estimates of sensitivity for each age/gender stratum as a function of the intensity of infection, which could not be done by using the two-by-two table approach. A decrease in sensitivity adjusted for intensity of infection above 10 years of age among males is discussed. This modelling approach also uses all the information available and not only the data from the stratum of interest.Efficacy and safety of praziquantel in preschool-aged children in an area co-endemic for Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium.In sub-Saharan Africa the recommended strategy to control schistosomiasis is preventive chemotherapy. Emphasis is placed on school-aged children, but in high endemicity areas, preschool-aged children are also at risk, and hence might need treatment with praziquantel. Since a pediatric formulation (e.g., syrup) is not available outside of Egypt, crushed praziquantel tablets are used, but the efficacy and safety of this treatment regimen is insufficiently studied.We assessed the efficacy and safety of crushed praziquantel tablets among preschool-aged children (<6 years) in the Azaguié district, south Côte d'Ivoire, where Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium coexist. Using a cross-sectional design, children provided two stool and two urine samples before and 3 weeks after treatment. Crushed praziquantel tablets, mixed with water, were administered at a dose of 40 mg/kg. Adverse events were assessed and graded 4 and 24 hours posttreatment by interviewing mothers/guardians.Overall, 160 preschool-aged children had at least one stool and one urine sample examined with duplicate Kato-Katz thick smears and a point-of-care circulating cathodic antigen (POC-CCA) cassette for S. mansoni, and urine filtration for S. haematobium diagnosis before and 3 weeks after praziquantel administration. According to the Kato-Katz and urine filtration results, we found high efficacy against S. mansoni (cure rate (CR), 88.6%; egg reduction rate (ERR), 96.7%) and S. haematobium (CR, 88.9%; ERR, 98.0%). POC-CCA revealed considerably lower efficacy against S. mansoni (CR, 53.8%). Treatment was generally well tolerated, but moderately severe adverse events (i.e., body and face inflammation), were observed in four Schistosoma egg-negative children.Crushed praziquantel administered to preschool-aged children at a dose of 40 mg/kg is efficacious against S. mansoni and S. haematobium in a co-endemic setting of Côte d'Ivoire. Further research is required with highly sensitive diagnostic tools and safety must be investigated in more depth.Controlled-Trials.com ISRCTN53172722.Sensitivities and specificities of diagnostic tests and infection prevalence of Schistosoma haematobium estimated from data on adults in villages northwest of Accra, Ghana.Substantial uncertainties surround the sensitivities and specificities of diagnostic techniques for urinary schistosomiasis. We used latent class (LC) modeling to address this problem. In this study, 220 adults in three villages northwest of Accra, Ghana were examined using five Schistosoma haematobium diagnostic measures: microscopic examination of urine for detection of S. haematobium eggs, dipsticks for detection of hematuria, tests for circulating antigens, antibody tests, and ultrasound scans of the urinary system. Testing of the LC model indicated non-invariance of the performance of the diagnostic tests across different age groups, and measurement invariance held for males and females and for the three villages. We therefore recommend the use of LC models for comparison between and the identification of the most accurate schistosomiasis diagnostic tests. Furthermore, microscopy and hematuria dipsticks were indicated through these models as the most appropriate techniques for detection of S. haematobium infection.Urinary schistosomiasis on Zanzibar: application of two novel assays for the detection of excreted albumin and haemoglobin in urine.As part of a urinary schistosomiasis control programme on Zanzibar, an aged cross-sectional survey of 305 children from three schools on Unguja was conducted to investigate the relationships between levels of excreted albumin and haemoglobin in urine and Schistosoma haematobium infection status. Diagnosis was determined by standard parasitological methods, dipstick reagents for microhaematuria, visual inspection for macrohaematuria as well as collection of case-history questionnaire data for self-diagnosis. Prevalence of infection as determined by parasitology was 53.9% and approximately, one quarter of the children examined were anaemic (<11 g dl(-1)). A statistically significant negative association of blood haemoglobin levels of boys and S. haematobium infection intensity status was observed (rs=-0.23, P=0.005). Through sensitivity analysis of urine-albumin values it was determined that a concentration of above >40 mg l(-1), as measured with the HemoCue urine-albumin photometer, had sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of 0.90, 0.83, 0.86 and 0.89 respectively against 'gold-standard' parasitology. There was a clear association of reported pain upon micturition for children with elevated urine-albumin levels, with an odds ratio of 20 to 1. Levels of excreted blood in urine were quantified with the HemoCue Plasma/Low Hb photometer. However, dipsticks remain the method of choice for urine-haemoglobin of 0.1 g l(-1) and below. Urine parameters over a 24-h period were assessed in a small sub-sample. Reductions in both albumin and haemoglobin excretion were observed in 11 children 54 days after praziquantel treatment. It was concluded that these rapid, high-through-put, portable HemoCue assays could play a role in better describing and monitoring the occurrence, severity and evolution of urinary schistosomiasis disease. The urine-albumin assay has particular promise as a biochemical marker of S. haematobium induced kidney- and upper urinary tract-morbidity.Circulating anodic and cathodic antigen in serum and urine from Schistosoma haematobium-infected Cameroonian children receiving praziquantel: a longitudinal study.A cohort of 148 Cameroonian children infected with Schistosoma haematobium was followed before praziquantel therapy and 1, 2, 3, 5, and 12 months thereafter. Egg output, the reagent strip index (RSI, a pathological marker), and circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) in serum and urine were quantified. At enrollment, the median level of egg output was 365/10 mL of urine; 97% of children had a positive RSI; CAA was detected in serum from 76% of children and in urine from 64%; and CCA was detected in serum from 55% of children and in urine from 87%. Two months after chemotherapy, egg output and RSI had decreased significantly; reinfection later developed in parallel with increases in the serum and urine concentrations of CAA and the urine concentrations of CCA. The measurement of CAA and CCA is useful for diagnosis, evaluation of disease severity, and follow-up of chemotherapy in individuals infected with S. haematobium.Urine circulating soluble egg antigen in relation to egg counts, hematuria, and urinary tract pathology before and after treatment in children infected with Schistosoma haematobium in Kenya.A cohort of 117 school children infected with Schistosoma haematobium was followed-up after therapy with praziquantel (0, 2, 4, 6, 12, and 18 months) and various infection and morbidity parameters (egg counts, hematuria, soluble egg antigen [SEA] in urine, and ultrasonography-detectable pathology) were quantified. At the onset of the study, 97% of the children were positive for S. haematobium with a geometric mean egg count of 45.7 eggs/10 ml of urine. Eighty-one percent of the children were positive for SEA in urine with a geometric mean SEA concentration of 218.8 ng/ml of urine. Ninety-two percent and 56% of the children were microhematuria positive and macrohematuria positive, respectively. Two months after treatment, all infection and morbidity indicators had significantly decreased. Reinfection after treatment as determined by detection of eggs in urine was observed by four months post-treatment while the other parameters remained low. The clearance of SEA was slower than that of egg counts while pathology resolved at an even slower pace. Levels of SEA and egg output showed similar correlations with ultrasound detectable pathology; these correlations were better than the correlation between hematuria and pathology.Detection of circulating anodic antigen by ELISA for seroepidemiology of schistosomiasis mansoni.Sera of individuals from Burundi excreting eggs of Schistosoma mansoni (prevalence 35%; 178 subjects) and of similar individuals from Maniema, Zaire (prevalence 95%; 99 subjects), and of 159 Dutch and 81 Zairean non-infected controls, were screened by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for the presence of schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA). No false positive results were obtained. The sensitivity of the test was 75% in Burundi and 93% in Zaire, a significant difference (P less than 0.05). However, in matched egg output classes the test results did not differ significantly; 60% and 67%, respectively, of those excreting 1-100 eggs per gram of faeces (epg), 86% and 100% of those excreting 101-400 epg, and 100% of those excreting over 400 epg were detected. The efficiency of the assay was 91% in Burundi and 93% in Zaire. The Spearman rank coefficient of correlation between antigen titre and egg output (determined by 3 consecutive Kato egg counts) was 0.61 in Burundi and 0.82 in Zaire. The sensitivity of the test compared well with a single egg count. In addition, preliminary data showed that occasionally CAA was detectable in serum of individuals not excreting schistosome eggs. As CAA is found only in the presence of living worms, such cases reflect active infections.Control of morbidity due to Schistosoma haematobium on Pemba Island: egg excretion and hematuria as indicators of infection.The variability of Schistosoma haematobium egg excretion using a quantitative syringe filtration technique and the variability of hematuria detected visually and by reagent strips were studied in a population of 520 subjects from the village of Pujini (Pemba Island, Zanzibar, Tanzania) for 6 consecutive days. A high degree of day-to-day variability of egg excretion within subjects was found both in the whole population and in the 5-19 year age group. Subjects with 1 urinary egg count of greater than or equal to 50 eggs/10 ml urine were not similarly classified in 36-61% of the other 5 examinations and 4-16% of their other examinations were negative. Gross hematuria had a specificity of almost 100%, when related to a positive filtration on any day, and was closely related to egg counts of greater than or equal to 50 eggs/10 ml urine. The finding of a strongly positive reaction for hematuria on a given single day was closely associated with the subject having a high egg count (greater than or equal to 50 eggs/10 ml urine) on at least one of the 6 days of the study. At the primary health care level, single highly positive semiquantitative values for hematuria were a more useful diagnostic indicator than a single egg count to select patients with heavy infections for selective population chemotherapy.Evaluation of an ELISA for combined measurement of CAA and CCA in schistosomiasis mansoni.An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was developed for combined measurement of schistosome circulating anodic antigen (CAA) and circulating cathodic antigen (CCA). Monoclonal antibodies against CAA and CCA were used as coating and as fluorescein-labeled detecting antibodies in a FITC-anti-FITC system. The lower detection limit of the assay was 1.1 ng antigen (AWA-TCA)/ml. Serum samples of Schistosoma mansoni infected individuals from Zaire (n = 60) and Burundi (n = 60) were tested in this assay and in single-antigen ELISAs. Sensitivities of assaying for CAA, CCA, combined CAA + CCA, and of parallel testing for CAA and for CCA were calculated from titres and antigen concentrations. With serum samples from the heavily infected individuals (Zaire), all assays had a sensitivity of 97% or higher. In contrast, with serum samples from individuals from Burundi (low to moderate infections) it was shown that combined testing resulted in a slightly lower sensitivity than testing for individual antigens. By parallel testing for CAA and CCA, the sensitivity could be increased considerably (to 95%), however.Frequency of haematuria and proteinuria in relation to prevalence and intensity of Schistosoma haematobium infection in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.Evaluation of haematuria as an indirect screening test for schistosomiasis haematobium: a population-based study in the White Nile province, Sudan.Haematuria elicited in the history, seen macroscopically or detected by reagent strips, was used as an indirect screening test for Schistosoma haematobium infection in Um-Hani Irrigation Scheme in the White Nile province, Sudan. These approaches were used separately or combined in different sequences. Reagent strips alone detected 81% of cases and 88% of those who excreted 50 egg/10 ml of urine or more. The sequence of observation of gross haematuria followed by screening with reagent strips and then taking history of haematuria had the highest sensitivity of all the orders, 0.87, and it saved 18% of reagent strips. If history and inspection were done first, followed by reagent strips, the sensitivity would be 0.86 and 47% of strips would be saved. The specificity of haematuria as a diagnostic index for schistosomiasis, however, was low.Accuracy of circulating cathodic antigen tests for rapid mapping of Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium infections in Southern Sudan.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of a circulating cathodic antigen (CCA) urine dipstick test for detecting Schistosoma mansoni and S. haematobium alongside an integrated rapid mapping survey in Southern Sudan.A total of 373 children aged 5-16 years were included in the study. Of these 26.0% were infected with S. haematobium and 24.5% were infected with S. mansoni, as identified by urine filtration or single Kato-Katz thick smear, respectively. The CCA performed moderately in detecting S. mansoni, with sensitivity of 89.1% and specificity of 74.2%, and poorly in detecting S. haematobium infections, with a sensitivity of 36.8% and specificity of 78.9%. This may be a slight underestimate of true CCA accuracy, since only single stool and urine samples were examined by microscopy. The true 'gold standard' for comparison would have been the collection of multiple stool samples over consecutive days.The poor CCA accuracy for diagnosis of urinary schistosomiasis means that this test is currently not suitable for rapid mapping of schistosomiasis in areas where both S. mansoni and S. haematobium may be endemic.Circulating anodic antigen (CAA) levels in different age groups in a Zimbabwean rural community endemic for Schistosoma haematobium determined using the magnetic beads antigen-capture enzyme-linked immunoassay.A simplified version of the magnetic bead antigen-capture enzyme-linked immunoassay (MBAC-EIA) was used to detect circulating anodic antigen (CAA) in individuals of different age groups with Schistosoma haematobium infection only in an endemic area of Zimbabwe. An overall positive correlation between S. haematobium egg excretion and CAA levels was demonstrated. The age profile for CAA levels was generally comparable with the age profile of S. haematobium prevalence and intensity of infection. The CAA levels were higher in younger (5-14 years of age) individuals than in older (greater than 14 years of age) ones. Since the sensitivity of the MBAC-EIA in the diagnosis of S. haematobium infection was found to be 97%, CAA levels appear to be a useful indicator of worm burden in an endemic area.Urinary schistosomiasis: options for control within endemic rural communities: a case study in south-west Nigeria.A preliminary investigation was conducted into factors that may bring about control of morbidity due to endemic urinary schistosomiasis in rural communities. A Knowledge, Attitudes, Practices and Beliefs (KAPB) study was conducted among primary schoolchildren (those with more than four years elementary education) in Ogbagba village, Osun State, Nigeria, from October 1990 to December 1993, to ascertain their understanding of urinary schistosomiasis. The study further assessed the potential of subjective haematuria, i.e. asking children with haematuria in the recent past to so indicate, in detecting urinary schistosomiasis. It was established that subjective haematuria is both sensitive and specific for detecting urinary schistosomiasis in endemic communities. The study also established that subjective haematuria offers a valid, easy to recognize target for morbidity control in endemic situation. It is proposed that with appropriate health education; availability of safe, effective, easy-to-administer drugs, such as praziquantel, morbidity control of urinary schistosomiasis is feasible within the primary health care system with the lower cadre health worker or even a volunteer village health worker (VVHW) at the centre of the control effort.During October 1990 to December 1993, in Ife-Central Local Government Area of Osun State, Nigeria, interviews with and physical and laboratory examinations of 106 grade 4-6 pupils aged 8-16 were conducted in Ogbagba village so the researchers could determine their knowledge, attitudes, practices, and beliefs about urinary schistosomiasis as well as the factors that offer opportunities for morbidity control of urinary schistosomiasis in an endemic area. There was no health facility in Ogbagba. 89.5% of the children had urinary schistosomiasis. 75.5% of all pupils knew the local name for urinary schistosomiasis. 66% had previously passed blood in their urine. 85.7% of these pupils believed hematuria was serious. 70.8% gave a positive history of current episode of hematuria. 62.7% of these pupils did not seek any treatment. Symptoms associated with past hematuria included abdominal pain, weakness, weight loss, and fever. 65.7% of all pupils did not know what causes urinary schistosomiasis. 67.1% believed that urinary schistosomiasis was acquired via some form of contact with water, especially swimming (57.1%). The leading types of water contact included washing clothes (95.3%), fetching water (94.3%), bathing (87.7%), and swimming (74.5%). 74.5% of all pupils urinated deliberately in the river. The sensitivity, specificity, predictive values, and efficiency of alternative methods of detecting urinary schistosomiasis revealed that subjective hematuria was comparable to gross/microscopic hematuria. These findings will be used to design information, education, and communication materials for a health education program on urinary schistosomiasis using the primary health control approach. The researchers propose that both subjective and gross hematuria be used as the basis for treating children aged 4-19 living in areas endemic for urinary schistosomiasis. Praziquantel should be used as the only drug for treating urinary schistosomiasis. Health education in the schools' curriculum and information, education, and communication developed by health authorities should promote better water contact practices. Teachers need to regularly ask their pupils about hematuria and encourage them to seek medical treatment.